THE  ROLE  OF  SOCIAL  AND  BEHAVIORAL

SCIENCES  IN  PUBLIC  HEALTH

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND

SCIENCE EDUCATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND

TECHNOLOGY

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

SECOND  SESSION

SEPTEMBER  18,  2008

Serial No. 110–123

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology

(

Available  via  the  World  Wide  Web:  http://www.science.house.gov

44–345PS

WASHINGTON  : 

2009

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

COMMITTEE  ON  SCIENCE  AND  TECHNOLOGY

HON.  BART  GORDON,  Tennessee,  Chairman

JERRY  F.  COSTELLO,  Illinois
EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
LYNN  C.  WOOLSEY,  California
MARK  UDALL,  Colorado
DAVID  WU,  Oregon
BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington
BRAD  MILLER,  North  Carolina
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
NICK  LAMPSON,  Texas
GABRIELLE  GIFFORDS,  Arizona
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
LAURA  RICHARDSON,  California
DONNA  F.  EDWARDS,  Maryland
STEVEN  R.  ROTHMAN,  New  Jersey
JIM  MATHESON,  Utah
MIKE  ROSS,  Arkansas
BEN  CHANDLER,  Kentucky
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
CHARLIE  MELANCON,  Louisiana
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
HARRY  E.  MITCHELL,  Arizona
CHARLES  A.  WILSON,  Ohio
ANDRE´ CARSON,  Indiana

RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas
F.  JAMES  SENSENBRENNER  JR.,

Wisconsin

LAMAR  S.  SMITH,  Texas
DANA  ROHRABACHER,  California
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
FRANK  D.  LUCAS,  Oklahoma
JUDY  BIGGERT,  Illinois
W.  TODD  AKIN,  Missouri
TOM  FEENEY,  Florida
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
BOB  INGLIS,  South  Carolina
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
MICHAEL  T.  MCCAUL,  Texas
MARIO  DIAZ-BALART,  Florida
PHIL  GINGREY,  Georgia
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
ADRIAN  SMITH,  Nebraska
PAUL  C.  BROUN,  Georgia
VACANCY

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE EDUCATION

HON.  BRIAN  BAIRD,  Washington,  Chairman

EDDIE  BERNICE  JOHNSON,  Texas
DANIEL  LIPINSKI,  Illinois
JERRY  MCNERNEY,  California
RUSS  CARNAHAN,  Missouri
BARON  P.  HILL,  Indiana
ANDRE´ CARSON,  Indiana
BART  GORDON,  Tennessee

VERNON  J.  EHLERS,  Michigan
ROSCOE  G.  BARTLETT,  Maryland
RANDY  NEUGEBAUER,  Texas
DAVID  G.  REICHERT,  Washington
BRIAN  P.  BILBRAY,  California
RALPH  M.  HALL,  Texas

JIM  WILSON  Subcommittee  Staff  Director

DAHLIA  SOKOLOV  Democratic  Professional  Staff  Member
MELE´ WILLIAMS  Republican  Professional  Staff  Member

BESS  CAUGHRAN  Research  Assistant

(II)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

C O N T E N T S
September  18,  2008

Witness List .............................................................................................................
Hearing Charter ......................................................................................................

Page
2
3

Opening  Statements

Statement  by  Representative  Brian  Baird,  Chairman,  Subcommittee  on  Re-
search  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science  and  Technology,  U.S.
House of Representatives ....................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Statement  by  Representative  Vernon  J.  Ehlers,  Ranking  Minority  Member,
Subcommittee  on  Research  and  Science  Education,  Committee  on  Science
and Technology, U.S. House of Representatives ...............................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................

Witnesses:

Dr.  Lisa  Feldman  Barrett,  Professor  of  Psychology;  Director  of  the  Inter-
disciplinary  Affective  Science  Laboratory,  Boston  College;  Appointments  at
Harvard Medical School and Massachusetts General Hospital

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  John  B.  Jemmott  III,  Kenneth  B.  Clark  Professor  of  Communication;
Professor  of  Communication  in  Psychiatry;  Director,  Center  for  Health  Be-
havior  and  Communication  Research,  University  of  Pennsylvania,  School
of Medicine and Annenberg School for Communication

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr.  Donald  S.  Kenkel,  Professor  of  Policy  Analysis  and  Management,  College

of Human Ecology, Cornell University

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Dr. Harold G. Koenig, Professor of Psychiatry and Behavioral Sciences; Asso-
ciate  Professor  of  Medicine;  Director  of  the  Center  for  Theology,  Spiritu-
ality, and Health, Duke University

Oral Statement .................................................................................................
Written Statement ............................................................................................
Biography ..........................................................................................................
Discussion .................................................................................................................

Appendix:  Additional  Material  for  the  Record

Statement  of  David  B.  Abrams,  Executive  Director,  The  Steven  A.  Schroeder
Institute  for  Tobacco  Research  and  Policy  Studies,  American  Legacy  Foun-
dation® .................................................................................................................

(III)

6
7

7
8

9
11
13

13
15
29

30
32
35

36
38
51
51

72

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

THE  ROLE  OF  SOCIAL  AND  BEHAVIORAL

SCIENCES  IN  PUBLIC  HEALTH

THURSDAY,  SEPTEMBER  18,  2008

HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES,

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE EDUCATION,

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY,

Washington, DC.

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  call,  at  10:02  a.m.,  in  Room
2318  of  the  Rayburn  House  Office  Building,  Hon.  Brian  Baird
[Chairman of the Subcommittee] presiding.

(1)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

2

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6602 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

3

HEARING CHARTER

SUBCOMMITTEE ON RESEARCH AND SCIENCE

EDUCATION

COMMITTEE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY

U.S. HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES

The Role of Social and Behavioral

Sciences in Public Health

THURSDAY, SEPTEMBER 18, 2008

10:00 A.M.–12:00 P.M.

2318 RAYBURN HOUSE OFFICE BUILDING

1. Purpose

The  purpose  of  the  hearing  is  examine  the  role  of  the  social,  behavioral  and  eco-
nomic  sciences  in  improving  our  nation’s  health  and  well  being  and  reducing  the
economic burden of health care.

2. Witnesses:

• Dr.  Lisa  Feldman  Barrett  is  a  Professor  of  Psychology  and  Director  of  the
Interdisciplinary  Affective  Science  Laboratory  at  Boston  College,  with  ap-
pointments  at  Harvard  Medical  School  and  Massachusetts  General  Hospital.
• Dr. John B. Jemmott III is the Kenneth B. Clark Professor of Communica-
tion  at  Annenberg  School  of  Communication,  and  a  Professor  of  Communica-
tion  in  Psychiatry  and  Director  of  the  Center  for  Health  Behavior  and  Com-
munication  Research  in  the  Department  of  Psychiatry,  School  of  Medicine  at
the University of Pennsylvania.

• Dr. Donald S. Kenkel is a Professor of Policy Analysis and Management in

the College of Human Ecology at Cornell University.

• Dr. Harold Koenig is a Professor of Psychiatry and Behavioral Sciences, As-
sociate  Professor  of  Medicine,  and  Director  of  the  Center  for  Theology,  Spir-
ituality and Health at Duke University.

3. Overarching Questions:

• How can the behavioral, social and economic sciences contribute to the design
and  evaluation  of  more  effective  public  health  policies?  What  lessons  can  be
learned  from  the  decades-old  national  campaign  to  reduce  smoking?  To  what
extent  are  public  health  policies  in  general  being  shaped  by  what  has  been
learned from the social, behavioral and economic sciences?

• What new and continuing areas of basic research in the social, behavioral and
economic  sciences  could  significantly  improve  our  ability  to  design  effective
policies?  What  new  technologies  and  methodologies  are  enabling  advances  in
the  research?  Are  there  promising  research  opportunities  that  are  not  being
adequately addressed?

• What is the nature of interactions and collaborations between behavioral and
social  scientists,  biomedical  scientists  and  health  (including  mental  health)
practitioners?  How  might  these  disparate  research  and  practitioner  commu-
nities  be  better  integrated  to  improve  human  health  and  well  being?  Is  the
Federal  Government  playing  an  effective  role  in  fostering  such  collaboration?

4. Federal Spending on Social, Behavioral and Economic Sciences

Basic and applied research in the social, behavioral and economic sciences is fund-
ed  out  of  a  number  of  federal  agencies,  led  by  the  National  Institutes  of  Health
(NIH)  and  the  National  Science  Foundation  (NSF).  According  to  research  funding

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

4

statistics compiled by NSF,1 a total of $1.215 billion was obligated to basic and ap-
plied research in all social sciences for fiscal year 2006 (FY06), including economics.
Psychology  was  counted  separately,  and  was  funded  at  a  total  of  $1.91  billion  in
FY06,  of  which  $1.76  billion  was  funded  by  Health  and  Human  Services  (primarily
NIH).  Federal  support  for  academic  research  in  particular  was  $711  million  for  so-
cial  sciences  and  $629  million  for  psychology.  There  is  also  a  significant  amount  of
foundation support for public health related research.

The  main  support  for  basic  research  in  the  (non-medical)  social  and  behavioral
sciences  comes  from  the  Social,  Behavioral  and  Economics  Directorate  (SBE)  at
NSF.  Overall,  NSF  accounts  for  approximately  60  percent  of  federal  support  for
basic research in anthropology, social psychology and the social sciences at U.S. col-
leges  and  universities.  In  some  fields,  including  archaeology,  political  science,  lin-
guistics,  and  non-medical  aspects  of  anthropology,  psychology,  and  sociology,  NSF
is  the  predominant  or  exclusive  source  of  federal  basic  research  support.  The  SBE
budget  for  FY08  is  approximately  $220  million,  making  it  the  second  smallest  re-
search directorate at NSF. Fifteen percent of SBE’s budget is used not for basic re-
search  but  to  fund  the  collection  and  analysis  of  data  on  science  and  engineering
research,  education  and  workforce  trends  (including  the  data  presented  here),  re-
sulting in the biannual ‘‘S&E Indicators.’’

NIH  funds  both  very  basic  research,  such  as  that  of  Dr.  Barrett,  and  research-
based interventions such as those designed by Dr. Jemmott. NIH also supports most
health  economics  research,  such  as  that  carried  out  by  Dr.  Kenkel.  NIH’s  Office  of
Behavioral  and  Social  Sciences  Research  (OBSSR),  created  by  Congress  in  1993,
serves  as  a  coordinating  and  policy  development  office  for  research  across  NIH’s
many institutes, rather than funding research directly. OBSSR also serves as NIH’s
focal  point  for  coordination  of  social  and  behavioral  research  agendas  with  other
agencies, including NSF. Staff at both NSF and NIH report having a close and pro-
ductive working relationship. Occasionally the agencies issue joint solicitations, such
as a current solicitation in computational neuroscience.

5. Public Health Applications of Social and Behavioral Sciences

NSF  does  not  explicitly  fund  health  research,  but  it  does  fund  basic  research  on
human behavior as it relates to biological and social phenomena. For example, NSF
funds  medical  anthropologists  who  study  the  distribution  of  genes  in  a  particular
region  as  it  relates  to  the  prevalence  of  a  certain  disease,  and  cognitive
neuroscientists  who  study  aspects  of  brain  function  relevant  to  autism.  NIH  funds
social and behavioral research with direct public health applications, such as reduc-
ing  tobacco  use,  improving  mental  health,  preventing  obesity  and  slowing  the  HIV/
AIDS epidemic.

One  of  the  biggest  public  health  stories  of  the  20th  century  is  the  reduction  in
tobacco  use  and  smoking-related  diseases.  Behavioral  and  social  science  research
helped shape policies to stop kids from taking up smoking, and interventions to help
those  already  addicted  to  quit.  According  to  the  Centers  for  Disease  Control  and
Prevention, the portion of Americans who smoke dropped from 42.4 percent in 1965
to  20.8  percent  in  2007.  However,  cigarette  smoking  remains  the  leading  prevent-
able cause of death in the United States, accounting for approximately one of every
five  deaths  (438,000  people)  each  year.2 The  economic  costs  associated  with  smok-
ing-related  illnesses  are  estimated  to  be  $165  billion  in  health  care  and  disability.
As  biomedical  and  clinical  researchers  continue  to  develop  understanding  of  dis-
ease  mechanisms  and  develop  effective  pharmaceutical  therapies,  social  and  behav-
ioral  scientists  continue  to  elucidate  the  role  of  social  and  behavioral  factors  in
health  and  illness.  The  research  community,  however,  has  moved  beyond  genes  or
environment  arguments  about  physical  and  mental  health  to  studying  how  genes
and  environment  interact  in  complex  ways  to  produce  behavioral  and  health  out-
comes. As such, there is an increasing need for these disparate research and practi-
tioner communities to break down disciplinary and cultural barriers to advance pub-
lic health and well being.

6. Questions for Witnesses

Two of the witnesses in this hearing carry out the basic behavioral and economics
research.  One  of  the  witnesses  uses  theories  based  on  research  to  design  interven-

1 Data are based on self-reporting by agencies. In many cases, especially where there is inter-
disciplinary work, it is hard to tally exact dollars spent on one field or another, so these values
are at best an estimate.

2 http://www.cdc.gov/tobacco/data¥statistics/fact¥sheets/adult¥data/

adult¥cig¥smoking.htm

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

5

tions to stem the spread of HIV/AIDS among urban youth. A fourth witness studies
the relationship between spirituality and health. All of the witnesses were asked to
testify  about  the  nature  of  their  own  research  and  its  significance  to  public  health
policy. They were also asked about the increasing role of collaborations between be-
havioral  scientists,  biomedical  scientists  and  public  health  practitioners  to  advance
public  health,  and  the  role  of  the  Federal  Government  in  fostering  such  collabora-
tions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

6

Chairman  BAIRD.  Good  morning.  Thank  you  all  being  here  for
another  of  this  committee’s  series  of  hearings  on  the  role  of  social
sciences  and  helping  to  meet  some  of  the  grand  challenges  facing
our country today. This is the third in a series. We have previously
had  an  operable  hearing  on  social  sciences  as  they  impact  energy
policy and practices, then we had one on defense issues and its ap-
plications there.

Today  we  look  at  one  of  the  other  great  challenges  facing  our
country, and that is health care. Our nation faces a triple challenge
of  access,  cost,  and  outcome.  We  have  45  to  47  million  Americans
with  no  health  insurance.  We  spend  more  per  capita  than  any
other  country  on  Earth  on  health  care  and  yet  our  outcomes  are
not what they ought to be, and a great number of illnesses are fair-
ly  preventable,  and  a  vast  amount  of  our  spending  nationwide  is
related  to  behaviorally-influenced  illnesses,  either  the  behavior  di-
rectly  caused  the  illness  or  they  can  exacerbate  the  impact  or  be-
havioral  factors  can  impede  the  treatment  process.  And  this  in-
cludes  everything  on  the  causal  part,  it  includes  everything  from
smoking to some degree of obesity.

On  the  treatment  side  behavioral  interventions  have  been  im-
mensely  helpful  in  helping  us  address  things  like  adherence  to
chemotherapy  regimes  or  in  the  case  of,  for  example,  tuberculosis,
drug  adherence,  medication  adherence.  These  are  absolutely  crit-
ical.

And  so  we  believe  as  a  former  social  scientist  myself,  that  if  we
want  to  solve  some  of  these  health  care  problems,  the  social  sci-
entists  have  an  absolutely  essential  role  to  play  in  that,  and  we
have witnesses today who will share a diverse perspective on that.
In a moment I am going to acknowledge my dear friend and col-
league,  Dr.  Vern  Ehlers,  for  opening  remarks.  We  also  have  Dr.
Roscoe  Bartlett  with  us  here  today,  and  Eddie  Bernice  Johnson  is
here as well.

Before  we  do,  though,  I  want  to  acknowledge  a  Member  of  the
Science  Committee  staff.  Jim  Wilson  is  retiring  at  the  end  of  this
year. I think this will be our last hearing before this committee, so
hence,  perhaps,  Jim’s  last  hearing.  He  is  probably  wiping  away
tears as I speak. Jim has been on the professional staff of the Com-
mittee  since  1987.  He  invented  the  Internet,  the  Blackberry,  and
a host of other modern devices.

Jim  received  his  BS,  MS,  and  Ph.D.  degrees  in  aerospace  engi-
neering from West Virginia University, completed the Senior Man-
ager’s  in  Government  Program  at  Harvard’s  Kennedy  School  of
Government.  He  previously  managed  research  programs  in  fluid
dynamics  at  the  Air  Force  Office  of  Scientific  Research  in  Wash-
ington,  DC,  and  served  as  an  officer  in  the  U.S.  Air  Force  at  the
Flight Dynamics Laboratory at Wright Patterson Air Force Base in
Ohio.  Then  he  decided  to  do  something  with  his  life  and  came  to
work for us here at the staff.

He  has  done  an  outstanding  job.  He  is  a  good  friend  and  has
been a great public servant, and I just want to express my personal
appreciation, and Jim, we have a small token of that. This is a flag
which  we  took  to  Antarctica,  and  this  has  actually  been  to  the
South Pole and around the South Pole, so it has been in every time

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

7

zone.  That  is  an  easy  trip.  You  just  walk  around.  But,  Jim,  please
accept this with our gratitude for many years of service.
[The prepared statement of Chairman Baird follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CHAIRMAN BRIAN BAIRD

Good morning and welcome to this Research and Science Education Subcommittee
hearing on the role that social, behavioral and economic sciences play in improving
our nation’s health and well being and reducing the economic burden of health care.
This  happens  to  be  the  very  last  scheduled  hearing  before  the  Science  and  Tech-
nology  Committee  this  year.  It  seems  fitting,  as  we  are  in  the  midst  of  a  heated
campaign  season  in  which  skyrocketing  health  care  costs  are  a  hot  topic,  that  we
highlight  an  aspect  of  health  care  that  gets  too  little  attention  from  the  research
and medical communities and government alike: prevention.

We  have  a  health  care  system  that  discourages  doctors  from  spending  time  on
preventative  care.  I  don’t  think  this  committee  is  going  to  solve  that  problem.  But
we will look today at the choices that individuals make, and what researchers know
about  how  and  why  we  make  those  choices  and  how  public  policy  might  be  shaped
to help influence those choices to the benefit of both ourselves and society.

Each  of  us  decides  whether  to  smoke,  to  exercise,  to  cook  at  home  or  stop  at  the
nearest  fast  food  joint.  Most  if  not  all  of  us  in  this  room  are  pretty  lucky.  We  are
blessed  with  a  good  education,  good  health  insurance  and  a  well-paying  job.  We
have  all  of  the  tools  and  resources  we  need  to  make  the  healthy  choice  every  time,
but  we  still  engage  in  unhealthy  behaviors.  Access  to  information  and  resources  is
not the sum of what influences our decisions.

Take  smoking.  After  decades  of  an  aggressive  public  anti-smoking  campaign,  the
overall  rate  of  smoking  in  the  U.S.  decreased  by  one-half  to  21  percent.  I  imagine
there are few teenagers in the U.S. who haven’t had it drilled into them that smok-
ing can kill. Yet, according to the CDC, each day approximately 4,000 kids between
the  ages  of  12  and  17  years  initiate  cigarette  smoking.  Social,  behavioral  and  eco-
nomics  research  did  and  continues  to  shape  effective  anti-smoking  policies  and  to
provide  insight  into  why  some  efforts  have  fallen  short.  This  is  first  and  foremost
about  the  health  and  well  being  of  individual  Americans.  But  it  is  also  about  the
cost to our society. Smoking alone can be blamed for approximately $165 billion per
year in health care and disability costs.

Of  course  our  health  is  not  governed  entirely  by  our  behavior.  Even  those  of  us
with  the  healthiest  habits  can  be  struck  by  a  physical  or  mental  illness  that  re-
quires treatment. How do we respond to such challenges? Do we have the tools, and
do  our  doctors  have  the  tools  to  help  us  combat  depression  for  example,  whether  it
comes  on  out  of  the  blue  or  in  response  to  a  major  illness  or  trauma?  They  say  a
healthy  body  makes  a  healthy  mind.  The  inverse  is  equally  true.  Yet  it  is  only  in
the  last  decade  or  two  that  researchers  are  seriously  exploring  the  mind-body  con-
nection. Another important and recent advance is that increasingly, clinicians, biolo-
gists  and  behavioral  scientists  are  joining  forces  to  answer  the  question:  how  do
genes and environment interact, rather than making it an either/or proposition.

The  panel  before  us  is  engaged  in  some  exciting  work,  ranging  from  very  basic
research  on  emotions  to  design  of  theory-based  interventions  to  stop  the  spread  of
HIV/AIDS.  I  thank  all  of  the  witnesses  for  being  here  this  morning  and  I  look  for-
ward to your testimony.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Vern,  I  recognize  my  dear  friend,  Dr.  Ehlers.
Mr. EHLERS. Thank you for yielding. I would just like to add my
accolades.  I  have  worked  with  Jim  for  a  number  of  years.  He  has
always been imminently fair, very thorough, and very capable. And
we are certainly going to miss him. The only puzzle I have had con-
stantly after all my great intelligent conversations with him is how
he  ended  up  being  a  Democrat.  But  that  may  be  a  partisan  point
of  view.  But,  Jim,  we  really  appreciate  your  work,  and  we  are  all
going to miss you. Thank you.

Chairman  BAIRD.  When  you  look  at  Jim’s  resume,  those  of  us
who  are  Members  of  Congress  may  not  be  rocket  scientists,  but
some of our staff are. And that is very nice.
Thank you for your remarks, Dr. Ehlers.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

8

With  that  I  am  pleased  to  recognize  Dr.  Ehlers  for  an  opening

statement.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Today’s  hearing  will
delve  into  the  public  health  implications  of  social  science  research
and its application. Preventing disease and premature death is the
underlying  goal  of  the  marriage  between  public  health  and  the  so-
cial sciences, and the impacts of this research are substantial.

And  I  must  confess,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  recognize  we  have  had  all
these  hearings  because  you  are  a  social  scientist,  but  you  have
done  us  a  service  because  all  the  different  hearings  we  have  had
this  year  have  certainly  opened  my  eyes  to  the  power  and  useful-
ness  and  the  social  sciences  in  many  different  areas.  So  I  thank
you for holding all these hearings.

The  Social  Behavior  and  Economics  Directorate  at  the  National
Science  Foundation  provides  support  for  the  fundamental  research
that  underpins  many  of  today’s  public  health  interventions.  In  ad-
dition  to  studying  the  science  of  the  brain  NSF  works  to  integrate
the  microscopic  with  the  macroscopic  actions  of  our  day-to-day
lives.

In  many  ways  the  social  sciences  face  similar  challenges  as  the
physical sciences do in bringing an innovative idea from the labora-
tory  to  the  marketplace.  Humans  are  such  dynamic  characters,
particularly  when  it  comes  through  their  own  health,  that  the  sci-
entists before us must juggle many different variables. Conducting
gold-standard  research  projects  with  human  subjects  certainly
poses  unique  challenges.  Understanding  the  root  causes  of  human
behavior  and  emotion  will  assist  lawmakers  in  crafting  effective
public health policy.

I  appreciate  the  work  of  the  Chairman  and  staff  on  this  series
of  hearings  which  have  educated  Members  and  the  public  about
how  social  science  research  is  impacting  human  behavior,  energy,
national security, and today perhaps the most important topic, how
it  affects  our  health.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses
today  about  the  research  in  these  areas,  and  I  thank  you  all  for
your attention.

[The prepared statement of Mr. Ehlers follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF REPRESENTATIVE VERNON J. EHLERS

Today’s hearing will delve into the public health implications of social science re-
search  and  its  application.  Preventing  disease  and  premature  death  is  the  under-
lying  goal  of  the  marriage  between  public  health  and  the  social  sciences,  and  the
impacts of this research are substantial.

The Social, Behavioral and Economics directorate at the National Science Founda-
tion  (NSF)  provides  support  for  the  fundamental  research  that  underpins  many  of
today’s public health interventions. In addition to studying the science of the brain,
NSF  works  to  integrate  the  microscopic  with  the  macroscopic  actions  of  our  day-to-
day  lives.  In  many  ways,  the  social  sciences  face  similar  challenges  as  the  physical
sciences  do  in  bringing  an  innovative  idea  from  the  laboratory  to  the  marketplace.
Humans  are  such  dynamic  characters,  particularly  when  it  comes  to  their  own
health,  that  the  scientists  before  us  must  juggle  many  different  variables.  Con-
ducting  ‘‘gold  standard’’  research  projects  with  human  subjects  certainly  poses
unique  challenges.  Understanding  the  root  causes  of  human  behavior  and  emotion
will assist lawmakers in crafting effective public health policy.

I  appreciate  the  work  of  the  Chairman  and  his  staff  on  this  series  of  hearings  in
the 110th Congress, which have educated Members and the public about how social
science research is impacting human behavior as it relates to energy, national secu-
rity, and, today, our health.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  today  about  their  research  in  the

social sciences. Thank you for your attendance.

9

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Dr. Ehlers. If there are other Mem-
bers who wish to submit additional opening statements, your state-
ments  will  be  added  to  the  record  at  this  point,  and  at  this  time
I would like to introduce our distinguished witnesses.

Dr. Lisa Feldman Barrett is a Professor of Psychology and Direc-
tor  of  the  Interdisciplinary  Affective  Science  Laboratory  at  Boston
College with Appointments at Harvard Medical School and Massa-
chusetts General Hospital. Dr. John B. Jemmott, III, is Kenneth B.
Clark  Professor  of  Communication  at  the  Annenberg  School  of
Communication  and  a  Professor  of  Communication  in  Psychiatry
and Director of the Center for Health Behavior and Communication
Research, and the Department of Psychiatry at the School of Medi-
cine at the University of Pennsylvania.

Dr. Donald S. Kenkel is Professor of Policy Analysis and Manage-
ment  in  the  College  of  Human  Ecology  at  Cornell  University,  and
Dr.  Harold  G.  Koenig  is  a  Professor  of  Psychiatry  and  Behavioral
Sciences  and  Associate  Professor  of  Medicine  and  Director  of  the
Center  for  Theology,  Spirituality,  and  Health  at  Duke  University.
As our witnesses know, we spoke briefly before, their spoken tes-
timony  is  limited  to  five  minutes  each  for  your  initial  comments,
and  after  that  Members  of  the  Committee  will  have  five  minutes
each  to  ask  questions.  We  are  grateful  for  your  years  of  research
and  contribution  and  that  you  would  take  the  time  from  certainly
busy schedules to join us today.

With that we will, we have been joined, I should mention by Dr.
Lipinski and thank you. And we will start with Dr. Barrett, please.
STATEMENT OF DR. LISA FELDMAN BARRETT, PROFESSOR OF
PSYCHOLOGY;  DIRECTOR  OF  THE  INTERDISCIPLINARY  AF-
FECTIVE  SCIENCE  LABORATORY,  BOSTON  COLLEGE;  AP-
POINTMENTS  AT  HARVARD  MEDICAL  SCHOOL  AND  MASSA-
CHUSETTS GENERAL HOSPITAL
Dr.  BARRETT.  Congressman  Baird,  you  and  your  colleagues  de-
serve  our  deepest  thanks  for  encouraging  NIH  to  support  basic  re-
search  in  the  social  and  behavioral  sciences.  My  colleagues  and  I
are  very  grateful  for  your  efforts,  and  I  very  much  appreciate  the
opportunity to speak with you today.

Seven  years  ago  when  the  Twin  Towers  collapsed,  people  had
many  reactions.  I  would  like  to  read  two  to  you.  One  person  said,
‘‘My  first  reaction  was  terrible  sadness  but  then  came  anger,  be-
cause  I  couldn’t  do  anything  with  the  sadness.’’  A  second  person
said,  ‘‘I  felt  a  bunch  of  things  I  couldn’t  put  my  finger  on,  maybe
anger, confusion, fear. I just felt bad.’’

These examples demonstrate a phenomenon that I discovered al-
most 20 years ago. Some people feel the heat of anger, they feel the
despair of sadness, they feel the dread of fear. Other people use the
same  words,  but  they  feel,  for  lack  of  a  better  word,  bad.  Same
words, different feelings.

Over  a  10-year  period  my  lab  found  that  people  like  the  first
speaker  who  have  emotional  expertise  are  more  flexible  in  regu-
lating  their  emotions.  They  are  more  centered,  they  are  less  buf-
feted by the slings and arrows of life than the second speaker.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

10

These  basic  research  findings  have  now  been  translated  into
emotional  literacy  programs  for  children,  teachers,  and  school  ad-
ministrators. By the end of next year 250 schools in the New York
System  alone  will  participate,  and  the  results  are  already  clear.
Children who can identify, understand, and label their emotions ef-
fectively  have  fewer  clinical  symptoms,  they  are  at  lower  risks  for
violent behavior, and for drug and alcohol abuse. They have better
social skills, they have stronger leadership skills, and perhaps most
surprisingly,  they  have  higher  scores,  grades,  in  math,  science,
reading, and so on, meaning that emotional literacy must be a cen-
tral piece of educational reforms like No Child Left Behind.

These  are  welcome  outcomes,  especially  given  the  recent
UNICEF report showing that U.S. children have the second lowest
well-being scores across 21 developed nations.

Now,  emotional  literacy  isn’t  just  about  happiness.  Emotionally-
intelligent  children  turn  into  the  skilled  and  productive  workforce
of tomorrow, which translates into an increase in the gross domes-
tic product. And emotional literacy has the potential to play a role
in addressing some of the Nation’s most pressing problems. For ex-
ample,  anecdotal  evidence  shows  that  regardless  of  people’s  plans,
they  often  decide  to  retire  on  the  spur  of  the  moment  after,  let  us
say, a particularly bad day at the office.

So instead of retiring at age 67, when they should, or at age 65,
when  they  planned  to,  they  retire  on  average  at  age  63.  By  teach-
ing people emotional literacy when they are adults, we may be able
to  prevent  that  bad  day  at  the  office  from  causing  them  to  retire
early,  allowing  people  more  financial  security  and  saving  the  gov-
ernment  substantially  in  Social  Security  and  health  care  benefits.
From a purely scientific standpoint the discovery that not every-
body  feels  anger  or  sadness  or  fear  has  ignited  a  literal  paradigm
shift  in  the  study  of  emotion.  We  now  know  that  emotions  are  not
simple  reflexes  that  are  flipped  on  like  a  light  switch  in  certain
parts  of  the  brain,  which  is  why  there  is  no  single  pill  that  cures
depression, and there is no single gene that controls happiness.

The  exact  nature  of  emotion  is  now  the  topic  of  heated  debate
and furious research, and the history of science teaches us that key
scientific  discoveries  are  made  during  such  times.  At  the  frontiers
of  science  nothing  speeds  scientific  progress  like  the  clash  of  com-
peting viewpoints. This may not be comfortable, and it is certainly
not cheap, but it is absolutely necessary.

Science is like a food chain, with basic research at the base, feed-
ing translational research, which feeds applied research, and so on.
Without  this  healthy  base  the  entire  ecosystem  becomes  weak  and
can’t  survive.  Basic  research  in  the  social  and  behavioral  sciences,
you know, surprisingly, it may sound surprising to say this, is real-
ly  being  starved  in  America,  and  without  the  basic  research  today
there will be no critical health solutions for tomorrow.

It  takes  time  for  basic  science  to  feed  solutions,  often  decades.
Scientific  discovery  is  like  slowly  peeling  an  onion,  while  exploring
one question, other, more nuanced questions, are revealed beneath.
This  means  that  you  can’t  run  science  like  you  run  on  a  business
model  where  you  set  a  tangible  goal  and  try  to  meet  it  on  a  strict
timeline of five years.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

11

Because  the  neuroscientist  who  discovered  that  canary  brains
grow  new  cells  after  birth  wasn’t  trying  to  solve  the  puzzle  of
human  mental  illness.  Social  scientists  who  studied  the  evils  of
conformity  after  World  War  II  weren’t  trying  to  keep  people  from
using  drugs  and  alcohol,  and  my  own  research  on  emotion  wasn’t
originally targeted at helping children read better or helping retir-
ees  decide,  you  know,  when  is  the  financially  right  time  to  decide.
Regardless  of  the  goals  that  motivated  my  basic  research  or  any
basic  research  in  the  first  place,  it  is  simply  a  fact  that  this  re-
search is necessary to achieve the critical, and often surprising, re-
sults that help people live healthier and more productive lives.

[The prepared statement of Dr. Feldman Barrett follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF LISA FELDMAN BARRETT

Abstract

People differ markedly in their emotional expertise. Many people, but not all, feel
the heat of anger, the despair of sadness, the dread of fear. Some instead experience
amorphous feelings that are either pleasant or unpleasant. This basic research find-
ing  has  been  translated  into  emotional  literacy  training  programs  with  proven
health,  economic,  and  educational  benefits.  It  also  illustrates  how  basic  research  in
the  social  and  behavioral  sciences  allows  people  to  live  healthier  and  more  produc-
tive lives.

Thank you for the opportunity to speak with you today. I run an interdisciplinary
lab  where  we  study  the  very  basic  nature  of  emotion,  from  both  the  standpoint  of
the psychologist (who measures behavior) and the neuroscientist (who measures the
brain).  Today,  I’ll  wear  my  psychologist’s  hat  and  tell  you  the  story  of  a  single  sci-
entific discovery that is already improving the lives of Americans. It is also a prom-
ising  lead  to  solving  some  of  the  country’s  most  pressing  public  health  issues,  and
illustrates  the  value  of  basic  research  in  making  a  healthier  and  more  productive
nation.

Seven  years  ago,  when  the  twin  towers  collapsed,  people  had  many  reactions.
Here  are  just  two.  One  person  said  ‘‘The  first  reaction  was  terrible  sadness  and
tears . . .. But the second reaction is anger, because you can’t do anything with the
sadness.’’ Another said ‘‘I felt a bunch of things I couldn’t put my finger on. Maybe
anger,  confusion,  fear.  I  just  felt  bad  on  September  11th.  Really  bad.’’  These  exam-
ples  demonstrate  a  phenomenon  about  emotion  that  I  discovered  fifteen  years  ago.
When I was in graduate school, I noticed something curious in my psychotherapy
patients. Some people used emotion words to refer to very precise and distinct expe-
riences—they felt the heat of anger, the despair of sadness, the dread of fear. Others
used the words ‘‘anger,’’ ‘‘sadness,’’ and ‘‘fear’’ interchangeably, as if they did not ex-
perience  these  states  as  different  from  one  another.  They  felt,  for  lack  of  a  better
word,  ‘‘bad.’’  Outside  the  therapy  room,  I  saw  the  same  thing  in  friends  and  family
and students. This observation was the basis for a decade-long research project (sup-
ported  by  both  NSF  and  NIH)  where  my  lab  tracked  the  emotional  experience  of
over 700 people during the course of everyday life using a then-novel scientific pro-
cedure  called  computerized  experience-sampling  (www.experience-sampling.org).
Using  novel  software  and  statistical  procedures,  we  made  an  important  discovery:
people  differ  in  their  emotional  expertise.  Some  people,  as  in  the  first  example,  are
emotion  experts  and  experience  a  wide  variety  of  nuanced  emotions,  in  much  the
same way that a wine expert can distinguish the type of wine as well as its vineyard
and vintage. Other people, like the second example, experience emotion as an amor-
phous feeling that is either pleasant or unpleasant, just like wine novices who can’t
tell  much  more  than  whether  a  wine  is  red  or  white.  Over  a  ten-year  period,  my
lab  discovered  that  differences  in  emotional  expertise  translate  to  important  out-
comes.  Emotion  connoisseurs  are  more  flexible  in  regulating  their  emotions.  They
are  more  centered,  and  less  buffeted  by  slings  and  arrows  of  life.  Those  with  less
emotional  expertise,  by  contrast,  live  life  as  turbulent  roller  coaster  with  more  ups
and downs.

These  basic  research  findings  are  now  being  translated  into  emotional  literacy
training programs for children (ages four to fourteen), teachers, and school adminis-
trators  (see  www.ei-schools.org).  By  the  end  of  next  year,  250  schools  in  the  New
York  school  system  alone  will  participate,  and  already  the  results  are  promising.
Children who can identify, understand, label, and regulate their emotions effectively

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

12

have  fewer  clinical  symptoms,  and  are  at  lower  risk  for  violent  behavior  and  drug
and alcohol abuse. They have better social skills, and stronger leadership skills. Per-
haps  most  surprisingly,  hundreds  of  studies  show  that  emotionally  intelligent  chil-
dren have higher grades in math, science, and reading, meaning that emotional lit-
eracy must be included in educational reforms like No Child Left Behind. These are
welcome  outcomes,  especially  given  the  recent  UNICEF  report  showing  that  U.S.
children have the second-lowest rate of well-being across 21 developed nations.

But  emotional  expertise  isn’t  just  about  happiness—it  translates  into  economic
stability  and  productivity  for  our  country.  The  emotionally  intelligent  children  of
today  become  the  skilled  and  productive  adults  of  tomorrow.  In  a  recent  forum  on
children’s  education,  the  noted  economist  and  Nobel  Laureate  James  Heckman  ar-
gued  that  social  and  emotional  expertise  is  necessary  to  improve  the  quality  of  the
American  workforce.  A  happier  and  socially  skilled  workforce  translates  into  an  in-
crease in the Gross Domestic Product.

Emotional expertise will even play a role in addressing some of the Nation’s most
pressing problems. For example, emotional literacy may help to prevent early retire-
ment  in  adults,  which  costs  the  government  significantly  in  social  security  and
health  care  benefits.  Anecdotal  evidence  shows  that,  regardless  of  their  plans,  peo-
ple  often  decide  to  retire  on  the  spur  of  the  moment,  say,  after  a  particularly  bad
day  in  the  office.  So  instead  of  retiring  at  age  67  (when  they  should),  or  age  65
(when  they  plan  to),  they  retire,  on  average,  at  age  63.  By  teaching  emotional  lit-
eracy  to  adults,  we  can  prevent  that  bad  day  from  causing  them  to  retire  early,  al-
lowing  people  more  financial  security  and  saving  the  government  a  lot  of  money  in
the process.

From  a  purely  scientific  standpoint,  the  discovery  that  not  everyone  feels  anger
or  sadness  or  fear  has  helped  to  ignite  a  paradigm  shift  in  the  study  of  emotion.
Emotions  used  to  be  thought  of  as  simple  reflexes  or  light  switches  that  turn  on
parts  of  your  brain,  and  that  could  be  turned  off  by  a  drug  or  changing  the  right
gene.  But  we  now  know  that’s  not  the  case,  which  is  why  there’s  no  pill  that  cures
depression, and no single gene that controls happiness. The exact nature of emotion
is  now  the  topic  of  heated  debate  and  furious  research,  and  the  history  of  science
teaches  us  that  key  scientific  discoveries  are  made  during  such  times.  At  the  fron-
tiers  of  science,  nothing  speeds  scientific  progress  like  the  clash  of  competing  view-
points. This may not be comfortable, or cheap, but it is absolutely necessary.

Science is like a food chain, with basic research at the base, feeding translational
research,  which  feeds  applied  research,  which  can  be  used  by  service  providers.
Without  a  healthy  base,  however,  the  entire  ecosystem  becomes  weak  and  cannot
survive.  Basic  research  in  social  and  behavioral  sciences  is  being  starved  in  Amer-
ica. And without this basic research today, there will be no critical health solutions
for tomorrow.

It  takes  time  for  basic  science  to  feed  applied  solutions.  In  genetics  or  pharma-
cology,  the  life  cycle  is  of  discovery  is  usually  several  decades.  Scientific  discovery
is  like  slowly  peeling  an  onion—while  exploring  one  question,  other,  more  nuanced
questions  are  revealed  beneath  (and  sometimes,  a  lot  of  tears  are  shed  along  the
way).  But  here  in  the  social  and  behavioral  sciences,  a  basic  finding  about  emotion
was  translated  after  only  15  years—a  relatively  quick  outcome  for  science,  but  one
that serves both public health and the public treasury.

Science is about exploration, risk, and discovery. This means that you cannot run
scientific  discovery  like  a  business,  where  you  set  a  tangible  goal  and  try  to  meet
it  on  a  strict  timeline.  A  seemingly  trivial,  everyday  occurrence  or  a  very  abstract
idea  can,  upon  closer  inspection,  open  up  a  new  scientific  vista.  The  neuroscientist
who  discovered  that  canary  brains  grow  new  cells  after  birth  wasn’t  trying  to  solve
the  puzzle  of  human  mental  illness.  The  physicists  who  discovered  quantum  me-
chanics were not trying to build a better computer. Social scientists who studied the
evils  of  conformity  after  World  War  II  weren’t  trying  to  keep  people  from  using
drugs.  And  my  own  research  on  emotion  wasn’t  originally  targeted  at  helping  chil-
dren  and  retirees,  but  in  the  end,  this  is  where  it  has  led.  Regardless  of  the  goals
that  motivate  basic  research  in  the  first  place,  it  is  simply  a  fact  such  research  is
necessary  to  achieve  the  critical,  and  often  surprising,  results  that  help  people  live
healthier and more productive lives.

Congressman  Baird,  you  and  your  colleague  Congressman  Kennedy  deserve  a  lot
of credit for encouraging NIH to provide a better infrastructure to support basic re-
search in the social and behavioral sciences. I know I speak for my colleagues when
I  say  that  we  are  all  very  grateful  for  your  efforts.  I  myself  am  fortunate  that  my
laboratory is well supported by federal funding agencies at the moment. In the con-
text  of  today’s  hearing,  however,  this  funding  success  is  a  bit  misleading,  because
the  majority  of  it  pays  for  the  neuro-imaging  side  of  my  research  on  emotion.  Like
many labs around the country, my lab is also struggling to move our social and be-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

13

havioral research forward. For the social and behavioral sciences to realize their full
potential  in  the  service  of  this  country’s  health  and  well-being,  labs  like  my  own
need four things to succeed: a well-trained scientific workforce of sufficient expertise
and diversity, more advanced technology that is suited to the scientific questions we
want  to  ask  (whether  or  not  they  have  an  applied  value  that  is  immediately  obvi-
ous), an adequate level of research funds to see our best ideas (and perhaps riskiest)
forward,  and  open  minds  that  are  not  mired  in  the  habits  or  agendas  of  the  past.

BIOGRAPHY FOR LISA FELDMAN BARRETT

Lisa Feldman Barrett, Ph.D., is currently Professor of Psychology and Director of
the  Interdisciplinary  Affective  Science  Laboratory  at  Boston  College,  with  appoint-
ments at Harvard Medical School and Massachusetts General Hospital. Dr. Barrett
received  her  Ph.D.  in  clinical  psychology  in  1992,  and  has  since  received  additional
training  in  social  and  personality  psychology,  psychophysiology,  cognitive  science,
neuroanatomy, and cognitive neuroscience. Her research focuses on very basic ques-
tion  of  what  emotions  are,  both  from  both  the  standpoint  of  the  psychologist  (who
measures behavior) and the neuroscientist (who measures the brain). Her work also
incorporates insights from philosophy, anthropology, and linguistics.

Dr.  Barrett  is  an  elected  Fellow  of  the  Association  for  Psychological  Science,  the
American Psychological Association, and the Society for Personality and Social Psy-
chology.  In  2007,  she  received  an  NIH  Director’s  Pioneer  Award  for  innovative  re-
search  on  emotion.  She  is  also  the  recipient  of  an  Independent  Scientist  Research
Award from the National Institute of Mental Health, a Career Trajectory Award in
Experimental  Social  Psychology,  the  James  McKeen  Cattell  Award,  and  an  Amer-
ican Philosophical Society Fellowship. Dr. Barrett has served as an elected member
to the governing boards of the International Society of Research on Emotion and the
Society for Experimental Social Psychology. For the past eight years, she has contin-
ually  served  on  grant  review  panels  for  either  the  National  Science  Foundation  or
the  National  Institutes  of  Health.  She  is  a  founding  Editor-in-Chief  of  the  journal
Emotion  Review,  and  sits  on  the  editorial  boards  of  top  tier  journals  in  both  psy-
chology and neuroscience.

Dr. Barrett’s lab has been continually funded by the National Science Foundation
since 1998. In addition to NSF funding, her lab currently receives support from the
NIH  Director’s  Pioneer  Award  program  in  the  National  Institute  of  General  Medi-
cine, the National Institute on Aging, and the Army Research Institute.

Dr.  Barrett  has  published  over  90  papers  and  chapters,  including  a  National  Re-
search  Council  white  paper  on  the  nature  of  emotion.  She  has  edited  three  books
on the science of emotion, including the current edition of the Handbook of Emotion.
She also wrote the current entry on emotion for World Book Encyclopedia.

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Dr. Barrett.
Dr. Jemmott.

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  JOHN  B.  JEMMOTT  III,  KENNETH  B.
CLARK  PROFESSOR  OF  COMMUNICATION;  PROFESSOR  OF
COMMUNICATION  IN  PSYCHIATRY;  DIRECTOR,  CENTER  FOR
HEALTH  BEHAVIOR  AND  COMMUNICATION  RESEARCH,  UNI-
VERSITY  OF  PENNSYLVANIA,  SCHOOL  OF  MEDICINE  AND
ANNENBERG SCHOOL FOR COMMUNICATION
Dr.  JEMMOTT.  I  am  very  happy  to  be  here  today  to  share  some
of the work that I have been doing over the past 20 years or so in
the  era  of  HIV  prevention,  conducting  a  program  of  research  that
is designed to identify the social psychological factors that underlie
HIV  risk-associated  behavior.  Once  you  identify  those  factors,  we
develop  interventions  that  are  based  on  theory  and  that  are  tai-
lored  to  the  population  to  try  to  change  their  behavior.  We  then
evaluate  those  intervention  strategies  using  rigorous  scientific
methods, usually a randomized control trial, which is the best way
to find out whether an intervention is effective.

Along  the  way  we  try  to  address  some  practical  questions  about
the  best  way  to  do  HIV  prevention.  This  might  be  questions  about
the race of the facilitator or the gender of the facilitator or the gen-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

14

der,  composition  of  the  group,  or  the  age  of  the  facilitator,  all  of
these practical question about how to do intervention.

Then  if  we  find  that  an  intervention  is  effective,  we  then  try  to
disseminate  it  to  people  who  can  actually  use  to,  go  beyond  pub-
lishing  it  in  journals  and  get  it  to  the  end  users.  Then  when  the
end users are using it, it leads to additional questions about wheth-
er it still works, and so we look at that as well.

In  our  research  we  found  that  two  of  the  key  characteristics  of
effective  interventions  is  one,  that  they  are  grounded  in  some  be-
havior change theory, some systematic understanding of human be-
havior.  And  second,  that  they  are  tailored  to  the  population,  and
this  is  usually  based  on  qualitative  research  with  that  population
so  you  can  understand  their  beliefs  and  the  context  in  which  the
behavior occurs.

This slide shows one of the theories that we use called the theory
of  planned  behavior.  So  it  is  a  model  of  behavior.  So  the  behavior
might  be  abstinence  or  it  could  be  condom  use,  and  we  basically
begin  at  the  behavior,  and  we  work  backwards  in  the  model.  We
identify  an  intention,  which  is  a  plan  to  engage  in  the  behavior.
The best predictor of a person’s behavior is a plan to do that behav-
ior.  And  then  we  look  at  different  types  of  beliefs  that  could  influ-
ence those behaviors.

And  those  beliefs  did  not  come  from  the  pages  of  academic  jour-
nals. They come from our target population through qualitative re-
search.  We  ask  them  what  they  believe.  Then  once  we  have  their
beliefs,  we  then  try  to  develop  interventions  to  target  the  beliefs,
to change the beliefs in ways that are supportive of behavior.

So through a mediational change by affecting building the inter-
vention, affecting the beliefs, affects intentions and changes behav-
ior, and you can extend the model further to a health outcome such
as  sexually-transmitted  disease.  So  that  is  basically  how  our  re-
search is done.

Our measures of success are the outcomes in terms of sexual be-
haviors  related  to  HIV  infection;  abstinence,  condom  use,  and  lim-
iting  the  numbers  of  partners.  In  some  of  our  studies  we  are  also,
where  appropriate,  able  to  collect  biological  specimens  that  we  can
test  for  sexually-transmitted  diseases  such  as  chlamydia,  gonor-
rhea, herpes simplex. And because we want to understand why the
intervention works or why it didn’t work, we also look at mediator
variables,  the  beliefs  and  intentions  that  I  mentioned  earlier.  Be-
cause  if  the  intervention  worked,  we  want  to  know  which  beliefs
were actually responsible for the good outcome that we saw.

But  on  the  other  hand,  if  it  didn’t  work,  then  we  want  to  know
did  we,  in  fact,  change  the  beliefs  that  we  intended  to  change  and
also  if  we  did  change  them,  were  they  actually  related  to  the  be-
havior. And then in this way we can design better interventions in
the future.

We  also  look  at  the  participants  and  the  facilitators’  evaluations
of  the  intervention  because  that  is  important  in  terms  of  whether
it is practical and can be used in the real world.

We have developed a number of successful interventions, the first
five  that  you  see  listed  there  are  being  disseminated  now  by  the
Centers  for  Disease  Control,  and  we  have  two  others  that  are  effi-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

15

cacious that we hope to have disseminated soon, one of which is in
South Africa, where the HIV epidemic is having the largest impact.
In  terms  of  scaling  up,  there  are  a  number  of  issues  that  come
into  play  in  terms  of  whether  success  interventions  are  adopted.
Sometimes  they  are  not.  What  are  the  variables  that  affect  that?
Interventions  often  have  to  be  adapted,  which  means  changing
them,  and  so  the  question  is  if  you  change  it,  does  it  still  work?
So what kinds of adaptations are useful, and which ones are harm-
ful?

And then the third question is if it is efficacious in a randomized-
controlled  trial,  is  it  still  effective  when  it  is  used  by  teachers  in
schools  or  health  professionals  in  clinics?  And  so  researchers  are
required to look at effectiveness as well.

We  at  the  University  of  Pennsylvania  and  the  Behavioral
Sciences Cores, we cover a lot of different populations and research
in  a  variety  of  different  venues  that  I  will  not  be  able  to  go  into,
and we collaborate with people in other disciplines within the Cen-
ter,  in  immunology,  and  clinical  core  in  particular,  so  we  see  how
the  different  areas  of  science  work  together  with  social  science  to
address these health problems.

And I will stop here.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Jemmott follows:]
PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN B. JEMMOTT III

1. Please  describe  your  work  to  prevent  the  spread  of  HIV/AIDS  among
urban youth and other populations. What social and behavioral theories
underlie  your  research?  How  do  you  apply  those  theories  to  design  and
test interventions that may reduce risky behaviors in your target popu-
lations? What are your measures of success?
My  colleagues  and  I  have  been  conducting  a  program  of  HIV/STD  risk-reduction
research  in  urban  populations.  Our  research  program  has  several  objectives.  First,
we  seek  to  identify  the  social  psychological  factors  that  underlie  HIV/STD  risk  be-
havior.  Second,  we  seek  to  identify  theory-based  strategies  that  are  culturally  and
developmentally  appropriate.  Third,  we  evaluate  the  efficacy  of  those  strategies
using  scientifically  sound  methodology.  This  usually  involves  the  use  of  a  random-
ized  controlled  trial  in  which  participants  are  randomly  assigned  to  receive  the
intervention  or  to  a  control  condition.  A  randomized  controlled  trial  provides  the
most  scientifically  valid  evidence  for  the  efficacy  of  an  intervention.  Fourth,  we  ad-
dress  practical  questions  about  the  best  way  to  implement  HIV/STD  risk-reduction
interventions.  For  instance,  we  have  examined  whether  the  efficacy  of  an  interven-
tion  varies  depending  on  the  race  of  the  facilitator,  the  gender  of  the  facilitator,
whether the facilitator is a peer or an adult, and whether the intervention is imple-
mented in single-gender or mixed gender groups. Finally, if an intervention is found
to  be  efficacious,  we  seek  to  disseminate  it  so  that  it  is  available  to  providers  who
can  employ  it  to  curb  the  spread  of  HIV  among  their  clients.  This  also  leads  addi-
tional  research  questions  regarding  the  adaptation  of  evidence-based  interventions
to  new  settings  and  populations,  factors  affecting  the  adoption  of  interventions  by
service  providers,  and  factors  affecting  the  effectiveness  of  interventions  when  im-
plemented by service providers and in new settings or populations.

Our  research  as  been  funded  since  1988  by  the  National  Institute  of  Mental
(NIMH), the National Institute of Child Health and Human Development (NICHD),
the National Institute of Nursing Research (NINR), the Centers for Disease Control
and  Prevention  (CDC),  and  the  American  Foundation  for  AIDS  Research.  We  have
conduced  research  with  a  diversity  of  populations,  including  inner-city  African
American adolescents, African American parents and their adolescent children, Afri-
can  American  women  clinic  attendees,  African  American  and  Latino  adolescent  fe-
male clinic attendees, African American HIV serodiscordant couples where one part-
ner has HIV and the other does not, African American men who have sex with men
(MSM), middle class White college students, English-speaking and Spanish-speaking
Latino  adolescents,  Xhosa-speaking  South  African  adolescents,  and  Xhosa-speaking
South  African  men.  We  have  conducted  our  studies  in  a  variety  of  settings,  includ-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

16

ing schools, churches, universities, adolescent medicine clinics, women’s health clin-
ics,  community-based  organizations,  low-income  housing  developments,  and  neigh-
borhoods/communities.

To  address  the  problem  of  HIV/STD  in  any  society  requires  an  array  of  interven-
tions  that  can  be  implemented  in  a  variety  of  venues  by  different  kinds  of
facilitators.  Accordingly  our  research  has  developed  many  different  types  of  inter-
ventions.  A  contentious  debate  in  the  area  of  HIV  education  and  sex  education  for
adolescents has revolved around the extent to which interventions should emphasize
sexual abstinence as opposed to condom use. We have developed safer-sex interven-
tions  emphasizing  condom  use,  abstinence-only  interventions,  and  comprehensive
interventions  stressing  both  abstinence  and  condom  use.  Another  issue  has  been
whether peer educators are more effective than adult facilitators in changing adoles-
cents’ sexual behavior. We have developed both peer-led and adult-led interventions.
Most  of  our  interventions  have  involved  small  groups  of  participants  led  by  a
facilitator  or  a  pair  of  co-facilitators.  However,  we  have  also  developed  one-on-one
individual  interventions  for  certain  circumstances:  for  instance,  nurses  serving
women in a hospital clinic or service providers to African American MSM who may
conceal  their  involvement  with  men  and  consequently  would  be  unwilling  to  attend
a  small  group  intervention.  We  have  identified  several  efficacious  interventions,  in-
cluding  Be  Proud!  Be  Responsible!,  Making  Proud  Choices—a  Safer  Sex  Interven-
tion,  Making  a  Difference—an  Abstinence  Based  Approach,  Cuidate,  which  is  a
Latino-tailored  adaptation  of  Be  Proud!  Be  Responsible!,  Sister  to  Sister,  which  is
an intervention for African American women in clinical settings, Sisters Saving Sis-
ters, which is an intervention for African American and Latino adolescent girls, and
Let  Us  Protect  Our  Future,  which  is  an  intervention  for  South  African  adolescents.
Of  these  interventions,  Be  Proud!  Be  Responsible!,  Making  Proud  Choices,  Making
a Difference, Cuidate, and Sister to Sister have been included in dissemination ini-
tiatives of the CDC.

Our experiences in this area teaches that two key characteristics of effective HIV/
STD  risk-reduction  interventions  are  (a)  grounding  in  behavior  change  theory  and
(b)  tailoring  to  the  population  or  culture  served.  The  social  and  behavior  theories
that  we  have  employed  include  the  social  cognitive  theory  and  the  reasoned  action
approach, which includes the theory of reasoned action and its extension the theory
of  planned  behavior.  We  use  social  cognitive  theory  to  suggest  intervention  strate-
gies  to  achieve  behavior  change,  including  skill  building,  modeling,  reinforcement,
and  activities  to  build  self-efficacy.  We  use  the  reasoned  action  approach  to  help
identify  beliefs  that  should  be  targeted  by  the  interventions  to  achieve  behavior
change.  We  selected  the  reasoned  action  approach  because  it  can  be  tailored  to  a
variety  of  populations  and  cultures,  which  facilitates  the  development  of  contex-
tually appropriate interventions.

Consider the theory of planned behavior. Briefly, according to the theory, the best
predictor  of  a  specific  behavior  is  an  intention  or  plan  to  engage  in  the  behavior.
Although  it  is  understood  that  people  do  not  always  live  up  to  their  intentions,  if
a  person  does  not  plan  to  engage  in  a  behavior,  then  it  is  highly  unlike  that  he  or
she  will  engage  in  the  behavior.  Research  has  demonstrated  a  strong  longitudinal
relationship between intention and sexual behaviors, including condom use and ab-
stinence. The theory also suggests that a behavioral intention is determined by atti-
tude, subjective norm, and perceived behavioral control or self-efficacy regarding the
behavior.  Thus,  people  should  intend  to  use  condoms  if  they  evaluate  condom  use
positively,  if  they  believe  significant  others  think  they  should  use  condoms,  and  if
they feel confident in their ability to use condoms.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

17

A  valuable  feature  of  the  theory  of  planned  behavior  is  that  it  directs  attention
to  why  people  hold  specific  attitudes,  subjective  norms,  and  perceived  behavioral
control or self-efficacy. Behavioral beliefs about the consequences of engaging in the
behavior  determine  attitude  toward  using  them.  For  instance,  adolescents  may  be-
lieve  that  sexual  involvement  may  interfere  with  their  ability  to  achieve  their  edu-
cational  goals.  With  regard  to  condoms,  people  may  believe  that  if  they  use  a
condom,  their  risk  of  sexually  transmitted  HIV  infection  or  pregnancy  will  be  re-
duced.  On  the  other  hand,  they  may  believe  that  using  a  condom  would  interfere
with  sexual  enjoyment.  If  I  perceive  that  the  consequences  of  a  behavior  are  good,
then  I  am  more  likely  to  engage  in  the  behavior  than  if  I  perceive  that  the  con-
sequences  are  bad.  Normative  beliefs  about  important  referents’  approval  or  dis-
approval  of  the  behavior  determine  subjective  norm.  These  significant  referents
might  include  peers,  parents,  other  relatives,  church  members,  or  sexual  partners.
Adolescents  might  be  less  likely  to  initiate  sexual  involvement  if  they  understand
that their parents would strongly disapprove of their having sexual intercourse. On
the  other  hand,  it  may  be  difficult  for  adolescents  to  practice  sexual  abstinence  it
they believe that all of their friends approve of their having sexual intercourse. Con-
trol  beliefs  about  factors  that  facilitate  or  inhibit  condom  use  determine  perceived
behavioral  control  or  self-efficacy.  This  might  include  beliefs  about  the  availability
of  condoms.  If  people  are  embarrassed  to  purchase  or  carry  condoms  they  may  not
have  them  available  when  they  need  to  use  them.  Impulse  control  beliefs  concern
people’s  confidence  that  they  can  control  themselves  enough  to  use  condoms  when
sexually excited. Perhaps most emphasized in HIV prevention research are negotia-
tion beliefs, which concern the people’s confidence that they can persuade their sex-
ual partners to practice sexual abstinence or to use condoms. Technical skill beliefs
concern the people’s ability to use condoms correctly and without ruining the mood.
Several other factors may affect people’s sexual risk behavior, including prior sex-
ual  experiences,  race/ethnicity,  gender,  age,  poverty,  gender-role  beliefs,  parental
monitoring and supervision, parent-child communication, religiosity, and alcohol and
drugs use. According to the theory these are external variables. The effects on inten-
tion  and  behavior  of  variables  external  to  the  theory  are  seen  as  mediated  by  their
effects  on  the  attitudinal  component,  the  normative  component,  the  perceived  con-
trol  component,  or  all  three.  In  other  words,  external  variables,  including  an  inter-
vention, may affect variables that are a part of the theory and through a mediation
chain, influence behavior. For instance, gender-role beliefs may influence a woman’s
confidence that she can negotiate condom use with her partner and may thereby af-
fect  condom-use  intention  and  condom  use.  External  variables  may  also  moderate
an  intervention’s  efficacy.  For  instance,  girls  initiate  sex  at  an  older  age  than  do
boys,  and  girls  have  less  power  over  the  use  of  condoms  than  do  boys.  Accordingly,
gender  may  both  predict  sexual  debut  and  moderate  the  intervention’s  efficacy  in
increasing condom use.

Given  the  way  in  which  the  theory  explains  the  impact  of  external  variables,  the
theory  offers  a  clear  prescription  for  the  development  of  an  intervention.  We  could
design interventions to affect behavioral, normative, and control beliefs and through
a  mediation  process  influence  intention  and  the  targeted  behavior.  The  theory  also
suggested  a  strategy  for  identifying  the  relevant  beliefs:  namely,  target  the  salient
behavioral, normative, and control beliefs in the specific population. Researchers can
use qualitative research methods, including focus groups, key informant interviews,

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

18

and  elicitation  studies,  with  the  population  to  identify  the  salient  beliefs.  By  tar-
geting  salient  beliefs,  an  intervention  may  change  attitude,  subjective  norm,  and
perceived  self-efficacy,  which  would  change  intention,  which,  in  turn,  would  change
behavior.  Identifying  the  population-specific  salient  beliefs  serves  to  make  the  the-
ory and the resulting intervention appropriate for the population. Perhaps most im-
portant,  the  theory  suggested  that  the  relative  predictive  power  of  the  attitudinal,
normative, and control components of the theory could vary from population to pop-
ulation. Thus, the prediction of a behavioral intention might be different in middle-
class white college students as compared with low-income African American women
as  compared  with  African  American  MSM,  but  the  theory  might  have  predictive
value in each of these populations.

In  developing  our  interventions  we  have  conducted  several  phases  of  research.
First,  we  conduct  qualitative  research  with  the  population  or  culture,  not  only  to
identify the salient behavior, normative, and control beliefs regarding the behaviors
we  seek  to  change,  but  also  to  identify  the  contexts  in  which  the  behaviors  occurs.
An  understanding  of  the  context  is  essential  to  developing  an  intervention  that  is
appropriate to the population. For example, knowing that adolescents are more like-
ly to have sex when they are home can help researchers develop role-play scenarios
regarding  refusal  to  have  sex  that  seem  authentic  to  the  participants.  The  second
phase  of  research  is  to  develop  and  employ  a  questionnaire  to  confirm  that  the  sa-
lient  beliefs  identified  are,  in  fact,  related  to  the  behaviors  of  interest.  The  third
phase is to use the information from the first two phases to develop an intervention.
In other words, the qualitative information about the culture or population and the
quantitative information from the survey are integrated with the theoretical frame-
work  to  create  an  intervention  that  is  both  grounded  in  the  theory  and  tailored  to
the  population  or  culture.  The  fourth  phase  is  to  pilot  test  the  intervention,  collect
comments and criticisms from the participants and facilitators, and then design the
final  version  of  the  intervention.  The  fifth  phase  is  to  test  the  efficacy  of  the  inter-
vention.

Randomized controlled trials provide the most scientifically sound evidence for the
efficacy  of  an  intervention.  We  measure  the  success  of  our  efforts  to  develop  effica-
cious interventions by examining the quantitative and qualitative results of the ran-
domized  controlled  trials.  We  typically  have  three  specific  aims  in  testing  the  effi-
cacy  of  the  intervention.  First,  we  examine  whether  the  intervention  significantly
improved  sexual  behavior  outcomes,  including  abstinence,  condom  use,  unprotected
sexual  intercourse,  and  multiple  sexual  partners.  In  some  studies,  we  also  examine
whether  the  intervention  influenced  biological  outcomes,  that  is,  reduced  the  inci-
dence of sexually transmitted infections. A focus on STI is important because it pro-
vides an outcome measure that is objective and less likely to be influenced by a so-
cially  desirable  responding  by  research  participants.  In  addition,  it  provides  an  ac-
tual  health  outcome  for  the  intervention.  Typically,  our  second  aim  concerns  mod-
erators  of  intervention  efficacy:  namely,  whether  the  intervention  is  more  effective
with some participants as compared with others. For example, does the intervention
have a better effect on adolescent boys as compared with girls, virgins as compared
with  sexually  experienced  adolescents,  or  single  people  as  opposed  to  those  in  com-
mitted  relationships?  Or  perhaps  the  intervention  has  a  better  effect  when  imple-
mented in single-gender groups as compared with mixed gender groups or when the
facilitator  is  the  same  gender  as  the  participant.  A  third  aim  of  our  research  is  to
test  the  mediation  of  the  effects  of  the  intervention  on  behavior:  namely,  if  it
changes  behavior,  why  did  it  changed  behavior,  and  if  it  did  not  change  behavior,
why  it  failed  to  change  behavior.  This  is  very  important  to  future  research  to  im-
prove  the  intervention.  This  involves  examining  the  theoretical  mediators,  that  is,
the  beliefs  the  intervention  targeted.  Did  the  intervention  actually  have  an  impact
on  the  beliefs  it  was  designed  to  change?  Were  the  beliefs  related  to  the  behavior
we sought to change? By conducting this kind of mediation analysis a better under-
standing  of  why  the  intervention  worked  or  did  not  work  will  emerge.  Thus,  we
measure  our  success  by  examining  whether  the  intervention  changed  behavior,
whether  it  was  more  efficacious  with  some  participants  or  under  certain  cir-
cumstances, and why it was or was not efficacious.

Here are some examples of studies we have conducted. In each study, we followed
the  five  phases  mentioned  earlier  in  developing  and  testing  the  interventions.  One
randomized  controlled  trial  tested  the  efficacy  of  clinic  based  HIV/STD  interven-
tions. African American and Latina adolescent girls at the adolescent medicine clinic
of  a  children’s  hospital  were  randomized  to  one  of  three  interventions  focused  on
HIV/STD  information,  HIV/STD  behavioral  skill  building,  or  general  health  pro-
motion among, with 89 percent retained at 12-month follow-up (Jemmott, Jemmott,
Braverman,  and  Fong,  2005).  The  skills  building  intervention  participants  reported
less frequent unprotected intercourse and fewer sexual partners and were less likely

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

19

to test positive for an STD at 12-month follow up, as compared with the health-pro-
motion  control  intervention.  The  efficacy  of  the  intervention  did  not  differ  between
the  Latino  as  compared  with  the  African  American  girls.  We  developed  the  ‘‘Sister
to Sister’’ HIV/STD risk-reduction curriculum and evaluated it in a randomized con-
trolled  trial  with  Black  adult  women  at  a  women’s  health  clinic  in  Newark,  NJ
(Jemmott, Jemmott, & O’Leary, 2008). Among the 86.9 percent that returned for 12-
month  follow-up,  those  in  the  Sister-to-Sister  intervention  had  reduced  unprotected
sexual  intercourse  and  biologically  confirmed  STD  rates  as  compared  with  those  in
the health control group.

In  another  randomized  controlled  trial,  Jemmott,  Jemmott,  and  Fong  (1998)  as-
signed  659  African  American  adolescents  to  an  abstinence  intervention,  a  safer  sex
intervention, or a health-promotion control intervention. About 98 percent attended
all  sessions  of  the  two-session  interventions,  and  93  percent  returned  for  the  12-
month follow-up. The safer sex intervention significantly increased condom use com-
pared with the control group at three-, six-, and twelve-month follow-ups. The absti-
nence intervention significantly reduced self-reported intercourse at three-month fol-
low-up  compared  with  the  control  group.  This  was  the  first  randomized  controlled
trial demonstrating that an abstinence intervention was efficacious in reducing sex-
ual  involvement.  The  interventions  were  equally  efficacious  when  implemented  by
peer co-facilitators as compared with adult facilitators.

Finally,  we  recently  completed  a  randomized  controlled  trial  developing  and  test-
ing  the  efficacy  of  an  HIV/STD  risk-reduction  intervention  for  young  South  African
adolescents,  ‘‘Let  Us  Protect  Our  Future’’  (Jemmott,  Jemmott,  O’Leary,  Ngwane  et
al.,  2008).  We  randomly  selected  nine  matched  pairs  of  schools  and  randomly  allo-
cated schools to either a HIV/STD risk-reduction intervention or a health promotion
control  intervention.  Grade 6 students completed baseline,  post-intervention,  three-,
six-, and twelve-month follow-up surveys written in Xhosa following translation and
back-translation  from  English.  We  found  that  a  significantly  smaller  percentage  of
students  in  the  HIV/STD  risk-reduction  intervention  reported  having  vaginal  inter-
course,  unprotected  vaginal  intercourse,  and  multiple  sexual  partners,  as  compared
with  their  counterparts  in  the  health-promotion  control  intervention.  The  interven-
tion’s efficacy did not differ significantly between girls and boys. Thus, our interven-
tion approach, which integrates qualitative information about a population with be-
havior change theory, can be applied successfully not only to diverse populations in
the  United  States,  but  also  to  populations  in  sub-Saharan  Africa  where  HIV  is  ex-
acting its most devastating toll.
2. How  might  successful  programs  in  behavioral  interventions  for  AIDS
prevention  be  scaled  up,  applied  to  other  public  health  challenges,  or
otherwise used to better inform public policy?
Considerable  evidence  from  studies  here  in  the  United  States  and  abroad  docu-
ments  that  HIV/STD  risk-reduction  interventions  can  reduce  sexual  risk  behaviors
in  a  wide  range  of  populations,  including  adolescents,  women,  men  who  have  sex
with  men  (MSM),  substance  users,  patients  in  clinic  settings,  and  other  persons  at
risk.  To  have  the  most  impact  on  the  HIV/AIDS  epidemic,  these  successful  preven-
tive  interventions  must  be  scaled  up.  We  would  argue  that  interventions  would  be
easier to scale up if the intervention developers consider the likely end-users of the
intervention  during  the  process  of  development.  In  this  way,  they  are  more  likely
to  develop  an  intervention  that  can  be  widely  used  than  if  practical  questions  are
not considered from the very beginning. For example, if we are to develop an inter-
vention  for  a  broad  range  of  African  American  MSM,  we  should  consider  not  only
whether  it  will  be  most  efficacious  when  implemented  by  African  American  MSM
facilitators, but also how realistic is it to scale up an intervention for African Amer-
ican  MSM  that  must  be  implemented  by  African  American  MSM  facilitators.  If  we
know that women are the most common case managers for African American MSM,
it  might  be  more  practical  to  examine  whether  women  could  successfully  serve  as
facilitators of an intervention for the population. Clearly, an intervention that could
be implemented by either women or African American MSM would be easier to scale
up than one that must be implemented by African American MSM. This is just one
example;  the  point  is  that  efforts  to  scale  up  may  be  most  successful  if  scaling  up
is considered from the beginning.

Certainly,  in  the  early  years  of  HIV/STD  risk-reduction  research,  the  emphasis
was  appropriately  on  discovering  interventions  that  could  successfully  change  be-
havior.  Now,  that  we  know  we  can  develop  interventions  to  change  behavior  it  is
appropriate  to  shift  the  emphasis  and  focus  on  the  development  of  interventions
that can be scaled up. Several issues need to be considered when we focus on scaling
up, among them are adaptation, adoption, and effectiveness of interventions.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

20

Research is needed on the how to adapt evidence-based interventions to meet the
needs of different communities. This is important because to adapt is to change, and
change may mean creating a new intervention that may or may not retain the effi-
cacy  of  the  evidence-based  intervention.  Research  is  needed  to  understand  how  to
adapt  interventions  for  new  populations  or  settings  while  retaining  the  qualities
that  made  the  interventions  efficacious.  In  this  connection,  a  distinction  is  some-
times drawn between core elements of an intervention and key characteristics of an
intervention.  Core  elements  are  aspects  of  an  intervention  that  are  considered  es-
sential to its efficacy and therefore should not be changed, whereas key characteris-
tics  are  not  essential  to  achieve  efficacy  and  therefore  can  be  modified.  More  re-
search  is  needed  to  more  fully  understand  which  aspects  of  interventions  are  truly
core elements and which are merely key characteristics.

Research is needed on why evidenced-based interventions are or are not adopted.
Although  successful  interventions  are  published  in  scientific,  medical,  and  public
health  journals  and  therefore  brought  to  the  attention  of  researchers,  academics,
and  professionals,  the  majority  of  service  providers  who  work  closely  with  popu-
lations  at  risk  may  remain  unaware  of  the  interventions.  Thus,  efforts  must  be
made to disseminate successful interventions to likely end-users. The question then
becomes  whether  these  service  providers  decide  to  adopt  the  evidence-based  inter-
vention.  The  fact  that  service  providers  know  that  an  intervention  successfully
changed  behavior  in  a  study  does  not  necessarily  mean  that  service  providers  will
immediately  adopt  it.  Other  considerations  figure  in  the  decisions  of  service  pro-
viders  to  use  a  given  intervention.  Research  is  needed  into  these  decisions  in  order
to  devise  effective  strategies  to  encourage  the  adoption  of  evidence-based  interven-
tions.  This  may  include  research  into  ways  to  train  service  providers  to  implement
the intervention, identifying and providing appropriate kinds of technical assistance,
identifying  barriers  to  adopting  the  intervention  among  all  relevant  constituencies.
Examples  of  such  barriers  are  funding,  reasonable  salaries  for  talented  staff,  high
rates of turnover, organizational mission, and inadequate organizational capacity or
infrastructure.

A  third  type  of  research  needed  concerns  the  effectiveness  of  evidenced-based
interventions when they are disseminated. Such studies are sometimes called Phase
IV  trials  and  distinguished  from  Phase  III  trials  designed  to  test  the  efficacy  of
interventions.  Although  carefully  controlled  Phase  III  studies  employing  well
trained  and  monitored  facilitators  who  adhere  to  the  intervention  protocol  strictly
may  demonstrate  that  an  intervention  is  efficacious,  it  does  not  necessarily  mean
it  will  be  effective  when  implemented  under  less  controlled  real  world  cir-
cumstances.  Thus,  Phase  IV  trials  are  needed  to  identify  factors  that  affect  the  ef-
fectiveness of interventions when implemented by service providers with their client
populations  in  their  settings.  These  factors  could  then  be  taken  into  account  both
in  the  development  of  future  interventions  that  can  be  more  successfully  scaled  up
and in the training of providers in the use of interventions. Examples of factors that
might  affect  the  effectiveness  of  an  intervention  are  characteristics  of  the  organiza-
tion, including organizational mission, the type of training the service providers re-
ceive, technical assistance, supervision of staff, and staff turnover.

Here  is  an  example  of  a  Phase  IV  effectiveness  trial.  After  conducting  several
Phase III trials of the efficacy of the Be Proud! Be Responsible! intervention, we con-
ducted  a  Phase  IV  trial  of  its  effectiveness  when  implemented  by  service  providers
at  community-based  organizations  (CBOs)  serving  African  American  adolescents  13
to  18  years  of  age.  We  randomized  86  CBOs  to  implement  ‘‘Be  Proud!  Be  Respon-
sible!’’  or  a  control  health  promotion  intervention  on  diet  and  physical  activity.  In
addition,  we  randomly  assigned  the  CBOs  to  receive  three  different  amounts  of
training.  Each  CBO  implemented  its  assigned  intervention  with  six  groups  of  ado-
lescents  (N=3,448),  and  we  randomly  selected  three  of  the  six  to  complete  three-,
six-, and twelve-month follow-up surveys (N=1,707). We found that adolescents who
received the HIV/STD intervention were more likely to report consistent condom use
than were those who received the health-promotion control intervention. In addition,
the  effectiveness  of  the  intervention  did  not  improve  significantly  when  the  CBOs
were given more expensive and labor-consuming training. This finding suggests that
an  HIV/STD  risk-reduction  intervention  whose  efficacy  has  been  established  can  be
effective  when  implemented  by  CBOs,  which  play  a  critical  role  in  the  delivery  of
HIV/STD  prevention  services  worldwide.  Moreover,  the  training  of  the  CBOs  need
not be especially expensive or labor-intensive to achieve desirable outcomes.

The findings from research on behavioral interventions to prevent HIV can be ap-
plied  to  other  public  health  challenges.  The  leading  causes  of  morbidity  and  mor-
tality in the United States and in most parts of the world are health problems that
are  either  caused  by  or  affected  by  behavior  and  whose  treatment  or  course  are  in-
fluenced  by  behavior.  National  health  organizations  throughout  the  world  as  well

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

21

as  international  organizations  all  offer  similar  behavioral  guidelines  on  how  to  re-
duce the risk of leading causes of premature death. These include guidelines regard-
ing not only sexual behavior but also cigarette smoking, healthful diet, physical ac-
tivity,  alcohol  consumption,  and  other  use  of  other  substances,  screening  behaviors,
and  treatment  adherence.  Given  the  focus  on  behavior,  the  same  type  of  focus  on
behavior  change  theory  and  tailoring  to  the  population  is  likely  to  be  successful  in
efforts to address these other pressing public health issues.

We can say this with confidence because although we are primarily HIV/STD risk-
reduction  researchers,  in  all  of  our  studies  we  also  include  a  control  group  that  re-
ceives  an  intervention.  A  common  control  group  intervention  is  a  health  promotion
intervention  that  focuses  on  how  chronic  diseases  can  be  preventing  by  engaging
healthful  behavior.  This  usually  involves  focusing  on  fruit  and  vegetable  consump-
tion  and  physical  activity  as  a  means  to  reduce  the  risk  of  hypertension,  heart  dis-
ease,  obesity,  and  certain  types  of  cancer.  In  developing  these  chronic  disease  pre-
vention strategies we employ the same phases of research as in developing the HIV/
STD  interventions.  Thus,  we  conduct  qualitative  research  to  identify  salient  behav-
ioral, normative, and control beliefs and the context of the behaviors and then inte-
grate  the  information  with  our  theoretical  framework  to  develop  the  intervention.
An  example  of  the  success  of  this  approach  is  the  trial  we  recently  completed  in
South  Africa  with  grade  6  students.  Our  health  promotion  intervention  was  effica-
cious.  Students  who  received  the  health  promotion  intervention  reported  more  fruit
and vegetable consumption and more physical activity over the twelve-month follow-
up period than did those who received the HIV/STD risk-reduction intervention.
3. Please  provide  an  overview  of  the  range  of  topics  addressed  by  the  Be-
havioral  and  Social  Sciences  division  of  the  Penn  Center  for  AIDS  Re-
search. What is the nature of the relationship between your division and
the Center’s other divisions in biological sciences and clinical research?
How  might  social  and  behavioral  research  be  used  more  effectively  to
guide  or  take  advantage  of  biomedical  research  and  vice  versa?  Given
the  potential  for  behavioral  interventions  to  prevent  the  spread  of  HIV/
AIDS and many other diseases, is the Federal Government investment in
behavioral  research  reasonable  relative  to  its  total  investment  in  re-
search to prevent and treat these diseases?
The  Behavioral  and  Social  Sciences  (BSS)  Core  of  the  Penn  Center  for  AIDS  Re-
search  (CFAR)  focuses  on  studies  of  risk  behavior  and  outcome  research  as  well  as
studies  of  epidemiologic,  economic,  and  bioethical  aspects  of  AIDS.  Additional  goals
of  this  group  are  to  develop  strong  linkages  with  the  academic  community  of  the
University outside the Medical Center in order to establish a broad-based and com-
prehensive  program  in  AIDS  research.  More  specifically,  the  BSS  Core  services  are
guided by and designed to promote the following set of scientific priorities and prin-
cipals:  1)  Contextual  circumstances  (social,  sexual,  and  drug  using  networks;  com-
munity;  geography)  within  which  HIV  transmission  occurs  and  infection  exists  are
crucial  factors  to  understanding  and  responding  to  risk  of  infection,  access  and  ad-
herence  to  treatment;  2)  Behavioral  sciences  have  a  critical  role  to  play  in  the  de-
sign and evaluation of clinical trials of both behavioral and biomedical interventions
(microbicides, vaccines, and therapeutics); 3) Linkages between investigators (behav-
ioral,  clinical  and  basic),  locally,  domestically,  and  internationally  is  critical  to  the
development  of  sustainable  programs  of  innovative  and  meaningful  AIDS  research.
Members of the BSS Core have an impressive history of productivity over the past
20  years  and  continue  to  be  active  in  the  behavioral  and  social  science  aspects  of
AIDS.  The  work  of  these  faculty  include  the  development  of  important  and  widely
applied  theory,  the  design  and  implementation  of  theoretically  based  prevention
interventions, and leadership and participation in multi-site clinical trials of behav-
ioral  and  biomedical  interventions.  The  BSS  Program  has  a  rich  portfolio  of  active
AIDS  research  characterized  by  close  collaborations  among  program  members  and
between  CFAR  programs.  The  following  provides  a  brief  overview  of  the  current
work  of  the  program  with  particular  emphasis  on  those  studies  that  the  CFAR  has
been instrumental in facilitating.

International HIV Prevention Research

BSS program members have been actively involved in an expanding international
research  agenda.  In  collaboration  with  Penn  investigators,  the  University  of  Bot-
swana  was  recently  awarded  a  capacity  building  grant  by  NICHD.  Botswana  has
the second highest rate of HIV/AIDS in the world. A limited capacity and infrastruc-
ture  for  rigorous  HIV/STD  prevention  research  has  hampered  efforts  to  curb  the
spread  of  sexually  transmitted  HIV  infection  among  adolescents  in  Botswana.  Ac-
cordingly,  the  broad  long-term  objective  of  the  grant  is  to  build  capacity  and  infra-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

22

structure  to  develop,  implement,  and  evaluate  culturally  competent,  develop-
mentally appropriate, sustainable interventions suitable for implementation in a va-
riety  of  settings  to  dissuade  Botswana  adolescents  from  engaging  in  behaviors  that
increase  their  risk  for  sexually  transmitted  diseases  (STDs),  including  HIV.  This
grant is a collaborative effort of a multi-disciplinary team of researchers at the Uni-
versity  of  Botswana  and  the  University  of  Pennsylvania  to  build  such  capacity  and
infrastructure at the University of Botswana. It is directed by Bagele Chilisa at the
University  of  Botswana  and  John  Jemmott  at  the  University  of  Pennsylvania.  The
capacity  building  is  organized  around  three  cores.  Qualitative  and  Quantitative
Methodology Core, Social and Behavioral Intervention Core, and the Administrative
Core.  In  addition,  three  research  projects  that  draw  upon  the  cores  to  address  ado-
lescents  in  different  settings  were  proposed:  School-Based  HIV/STD  Prevention,
Church-Based  HIV/STD  Prevention,  and  HIV/STD  Prevention  for  Adolescents  Liv-
ing with HIV. The Principal Investigator of each core and research project is a Uni-
versity  of  Botswana  faculty  member  and  the  Co-Principal  Investigator  is  a  Univer-
sity  of  Pennsylvania  faculty  member.  Penn  BSS  Core  faculty  involved  in  the  Bot-
swana  project  include  J.  Jemmott,  L.  Jemmott,  Metzger,  Fishbein,  Blank,  Heeren,
Teiltelman, Coleman, and Stevenson. In addition to the University of Botswana col-
laboration,  Jemmott  and  Jemmott  are  implementing  an  NIMH  funded  school-based
prevention program in South Africa and an NICHD-funded cluster-randomized con-
trolled  to  test  the  efficacy  of  a  HIV/STD  risk-reduction  intervention  among  adult
men in 48 randomly selected neighborhoods in Eastern Cape Province, South Africa.
George  Woody’s  work  evaluating  naltrexone  treatment  for  high  risk  heroin
injectors  in  St.  Petersburg  has  led  to  currently  funded  studies  of  naltrexone  im-
plants in St. Petersburg and methadone treatment among HIV positive heroin users
in Ukraine. Woody is conducting a NIDA supported randomized trial examining the
efficacy of oral naltrexone (an opiate antagonist) with and without fluoxetine for re-
lapse  prevention  to  heroin  addiction  in  St.  Petersburg,  Russia.  This  study  is  being
done  in  collaboration  with  investigators  from  the  Pavlov  State  Medical  University
and  the  Leningrad  Regional  Center  for  Addiction  Treatment.  An  important  compo-
nent  of  this  research  is  the  measurement  of  HIV  risk  behavior  since  intravenous
drug  use  is  the  primary  route  of  HIV  transmission  in  St.  Petersburg.  The  findings
thus far suggest significant reduction of heroin use and injection related risk behav-
iors among those receiving naltrexone. Adherence rates for naltrexone are also sub-
stantially  higher  than  those  found  in  prior  studies  of  naltrexone.  A  supplement  to
the  Penn  CFAR  has  extended  the  St.  Petersburg  work  to  study  co-morbidities  be-
tween alcoholism, heroin addiction, TB, hepatitis and HIV. These projects have laid
the groundwork for a CIPRA application to fund an HIV education, treatment, pre-
vention and research center at Pavlov. Woody has an ongoing collaboration with re-
searchers at the University of Rio Grande do Sul in Porto Alegre, Brazil. This group
recently reported the results of a sero-incidence study modeled after the longitudinal
work  being  conducted  in  Philadelphia,  among  cocaine  users  in  Porto  Alegre.  The
study  estimates  an  HIV  sero-incidence  rate  of  5.03/100  person  years  of  follow-up.
The  findings  of  the  work  have  formed  the  basis  further  prevention  initiatives  in
Porto  Alegre  including  the  recent  submission  of  a  CIPRA  application  to  establish  a
collaborative HIV research center.

David Metzger is the protocol Chair for the HPTN 058, the first randomized trial
of drug treatment (suboxone) using sero-incidence as an endpoint. He is also an in-
vestigator  on  a  NIDA  supplement  (Richard  Schottenfield  PI;  Yale  University)  to
evaluate  Behavioral  and  Drug  Risk  Counseling  in  methadone  treatment  in  Wuhan,
China. The work in Wuhan has evolved from and earlier collaboration with WenZhe
Ho  and  investigators  from  the  Chinese  CDC,  which  examined  changes  in  immune
function during detoxification at a detoxification center in Wuhan. Metzger has also
completed  research  on  ACASI  risk  assessments  with  Brazilian  collaborators  during
the  funding  period.  Metzger  has  been  collaborating  on  several  projects  designed  to
develop  assessments  of  HIV  risk  behaviors  in  Brazil.  In  Porto  Alegre,  the  Risk  As-
sessment  Battery  was  adapted  and  evaluated  for  validity  and  reliability  and  in  Rio
De Janeiro an ACASI risk assessment has been developed an evaluated for use with
drug using populations entering treatment.

Toorjo  ‘‘TJ’’  Ghose,  is  a  new  investigator  in  the  School  of  Social  Policy  and  Prac-
tice,  having  joined  the  Penn  faculty  in  2007  after  completing  post-doctoral  training
at the Center for Interdisciplinary Research on AIDS (CIRA) at Yale University. He
has recently been funded as part of the Penn CFAR Pilot study program to conduct
a project entitled ‘‘Implementing PATH India: Reducing HIV risk among the dually-
diagnosed in India,’’ building on the work done domestically by Blank. This research
examines  HIV  risk  among  treatment  seekers  at  the  All  India  Institute  of  Medical
Sciences  (AIIMS)  in  New  Dehli  who  have  been  dually  diagnosed  with  a  mental
health  and  substance  use  disorder.  The  pilot  study  comprises  two  phases,  a  first

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

23

phase  in  which  knowledge,  attitudes,  and  risk  behaviors  are  assessed  for  200  per-
sons,  and  a  second  phase  in  which  PATH  is  translated  and  pilot  tested  for  20  per-
sons  in  a  randomized  pilot  study.  Collaborators  at  AIIMS  have  been  working  with
Ghose, an Indian native, for several years and have been full partners in the devel-
opment of the pilot study.

Hans-Peter Kohler, a sociologist, Susan Watkins, a sociologist, and Jere Behrman,
an economist, of the Population Studies Center, are leading an investigation of part-
nership patterns among couples in Malawi. This work, which received CFAR devel-
opmental  funding  initially  and  is  now  supported  with  NICHD  funds,  is  built  upon
a  longstanding  social  network  research  initiative  Kenya.  The  goal  of  this  project  is
to examine the role of networks in changing attitudes and behavior regarding family
size, family planning, and HIV/AIDS in Malawi. The project focuses on two key em-
pirical  questions:  the  roles  of  social  interactions  in  (1)  the  acceptance  (or  rejection)
of modern contraceptive methods and of smaller ideal family size; and (2) the diffu-
sion of knowledge of AIDS symptoms and transmission mechanisms and the evalua-
tion  of  acceptable  strategies  of  protection  against  AIDS  (69–72).  Behrman  also  has
grant support from NICHD to examine how economic transfers that provide support
for dependent children and elderly are affected in a context in which HIV/AIDS and
poor health has weakened traditional support networks. Tukufu Zuberi, a sociologist
and demographer in Penn’s Population Research Center, directs the African Census
Analysis  Project  in  collaboration  with  social  scientists,  demographers,  and  public
health  specialists  in  14  African  countries.  This  project  provides  CFAR  investigators
working  in  Africa  with  access  to  university  resources  including  survey  research  re-
sources and public health populations and HIV testing facilities. An important focus
of  the  Census  project  is  the  demographic  impact  of  the  HIV  epidemic  in  Africa.
Mark  Pauly,  professor  of  economics  at  the  Wharton  School,  is  funded  by  a  Fogarty
award  to  collaborate  with  colleagues  at  the  University  of  Natal  in  Durban,  South
Africa  to  assess  the  impact  of  poor  health  and  HIV/AIDS  on  small  businesses  and
the local economies where they are located in South Africa.

Health Services and Policy Research

Although  much  of  the  work  described  above  has  important  implications  for  HIV
policy regarding prevention and care, a number of faculty have been involved in pol-
icy  specific  research.  Policy  related  investigations  by  BSS  program  members  have
focused  on  access  to  care  for  HIV  positive  individuals  and  the  structure  of  health
care delivery. Dr. Barbara Turner’s work has documented substantial deficiencies in
the care of HIV+ persons nationally. Linda Aiken’s research group has made impor-
tant  contributions  to  the  development  and  evaluation  of  AIDS  prognostic  staging
measures for use in controlling for severity of illness in the evaluation of treatment
effects,  in  understanding  the  impact  of  organization  of  AIDS  services  on  outcomes
of care, and assessing racial disparities in AIDS health services and outcomes. Den-
nis  Culhane  of  the  School  of  Social  Work,  the  Population  Studies  Center,  and  the
Center  for  Mental  Health  Policy  Research  has  examined  the  relationship  between
AIDS  and  homelessness  in  Philadelphia  by  integrating  the  City’s  administrative
data bases for AIDS surveillance and public shelter utilization. Martin Fishbein has
had  a  major  influence  on  HIV  prevention  through  the  development  and  application
of  the  Theory  of  Reasoned  Action  which  he  co-developed.  He  has  been  very  active
in  research  designed  to  test  this  theory  in  community  trials  including  ‘‘Project  Re-
spect’’ which has greatly influenced HIV counseling strategies both domestically and
internationally.  He  has  continued  to  urge  HIV  behavioral  research  to  recognize  the
important  role  theory  in  prevention  and  the  need  to  integrate  behavioral  and  bio-
logical measures in a rational manner. Currently he is leading a five year research
effort designed to examine the link between exposure to sexual content in the media
and sexual risk behaviors among adolescents.

The  BSS  program  includes  several  key  faculty  who  have  been  important  in  the
national  and  international  response  to  the  AIDS  epidemic  and  who,  although  their
work  is  not  currently  centered  on  AIDS  research,  are  important  resources  to  the
program.  Robert  Boruch,  a  social  statistician  in  the  Graduate  School  of  Education,
chaired the National Research Council (NRC) Committee on AIDS Research and the
Behavioral, Social, and Statistical Sciences’s Panel on the Evaluation of AIDS Inter-
ventions. Boruch co-edited the NRC volume, Evaluating AIDS Prevention Programs.
He  is  Director  of  the  Campbell  collaborative  and  a  major  voice  in  the  public  policy
research, design and analyses. Robert Hornik, a noted social scientist in mass media
communication  and  behavior  change  at  Penn’s  Annenberg  School  of  Communica-
tions,  was  a  central  participant  in  the  AIDS  Public  Health  Communications  Pro-
gram  (AIDSCOM),  and  evaluated  mass  media  interventions  to  prevent  the  spread
of AIDS in Uganda, Zambia, Ghana, and Dominican Republic. Hornik has evaluated
AIDS education and communication programs for WHO’s Global Program on AIDS.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

24

Hornik  and  Fishbein,  at  Annenberg,  have  evaluated  the  impact  of  the  mass  media
anti-drug  campaign  supported  by  the  White  House  Office  on  Drug  Control  Policy.

Intervention Development and Testing with Adolescents

John Jemmott’s work has made significant contributions to HIV prevention theory
and practice among high-risk African American adolescents in community-based set-
tings. He is currently directing a very active program of prevention research. As the
director  of  the  Center  for  Behavior  and  Health  Communications  Research,  Depart-
ment  of  Psychiatry,  School  of  Medicine,  Jemmott  and  his  group  are  leading  a  ran-
domized controlled trial investigating the efficacy of abstinence and safer sex inter-
ventions with inner-city grade six and seven African American adolescents. One im-
portant  result  of  that  study  was  that  a  theory-based  culturally  tailored  abstinence-
only  intervention  reduced  sexually  intercourse  during  a  24-month  follow-up  period
as compared with a health promotion control group. This is the first study to docu-
ment an efficacious abstinence-only intervention over a two-year follow-up.

Loretta Sweet Jemmott continues to conduct research focused on identifying modi-
fiable  psychological  factors  that  underlie  behaviors  that  lead  to  risk  for  sexually
transmitted  HIV  infection  among  urban  African  Americans,  and  on  designing  and
testing theory-based, culturally sensitive, developmentally appropriate interventions
to  reduce  those  risks.  She  has  also  conducted  a  number  of  theory-based  descriptive
studies  that  use  theoretical  frameworks  to  predict  risky  sexual  behaviors  among
adolescents. She has been funded by the NINR to coordinate a partnership with the
Hampton  University  School  of  Nursing  designed  to  develop  and  evaluate  strategies
intended  to  narrow  the  gap  in  health  disparities  between  American  citizens  of  dif-
ferent  ethnic  and  racial  origins.  Sweet  Jemmott  is  leading  a  randomized  trial  of  a
theory based an abstinence-only intervention with parents and their adolescent chil-
dren identified through black churches in Philadelphia.

Subsequent  to  pilot  funding  through  the  Developmental  Core,  Anne  Teitelman
was successful in securing a K01. This Career Development Award will to establish
a rigorous academic foundation for a research career devoted to developing and test-
ing novel interventions for reducing HIV risk for adolescents. Thematically, the K01
will address the social context of HIV risk by integrating effective theory-based ado-
lescent HIV prevention with promising partner abuse prevention strategies, empha-
sizing promotion of healthy relationships. It uses family planning clinics as a venue
for  providing  a  skill-based,  culturally-tailored  HIV  and  partner  abuse  prevention
educational and advocacy program for African American girls living is economically
disadvantaged  circumstances.  Partner  abuse,  which  significantly  increases  risk  for
HIV,  disproportionately  affects  low  income  African-American  adolescent  girls,  as
does  HIV.  Critical  to  this  project  is  the  candidate’s  demonstrated  ability  to  conduct
HIV/STD  research  in  partnership  with  minority  communities,  a  long-term  engage-
ment  in  interdisciplinary  scholarship  aimed  at  improving  health  and  a  20-year  his-
tory as a primary care provider. The research plan is divided into two phases, both
guided  by  social  cognitive  and  gender  theory.  In  phase  1  she  will  conduct  focus
groups  and  individual  interviews  in  order  to  develop  and  tailor  the  HIV/partner
abuse  intervention  for  adolescent  girls  and  in  phase  2  she  will  evaluate  the  initial
acceptability  and  feasibility  of  this  intervention  in  a  limited  RCT.  Dr.  Tetitelman’s
mentors on this project include BSS program members L. Jemmott and J. Jemmott.

Intervention Development and Testing with Couples

J.  Jemmott  and  his  group  are  leading  a  major  NIMH  funded  four-city  multi-site
cluster-randomized  intervention  trial  on  sexually  active  HIV  serodiscordant  African
American couples. Couples in which one person has HIV and the other does not are
randomly  assigned  to  a  sexual  risk  reduction  intervention  or  a  chronic  disease  pre-
vention  control  intervention.  Participants  provide  biological  specimens  for  STD  as-
says  and  compete  ACASI  at  baseline,  immediately  post-intervention,  and  six  and
twelve  months  post-intervention.  Thus  far,  the  study  has  achieved  very  high  reten-
tion  rates  in  this  high  risk  population,  over  90  percent  have  completed  the  twelve-
month  follow-up  assessment.  The  project  involves  BSS  program  members  as  co-in-
vestigators (Metzger, L. Jemmott, and Maslankowski) and receives services from the
Clinical  Core  and  the  BSS  Core  in  recruitment  and  assessment  support.  The  data
coordinating  center  for  this  multi-site  trial  is  being  directed  by  J.  Richard  Landis
of the Biostatistics Core.

Intervention Development and Testing for Persons with Mental Illnesses

Michael  Blank  examines  mental  health  and  substance  abuse  and  relationships
with  HIV  risk.  His  previous  research  with  the  SMI  population  has  demonstrated
high  rates  of  both  psychiatric  and  general  medical  comorbidity.  Likewise,  the  HIV

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

25

positive population has dramatically elevated rates of mental illness and other phys-
ical  co-morbidities.  Blank’s  work  has  been  substantially  impacted  by  the  Penn
CFAR  resulting  in  two  R01  awards,  and  R13  to  support  three  national  scientific
meetings  of  the  SBSRN,  and  a  U18  from  the  CDC  in  collaboration  with  investiga-
tors  from  the  University  of  Maryland  to  examine  implementation  of  HIV  testing  in
community  mental  health  settings.  This  work  has  evolved  with  investigators  from
the  Center  for  Mental  Health  Policy  Research  and  the  Center  for  Health  Outcomes
and  Policy  Research  at  the  School  of  Nursing  (Aiken).  These  projects  evolved  from
analyses  of  Medicaid  claims  data  that  found  that  the  relative  risk  of  HIV/AIDS  is
at  least  five  times  greater  in  persons  with  serious  mental  illness  (SMI)  relative  to
the  general  Medicaid  population  in  Philadelphia  and  over  seven  times  greater  for
those  also  treated  for  substance  abuse.  A  cost  study  linked  to  these  data  showed
that  SMI  with  HIV  had  much  higher  health  care  costs  than  non-SMI  persons  with
HIV  and  non-HIV  persons  with  SMI.  Based  in  part  on  these  findings,  and  with  co-
investigators  Aiken,  Hines,  Fishbein,  Gross,  Rothbard,  and  TenHave,  Blank  has
been  conducting  an  NINR  funded  investigation  to  study  the  effectiveness  of  inte-
grating  advanced  practice  nursing  into  ongoing  Targeted  Case  Management  (TCM)
to enhance adherence to treatment regimens among persons with serious mental ill-
ness  (SMI)  who  are  also  HIV  positive.  The  work  is  built  around  a  Public-Academic
Liaison  (PAL)  model  involving  mental  health  services  researchers  from  a  number
of  specialized  research  centers  at  the  University  of  Pennsylvania,  with  the  public
health and mental health programs in the City of Philadelphia.

Blank has also has been conducting a randomized community trial of a preventive
intervention  delivered  by  mental  health  case  managers  in  a  one-on-one  format  for
persons with SMI who also abuse substances. The intervention entitled, Preventing
AIDS Through Health (PATH) is an evidence-based intervention that integrates fea-
tures from the CDC project Respect to encourage safer sexual practices and promote
condom  use  with  aspect  of  the  NIDA  Community-based  Outreach  Model  to  reduce
risk  of  blood-borne  infections  resulting  from  substance  abuse.  Co-investigators  for
this work include Fishbein, Metzger, Hadley, Solomon, Rothbard, and Ten Have.

Blank has also been directing a multi-site U18 project from CDC to increase HIV
testing  and  improve  linkage  to  care  for  HIV-infected  in  community  mental  health
settings  with  large  numbers  of  numbers  of  African  Americans.  Using  a  six-month
longitudinal design, he will be enrolling participants who meet inclusion criteria for
assessment, counseling, and Rapid HIV Testing at baseline. These participants will
be  interviewed  again  at  six  months  post  intervention.  The  study  is  designed  to
evaluate  changes  in  HIV  risk  behaviors,  linkages  to  HIV  care,  and  subsequent  use
of  mental  health  services.  As  the  primary  coordinating  institution,  the  Penn  re-
search team will be collaborating with a mix of three types of facilities in Philadel-
phia and Baltimore, through our collaborators at the University of Maryland. Target
facilities in both cities include university-based inpatient psychiatric units, Commu-
nity  Mental  Health  Centers  (CMHCs),  and  Assertive  Community  Treatment  (ACT)
programs.

Intervention  Development  and  Testing  for  Persons  who  Abuse  Substances
L.  Jemmott  is  leading  a  randomized  trial  of  a  theory  based  sexual  risk  reduction
intervention targeting African American women in drug detoxification. BSS program
members who serve as co-investigators include J. Jemmott and Metzger. The inter-
vention  will  be  evaluated  using  STD  incidence  and  self-reported  sexual  behavior  as
measured via ACASI.

Philippe  Bourgeois  joined  Pen  and  the  CFAR  BSS  Program  in  2007  as  the  fifth
Penn  Integrates  Knowledge  (PIK)  Professor.  PIK  Professorships  are  awarded  to  ex-
ceptional  scholars  whose  research  and  teaching  exemplify  the  integration  of  knowl-
edge  across  academic  disciplines.  Dr.  Bourgois  has  earned  international  acclaim  for
his ethnographic research with drug abusers. He has devoted much of his recent re-
search  to  the  prevalence  of  violence  and  disease  among  homeless  drug  abusers  in
San  Francisco.  Bourgois’s  books  include  In  Search  of  Respect:  Selling  Crack  in  El
Barrio, which received the 1996 C. Wright Mills Prize from the Society for the Study
of  Social  Problems  of  the  American  Sociological  Association  and  the  1997  Margaret
Mead Award from the American Anthropological Association and the Society for Ap-
plied Anthropology. Bourgois is currently funded to examine the HIV and HCV risk
implications  of  the  growing  phenomenon  in  the  United  States  of  prematurely  geri-
atric substance abusers by examining the aging process among both young and older
injectors.  He  is  contributing  to  a  socio-culturally  contextualized  understanding  of
variance in HIV and HCV infection rates among differentially vulnerable profiles of
street  based  IDUs  that  is  informed  theoretically  at  the  macro-structural  level.  A
cross-generational  and  multi  gender  ethnographic  team  will  collect  qualitative  data
inside  the  shooting/sleeping  encampments  and  income  generating  territory  of  two

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

26

overlapping  social  networks  of  injectors  (core  N  =  25–40  at  any  given  time;  periph-
eral  N  =  50–70).  The  project  extends  its  ongoing  collaboration  with  epidemiologists
to  clinical  researchers  and  researchers  and  caregivers  who  work  with  comparable
data  sets  of  injectors  in  San  Francisco  in  order  to  engage  a  multi-method  dialogue.
An immediate applied goal is to promote communication across the research/service
interface.  We  will  offer  providers  of  health  care,  outreach  and  treatment  an  indige-
nous  perspective  on  the  effectiveness  of  their  services  among  substance  abusers  by
age  cohort  through  our  comparative  study  of:  1)  injectors  from  the  baby  boom  gen-
eration who are advancing from mid-life to old age with rapidly deteriorating health
and ongoing HIV risk; and 2) homeless youth injectors (many of whom are the chil-
dren  of  middle-aged  substance  abusers)  who  engage  in  risky  injection  and  sexual
practices.

Charles Dackis, MD, an experienced researcher in substance abuse treatment has
recently  been  supported  by  NIDA  to  conduct  a  trial  to  evaluate  the  efficacy  of
modafinil  as  a  treatment  for  cocaine  dependence  in  women,  and  as  a  means  of  re-
ducing high-risk behavior (HRB) that increases the likelihood of HIV seroconversion.
Modafinil,  a  wake-promoting  medication  that  is  approved  for  narcolepsy,  has  a  low
abuse  potential  despite  its  alerting  effect.  Modafinil  also  blocks  cocaine-induced  eu-
phoria  under  controlled  conditions  [2,  3]  and  may  reverse  clinically  significant  co-
caine-induced  neuroadaptations.  An  effective  pharmacological  treatment  for  cocaine
dependence  should  also  reduce  HIV  seroconversion  by  diminishing  unsafe  sexual
practices  that  often  accompany  cocaine  procurement.  Cocaine  enhances  sexual
arousal and increases reckless sexual activity, including trading sex for cocaine with
multiple  partners.  Cocaine-addicted  women  who  engage  in  this  dangerous  practice
are particularly vulnerable to HIV seroconversion and in need of effective treatment.
Needle sharing by intravenous cocaine users is another avenue of HIV transmission
that could be targeted by effective treatment.

Intervention Development and Testing using Media Communications

Martin  Fishbein  is  Harry  C.  Coles  Jr.  Distinguished  Professor  in  Communication
at  the  Annenberg  School  and  is  internationally  recognized  for  his  theoretical  work
in behavior change theory and relationships to risk behavior such as HIV. He is cur-
rently funded to examine media influences on risk behavior among adolescents. The
media is a pervasive institutional structure in all modern societies. It has often been
argued  that  the  media  industry  encourages  unsafe  sex  by  irresponsibly  portraying
sexual  behaviors.  As  a  result,  it  is  widely  claimed  that  youth  are  negatively  influ-
enced  by  what  they  see,  hear,  and  read  in  the  media.  There  is,  however,  very  little
evidence  to  either  support  or  refute  this  hypothesis.  Historically,  sexual  portrayals
in the media, like violence, have raised the ire of advocates, policy-makers, and par-
ents dating back to the first mass media marketed to children. Today, the issue re-
mains  an  important  agenda  item  and  has  led  to  public  health  policy  interventions
such  as  V-chip  ratings  and  technology  legislation,  movie  ratings,  and  video  game
advisories.  Yet  few  studies  of  the  ‘‘effects’’  of  mass  media  on  specific  behaviors  are
done due to theoretical, logistic, design, and cost considerations. One specific reason
for  this  is  that  much  ‘‘media  influence’’  is  designed  to  shape  and  perpetuate  con-
sumer  preferences  and  is  therefore  not  targeted  to  behaviorally-defined  groups  but
rather to the mass consumer public. But other kinds of media effects predicated on
the  principles  of  social  learning  theory  and  other  theories  can  be  predicted  for  spe-
cific ‘‘audiences’’ and specific behaviors. This application focuses on the media’s role
in presenting sexual content, implying sexual norms, modeling sexual decision-mak-
ing  (‘‘self-efficacy’’),  and  displaying  the  outcomes  of  sexual  behaviors  in  relation  to
young  adolescents,  a  group  whose  attitudes,  norms,  self-efficacy,  and  decision-mak-
ing skills are all in flux and development. This five-year research project is the first
to  combine  behavioral  theory,  communication  theory,  and  a  state  of  the  art  content
analytic  approach  to  investigate  the  relationship  between  exposure  to  sex  in  the
media  and  early  initiation  of  sexual  intercourse  and  other  sexual  behaviors.  Using
this approach, the project will develop both objective (i.e., content analytic) and sub-
jective,  theory-based  measures  of  (a)  the  quantity  and  content  of  adolescent’s  expo-
sure to sexual media and (b) adolescents’ sexual behavior and its underlying psycho-
social determinants (i.e., beliefs, attitudes, norms, self-efficacy and intention). These
measures will be tested for their reliability and validity, and they will take develop-
mental,  gender  and  ethnic  differences  into  account.  Based  on  this  formative  re-
search, the project comprises a three-wave longitudinal proof of concept study to in-
vestigate  the  empirical  link  between  exposure  to  sexual  content  in  a  broad  variety
of  media  (i.e.,  television,  movies,  music  CDs,  the  Internet,  video  games,  and  maga-
zines)  and  sexual  behavior.  In  summary,  this  research  uses  a  theoretically  ground-
ed,  methodologically  sound  approach  to  more  fully  examine  the  relationships  be-
tween media exposure and AIDS-related sexual behavior.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

27

Intervention Development and Testing with MSM

John  Jemmott  is  currently  conducting  an  NIMH  funded  study  to  develop,  imple-
ment, and evaluate the efficacy of an HIV/STD risk reduction intervention for Afri-
can  American  MSM.  This  is  a  collaborative  effort  by  HIV/STI  university-based  re-
searchers and Blacks Educating Blacks About Sexual Health Issues (BEBASHI), the
oldest community-based organization (CBO) in the City of Philadelphia that has ad-
dressed HIV in the African American community, including MSM. The participants
will  be  594  African  American  MSM  who  will  be  randomized  to  a  one-on-one  sexual
risk  reduction  intervention,  ‘‘Being  Responsible  for  Ourselves  (BRO)’’  or  a  one-on-
one  health  promotion  intervention  that  will  serve  as  the  control  condition.  This
study  will  provide  an  urgently  needed  intervention  to  reduce  the  risk  of  HIV  and
other  STIs  in  one  of  the  highest  risk  populations  in  the  United  States.  Christopher
Coleman, who holds a joint appointment with the School of Nursing and the Medical
School, is a co-investigator on John Jemmott’s MSM intervention study, has a long-
standing research interest in HIV positive MSM.

William Holmes’ research has focused on modeling the relationship between child-
hood  abuse  and  risk  behaviors  among  MSM  populations.  More  men  with  than  men
without childhood sexual abuse (CSA) histories report sexual behavior that has high
risk for HIV transmission. His work has found that co-morbid post traumatic stress
disorder (PTSD) and depression acts as both a mediator and a moderator of the as-
sociation between CSA and sexual risk behavior. In his current NIMH funded study
entitled,  ‘‘Interaction  of  abuse,  PTSD,  depression  on  men’s  sex  risk,’’  data  from  a
cross sectional, random-digit-dial (HDD) survey of 1,200 men from high AIDS preva-
lence  areas  of  Philadelphia  County  will  be  used  to  test  the  model  he  has  developed
to explain the mediating/moderating pathway between CSA and lifetime sexual risk
behavior  in  men.  From  this  model,  multidimensional  HIV  risk  reduction  interven-
tions can be built.

Integrated Biomedical and Behavioral Trials

David  Metzger  is  the  PI  of  the  Penn  Prevention  Clinical  Trials  Unit,  funded  by
NIAID  and  a  research  site  for  the  HIV  Vaccine  Trials  Network  (HVTN),  the
Microbicide Trials Network (MTN) and the Prevention Trials Network (HPTN). This
award in 2006 was built upon its successful involvement as a site for the HIV Net-
work  of  Prevention  Trials  (HIVNET)  and  subsequently,  the  HIV  Prevention  Trials
Network  (HPTN).  The  Penn  Prevention  Clinical  Trials  Unit  is  one  of  60  inter-
national  and  domestic  trials  units  selected  to  develop  and  test  behavioral  and  bio-
medical  prevention  interventions.  The  Penn  Prevention  CTU  includes  co-investiga-
tors  from  the  School  of  Nursing  (Loretta  Sweet  Jemmott),  the  Infectious  Diseases
Division  of  the  School  of  Medicine  (Ian  Frank),  the  Department  of  Immunology  of
the Children’s Hospital of Philadelphia (Steven Douglas), and the Annenberg School
of  Communication  (John  Jemmott).  The  Penn  Prevention  CTU  and  its  predecessor,
the  HPTU  have  made  significant  contributions  to  the  research  agenda  of  the  HIV
Clinical  Trials  Network  and  is  currently  involved  in  three  active  protocols:  1)  the
HVTN 502, the ‘‘STEP’’ study testing the ; 2) HVTN 070, and 3) HPTN 035, a large
international  Phase  IIb  trial  of  Pro2000  (entry  inhibiting  gel),  and  Buffer  Gel  (a
buffering  gel  which  inactivates  virus).  Penn’s  work  in  testing  vaginal  microbicides
is  led  by  Lisa  Maslankowski.  David  Metzger,  the  PI  of  the  Penn  Prevention  CTU
also  serves  as  the  Chair  of  HPTN  058,  a  randomized  trial  of  suboxone  treatment
for opiate addiction as HIV prevention taking place in Thailand and China.

Courtney  Schrieber  received  a  developmental  award  to  study  pregnancy  during
clinical  trials  using  a  nested  case-control  method  and  a  point-of-care  questionnaire.
This  area  of  inquiry  is  unique  and  important  because  incident  pregnancies  are  sig-
nificant and a somewhat unexpected finding in NIH supported Phase II and III vag-
inal microbicide and vaccine trials that can serve a biomarker of risk behavior. Fur-
ther,  because  the  teratogenicty  of  investigatory  vaccines  and  microbicides  are  un-
known,  thus  pregnant  women  are  dis-enrolled  from  these  studies  which  may  intro-
duce  bias  in  the  studies  as  those  at  greater  risk  may  be  dis-enrolled  more  fre-
quently. Reducing pregnancy rates during trial participation will help avoid the as-
sociated methodological complications and potential health risks. Schrieber seeks to
explore  the  risk  factors  for  pregnancy  among  trial  participants  in  order  to  inform
efforts  to  both  identify  characteristics  of  women  who  are  likely  to  become  pregnant
during the study and to prevent pregnancy for trial enrollees.

Relation Between the Behavioral and Social Science (BSS) Core and Other

CFAR Programs: Building Research Collaborations

The  BSS  Program  has  encouraged  collaborations  among  program  members  and
between  CFAR  programs.  This  was  evidenced  in  many  of  the  projects  already  de-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

28

scribed that are led by members of the core. In addition, BSS Core members in con-
junction with members of the immunology program (Douglas and Ho) are currently
investigating the role of host factors on viral activity HIV and HCV infected individ-
uals.  This  work,  facilitated  by  the  Penn  CFAR,  perhaps  best  exemplifies  the  pro-
gram  goal  of  cross  discipline  collaborations  and  have  developed  a  productive  pro-
gram  of  research  over  the  past  five  years.  Dwight  Evans’  research  involving  HIV
infected men prior to the advent of HAART, provided the first indication that stress
was  not  only  predictive  of  early  HIV  disease  progression  but  was  associated  with
alterations in immunity, suggesting that stress influences disease progression by al-
tering key aspects of cellular immunity. His study of HIV infected women conducted
in  collaboration  with  Steven  Douglas  and  David  Metzger  extended  the  under-
standing of these relationships and provided the first evidence that depression may
alter the function of killer lymphocytes in HIV infected women. Evans’ recently com-
pleted  grant  entitled  ‘‘HIV  in  Women:  Depression  and  Immunity’’  further  explored
these  relationships  and  the  ex-vivo  impact  of  anti  depressants  among  HIV  infected
women  with  depression.  Metzger’s  research  group  had  responsibility  for  screening,
recruitment,  and  specimen  collection  and  Douglas’s  lab  conducted  immunologic  as-
says.  This  work  demonstrated  that  resolution  of  depression  is  associated  with  res-
toration of NK cytotoxicity in HIV and found that ex-vivo treatment of lymphocytes
with an SSRI enhances NK cytolytic activity. These findings were the basis of a re-
cent NIMH award to Evans. This new study is designed to test whether depression
is  associated  with  non-cytolytic,  chemokine  and  cytokine,  functional  alterations  of
killer lymphocytes, as well as chemokine receptor sensitivity of macrophages and T-
cells that are relevant to HIV-infectivity. The potential for impact of alcohol and opi-
ates on HIV viral activity has also led to investigations of the mediating role of sub-
stance  use  on  immune  function  among  well  characterized  HIV  infected  individuals
with  Douglas  and  Ho.  NIDA  funded  work  on  the  relationships  among  opiates,  sub-
stance P and HIV viral activity have found that methadone in vitro enhances infec-
tion  of  immune  cells.  With  supplemental  funds  from  NIDA  this  work  was  extended
to  examine  factors  associated  with  HCV  activity.  Using  this  model  of  collaborative
research  where  behavioral  scientist  identify  and  assess  well  defined  subject  charac-
teristics  and  deliver  specimens  for  intensive  and  innovative  analyses,  Metzger’s
group is working with Douglas to examine the impact of alcohol abuse and depend-
ence on viral activity and immune function.

The  collaborative  capacity  building  project  between  the  University  of  Botswana
and the University of Pennsylvania is organized around three cores. Qualitative and
Quantitative  Methodology  Core,  Social  and  Behavioral  Intervention  Core,  and  the
Administrative  Core.  The  project  draws  upon  members  of  the  CFAR  Biostatistics
Core,  including  Dr.  Susan  Ellenberg  and  the  CFAR  Administrative  Core,  including
Dr.  James  Hoxie.  This  partnership  is  committed  to  developing  a  creative,  com-
prehensive  and  interdisciplinary  HIV/STD  prevention  research  program  on  adoles-
cents that is fully integrated within the research and education mission of the Uni-
versity  Botswana  and  dedicated  to  addressing  the  urgent  need  to  stem  the  dev-
astating  impact  of  HIV  on  one  of  the  highest  risk  adolescent  populations  in  the
world.

Effective Use of Social and Behavioral Research

HIV/AIDS  remains  the  most  important  public  health  problem  facing  our  global
community. Since the first cases of AIDS were reported in 1981, infection with HIV
has grown to pandemic proportions, with an estimated 65 million infections and 25
million  deaths.  To  be  sure,  we  now  have  effective  treatment  of  HIV  infection  with
highly  active  anti-retroviral  therapy  (HAART)  even  in  countries  with  limited  re-
sources.  Still,  these  treatments  do  not  reach  all  who  need  them,  especially  in  low-
resource  countries  and  prevention  is  more  cost  effective  than  is  treatment.  Accord-
ingly, there is a great need for effective behavioral strategies to reach and serve all
persons who could benefit from treatment and prevention services.

As  with  many  health  problems  today,  behaviors—for  instance,  practicing  absti-
nence, limiting sexual partners, using condoms, using clean IDU equipment, and ad-
hering  to  treatment  regimens—are  central  to  the  spread  of  HIV  and  to  the  efficacy
of  treatment.  Accordingly,  an  approach  that  integrates  the  lessons  from  behavioral
and biomedical science is likely to be most effective in stemming the HIV pandemic.
As  biomedical  advances  are  made,  social  and  behavioral  science  contributions  will
be  required  to  ensure  the  success  of  new  biomedical  prevention  technologies  and
treatments, including microbicides and vaccines. For example, social and behavioral
science  research  would  contribute  to  an  understanding  of  whether  the  technologies
and treatments are acceptable to populations, whether new behaviors will be adopt-
ed, and the facilitators and barriers to optimal treatment adherence.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

29

Adequacy of Federal Funding

The Federal Government’s investment in behavioral research on HIV has not been
sufficient. Although the CDC has a number of dissemination initiatives, not enough
funding has been allocated to result in the widespread use of interventions that we
know  are  efficacious.  If  these  interventions  are  effective  when  disseminated  and  if
they  were  widely  disseminated  then  we  would  not  be  witnessing  the  high  rates  of
HIV that we are still seeing in the United States. Second, there are still important
gaps  in  the  portfolio  of  intervention  strategies.  African  American  MSM  have  the
highest  rates  of  HIV  in  the  United  States.  Indeed,  the  rates  of  HIV  among  African
American  MSM  rivals  those  seen  in  countries  in  sub-Saharan  Africa,  the  region
with the highest rate of HIV in the world. The CDC still does not have interventions
for  African  American  MSM  with  evidence  of  efficacy  in  reducing  risk  behavior  and
STD from randomized controlled trials to offer service providers who work with this
population.  Thus,  additional  funding  is  needed  urgently  for  behavioral  research  on
dissemination  of  efficacious  interventions,  including  the  adaptation,  adoption,  and
effectiveness of those interventions. In addition, funding is also needed for interven-
tions for populations, including African American MSM, where efficacious interven-
tions are lacking.

The  present  funding  environment  for  behavioral  research  on  HIV  is  tough.  It  is
extremely  difficult  for  investigators  to  receive  funding  for  scientifically  meritorious
proposals  when  insufficient  funds  are  available  and  strong  proposals  must  be  set
aside  unfunded.  The  is  a  problem  for  established  researchers  who  may  have  to  dis-
mantle their research teams and lose their infrastructure because of a lack of funds.
It is especially damaging for young scientists who are unable to secure the funding
needed to launch their careers and may have to seek other careers because they are
unable  to  produce  the  body  of  research  required  to  earn  tenure  at  leading  univer-
sities.

BIOGRAPHY FOR JOHN B. JEMMOTT III

John  B.  Jemmott  III  received  his  Ph.D.  in  Psychology  from  the  Department  of
Psychology  and  Social  Relations  at  Harvard  University.  From  1981  to  1999,  he
served as Instructor, Assistant Professor, Associate Professor, and Professor of Psy-
chology  at  Princeton  University.  He  currently  holds  joint  faculty  appointments  at
the  University  of  Pennsylvania  as  the  Kenneth  B.  Clark  Professor  of  Communica-
tion  in  the  Annenberg  School  for  Communication  and  as  Professor  of  Communica-
tion  in  Psychiatry  in  the  School  of  Medicine.  He  also  directs  the  Center  for  Health
Behavior  and  Communication  Research  in  the  School  of  Medicine  at  the  University
of Pennsylvania.

Dr.  Jemmott  is  a  Fellow  of  the  American  Psychological  Association  and  the  Soci-
ety for Behavioral Medicine. He has served as a regular member of several National
Institutes of Health (NIH) panels, including the Behavioral Medicine Study Section,
the AIDS and Immunology Research Review Committee, and the Office of AIDS Re-
search  Advisory  Council.  Dr.  Jemmott  has  published  numerous  articles  and  has
been the recipient of many grants from the National Institutes of Health to conduct
research  designed  to  develop  and  test  theory-based,  contextually  appropriate  HIV/
STD  risk  reduction  interventions  for  inner-city  African  American  and  Latino  popu-
lations.  He  was  identified  in  the  25  July  2008  issue  of  Science  magazine  as  one  of
the  10  researchers  whose  work  into  HIV/STD  risk  reduction  interventions  received
the most investigator-initiated (R01) grant funding from the NIH (fiscal year 2007).
The  Centers  for  Disease  Control  and  Prevention  have  identified  as  effective  and
have  disseminated  three  curricula  based  on  his  HIV  prevention  research  with  ado-
lescents:  ‘‘Be  Proud!  Be  Responsible!  Empowering  Adolescents  to  Reduce  their  Risk
of  HIV,’’  ‘‘Making  a  Difference!  An  Abstinence  Approach  to  HIV/STD  Risk  Reduc-
tion,’’  and  ‘‘Making  Proud  Choices!  A  Safer  Sex  Approach  to  HIV/STD  Risk  Reduc-
tion.’’  Dr.  Jemmott  is  currently  conducting  research  on  HIV/STD  prevention  strate-
gies  for  couples  where  one  partner  is  living  with  HIV,  African  American  men  who
have  sex  with  men,  and  adolescents  and  adult  men  in  sub-Saharan  Africa,  where
the HIV pandemic is taking its heaviest human toll.

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you.
Dr. Kenkel.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

30

STATEMENT OF DR. DONALD S. KENKEL, PROFESSOR OF POL-
ICY  ANALYSIS  AND  MANAGEMENT,  COLLEGE  OF  HUMAN
ECOLOGY, CORNELL UNIVERSITY
Dr.  KENKEL.  Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify.  I  am  con-
vinced  that  the  social  sciences  in  general  and  economics  in  par-
ticular  have  much  to  offer  to  improve  our  nation’s  health.  Nobel
Prize  winning  economist  Gary  Becker  has  argued  that,  ‘‘Economic
theory is not a game played by clever academicians but is a power-
ful  tool  to  analyze  the  real  world.’’  To  inform  public  health  policy,
empirical  health  economists  like  myself  combine  economic  theory
with  careful  analysis  of  data  to  try  to  quantify  the  impact  of  var-
ious real world influences on individual health behaviors.

In  these  comments  I  will  try  to  overview  some  research  on  the
economics  of  health  behaviors  and  provide  a  few  examples  of  their
relevance  for  public  policy  and  then  make  a  few  comments  about
the importance of NSF and NIH support for health economics.

Some  health  economics  research  focuses  on  the  health  care  sec-
tor. The research I will overview uses the tools of economics to bet-
ter understand the determinance of these health behaviors outside
the health care sector like smoking and obesity.

The economic approach to human behavior emphasizes that peo-
ple  respond  to  incentives.  Consequences  for  their  health  can  pro-
vide people with very strong incentives to quit an unhealthy behav-
ior like smoking or to start a healthy behavior like regular exercise.
The  history  of  smoking  in  the  U.S.  is  a  good  example.  Since  the
1964,  Surgeon  General’s  Report  on  the  health  consequences  of
smoking, the prevalence of smoking among U.S. adults has dropped
from over 40 percent to about 21 percent. Econometric studies sug-
gest  that  improved  consumer  information  about  the  risks  of  smok-
ing  helped  lead  to  part  of  this  drop.  When  people  learned  smoking
was  unhealthy,  many  people  quit  smoking,  and  others  didn’t  start
smoking in the first place.

My colleagues and I recently completed an empirical study of the
impact  of  pharmaceutical  industry  advertising  on  smoking  ces-
sation  decisions,  another  important  source  of  health  information.
Based  on  our  results,  we  estimate  that  if  the  smoking  cessation
product  industry  increased  its  expenditures  on  magazine  adver-
tising  by  10  percent,  the  result  would  be  about  225,000  new  at-
tempts  to  quit  smoking  each  year  and  8,000  successful  quits  each
year.

This  is  part  of  a  growing  body  of  evidence  that  direct-to-con-
sumer  ads  increased  consumer  demand  for  a  variety  of  pharma-
ceutical  products.  Easing  regulation  on  ads  for  smoking  cessation
products could exploit more fully the industry’s profit incentives to
promote public health.

More  generally,  when  crafting  public  policy,  it  is  important  to
keep  in  mind  the  private  incentives  to  improve  public  health.  Peo-
ple want to live healthier, longer lives, and private sector firms can
make  profits  helping  them  do  so.  Public  policies  should  be  struc-
tured  to  facilitate  the  public  health  gains  enjoyed  when  firms  pur-
sue their private profits.

The  prices  consumers  pay  for  health-related  goods  also  provides
important  incentives  that  influence  health  behaviors.  Dozens  of
econometric  studies  estimate  the  price  responsiveness  of  demand

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

31

for  alcoholic  beverages  and  cigarettes.  I  have  contributed  to  both
lines  of  research.  In  research  funded  by  the  National  Institute  on
Alcohol  Abuse  on  Alcoholism,  I  found  evidence  that  even  heavy
drinking falls when the prices of alcoholic beverages increase.

Research  funding  from  the  National  Cancer  Institute  helped  my
colleagues  and  I  launch  a  series  of  studies  on  the  effects  of  higher
prices on youth smoking. The Guide Tax Policy, the NIAAA special
reports  to  Congress  on  alcohol  and  health  and  the  Surgeon  Gen-
eral’s  reports  on  tobacco  and  health  regularly  review  econometric
studies  of  the  price  or  tax  responsiveness  of  alcohol  and  cigarette
demand.

Health  economics  research  takes  on  hard  research  questions
about  the  impact  of  public  policies  on  health  behavior.  While  I  be-
lieve health economics research provides useful guidance for policy,
it  is  important  to  keep  in  mind  how  hard  the  questions  are.  For
example,  over  the  past  few  decades  the  Federal  Government  and
the  states  have  launched  massive  and  varied  public  policy  cam-
paigns  to  reduce  smoking.  As  various  policies  have  been  enacted,
it  is  clear  that  smoking  rates  have  fallen  and  public  anti-smoking
sentiment has grown. Yet teasing out the direction of causality and
the contribution of specific policies is extremely difficult.

Social  science  research  also  contributes  to  public  policy  when  it
reminds us of the wisdom of the old comment, ‘‘It ain’t so much the
things  we  know  that  get  us  into  trouble,  it  is  the  things  we  do
know that just ain’t so.’’ This in turn reminds me of the almost in-
evitable comment at the end of an academic paper, ‘‘More research
is  needed.’’  This  comment  is  probably  not  what  you  want  to  hear,
but  it  is  not  an  admission  of  failure  but  reflects  how  science  pro-
gresses.  Answers  to  hard  research  questions  are  re-examined  and
probed, leading to new answers and better questions.

Research  on  the  economics  of  health  behaviors  requires  data  on
health  behaviors  and  on  the  factors  that  influence  them.  Federal
and  State  governments’  data  collection  efforts  are  a  very  valuable
resource  for  this  research.  The  NIH  and  the  NSF  Foundation,  the
NSF,  also  provide  important  resources  for  health  economics  re-
search supporting investigator-initiated date collection.

An applied field like health economics also relies on insights from
economic  theory  and  uses  tools  and  methods  developed  in  econo-
metric  theory.  NSF  support  for  even  seemingly  esoteric  research
topics in economic and econometric theory improves health econom-
ics  research  over  time.  The  NIH,  of  course,  provides  support  for
many economics projects with more immediate significance for pub-
lic health.

I believe a source of missed research opportunities is the gap be-
tween  economists  and  some  of  the  other  social  and  behavioral  sci-
entists  including  my  colleagues  here,  who  design,  implement,  and
evaluate  public  health  interventions.  For  example,  some  emerging
research  is  exploring  the  use  of  monetary  incentives  to  reduce
smoking  and  illicit  drug  use.  Increasingly,  behavioral  economists
integrate  insights  from  psychology  into  standard  economic  models
of  consumer  behavior.  Data  from  intervention  research  could  pro-
vide a rich source to testing predictions from behavioral health eco-
nomics.

I will stop with my comments there. Thank you very much.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

32

[The prepared statement of Dr. Kenkel follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DONALD S. KENKEL

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  about  ‘‘The  Role  of  Social  Sciences  in
Public  Health.’’  I  am  convinced  that  the  social  sciences  in  general,  and  economics
in  particular,  have  much  to  offer  to  help  improve  our  nation’s  health.  Nobel  Prize-
winning  economist  Gary  Becker  has  argued  that:  ‘‘Economic  theory  is  not  a  game
played  by  clever  academicians  but  is  a  powerful  tool  to  analyze  the  real  world.’’  To
inform  public  health  policy,  empirical  health  economists  like  myself  combine  eco-
nomic  theory  with  the  careful  analysis  of  data  to  try  to  quantify  the  impact  of  var-
ious influences on individual health behaviors.

Health  economics  is  a  relatively  young  sub-field  of  economics,  and  in  its  early
days  was  sometimes  instead  called  ‘‘medical  economics’’  or  ‘‘health  care  economics.’’
Today,  many  health  economists  continue  to  focus  on  the  financing  and  delivery  of
health  care.  These  economists  explore  important  questions  about  physician  behav-
ior,  the  hospital  industry,  and  private  and  public  health  insurance,  to  name  just  a
few  areas  of  health  care  sector  research.  However,  many  key  health  behaviors  are
outside  the  health  care  sector.  Current  estimates  suggest  that  almost  half  of  all
deaths in the U.S. can be traced to cigarette smoking, sedentary lifestyles and obe-
sity, and alcohol consumption.1 An exciting and productive line of research uses the
tools of economics to better understand the determinants of these health behaviors.
To give an idea of how productive: my colleague John Cawley and I recently co-edit-
ed  a  collection  of  the  most  important  and  interesting  papers  in  the  economics  of
health  behaviors.2 The  collection  runs  to  three  volumes  and  includes  85  academic
studies written by health economists from the U.S. and across the world.

Another  way  to  view  the  field  of  health  economics  is  that  health  care  sector  eco-
nomics  is  mainly  about  ‘‘cure,’’  while  the  economics  of  health  behaviors  is  mainly
about  ‘‘prevention.’’  There  is  an  old  saying  that  an  ounce  of  prevention  is  worth  a
pound of cure. Health economists have not been able to quantify the benefits of pre-
vention  quite  so  precisely.  In  fact,  investing  in  prevention  will  not  necessarily  re-
duce aggregate health care spending. But our public policy goal is not simply to con-
tain  health  care  costs,  but  to  spend  our  health  care  dollars  well.  Preventing  deaths
due  to  smoking,  obesity,  and  other  unhealthy  behaviors  can  help  the  U.S.  get  the
most value from the societal resources we invest in health.

The economic approach to human behavior emphasizes that people respond to in-
centives.  The  consequences  for  their  health  can  provide  people  with  strong  incen-
tives to quit an unhealthy behavior like smoking or to start a healthy behavior like
regular  exercise.  However,  the  health  consequences  only  matter  if  people  know
about them. I’ve contributed to a line of health economics research that studies how
health  information  shapes  health  behaviors.  The  history  of  smoking  in  the  U.S.  is
a  good  example.  Since  the  1964  Surgeon  General’s  Report  on  the  health  con-
sequences of smoking, the prevalence of smoking among U.S. adults has fallen from
over  40  percent  to  about  21  percent.3 Econometric  studies  suggest  that  improved
consumer information about the risks of smoking led to part of this drop: when they
learned smoking was unhealthy, many people quit smoking, and others didn’t start
in  the  first  place.  These  studies  exploit  information  ‘‘shocks’’—discrete  events  like
the  publication  of  the  1964  Surgeon  General’s  Report  that  provided  people  with
more  health  information.  International  studies  suggest  that  similar  information
shocks  also  reduced  smoking  in  other  countries.4 In  a  study  I  completed  earlier  in
my  career,  I  found  that  information  appears  to  be  an  important  incentive  to  adopt
healthier behaviors related to smoking, drinking, and exercise.5

1 Mokdad,  A.H.,  Marks,  J.S.,  Stroup,  D.F.,  and  Gerberding,  J.L.  (2004).  Actual  Causes  of

Death in the United States: 2000. JAMA 291 (10): 1238–1245.

2 Cawley,  John  and  Donald  Kenkel,  co-editors  (2008).  The  Economics  of  Health  Behaviours,
Volumes I–III. The International Library of Critical Writings in Economics, An Elgar Reference
Collection. Edward Elgar Publishing: Northampton, MA.

3 Rock,  V.J.,  A.  Malarcher,  J.W.  Kahende,  et  al.  (2007).  ‘‘Cigarette  Smoking  Among  Adults—

United States, 2006.’’ Morbidity and Mortality Weekly Report 56 (44): 1157–1161.

4 Kenkel,  Donald  and  Likwang  Chen  (2000).  ‘‘Consumer  Information  and  Tobacco  Use.’’  In:
Jha  P  and  FJ  Chaloupka,  Editors.  Tobacco  Control  in  Developing  Countries.  Oxford  University
Press, pp. 177–214.

5 Kenkel, Donald (1991). ‘‘Health Behavior, Health Knowledge, and Schooling,’’ Journal of Po-

litical Economy 99 (2): 287–305.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

33

My colleagues and I recently completed an empirical study of the impact of phar-
maceutical  industry  advertising  on  smoking  cessation  decisions.6 Although  many
smokers quit ‘cold turkey’ without assistance, medical research shows that smokers
are  more  likely  to  successfully  quit  if  they  use  a  pharmaceutical  smoking  cessation
product such as a nicotine replacement therapy. The cessation product industry’s es-
timated retail sales are nearly $1 billion annually. In recent years the industry has
spent  between  $100  to  $200  million  annually  advertising  these  products.  In  other
health-related  markets,  producer  advertising  has  been  shown  to  be  an  important
source  of  health  information  that  prompted  people  to  consume  more  dietary  fiber
and  less  saturated  fat.7 Similarly,  we  find  that  the  more  magazine  advertisements
smokers  see  for  products  like  the  nicotine  patch,  the  more  likely  they  are  to  try  to
quit  smoking  and  to  be  successful.  Based  on  our  results,  we  estimate  that  if  the
smoking  cessation  product  industry  increases  its  average  annual  expenditures  on
magazine  advertising  by  10  percent,  the  result  would  be  about  225,000  new  at-
tempts to quit and 80,000 successful quits each year.

The prices consumers have to pay for health-related goods also provide important
incentives  that  influence  health  behaviors.  Dozens  of  econometric  studies  estimate
the  price-responsiveness  of  demand  for  alcoholic  beverages  and  cigarettes.  I’ve  con-
tributed  to  both  lines  of  research.  In  research  funded  by  the  National  Institute  on
Alcohol Abuse on Alcoholism, I found evidence that even heavy drinking falls when
alcoholic  beverage  prices  increase,  although  there  may  be  a  subset  of  very  heavy
drinkers who are not responsive.8 This is consistent with other research that shows
that  higher  prices  reduce  alcohol-related  consequences  including  liver  cirrhosis
death rates and drunk driving. Research funding from the National Cancer Institute
helped  my  colleagues  and  I  launch  a  series  of  studies  on  the  effects  of  higher  ciga-
rette  prices  on  youth  smoking.9 Higher  cigarette  prices  potentially  reduce  smoking
through three channels: by preventing youth from starting; by encouraging smokers
to  quit;  and  by  encouraging  smokers  to  cut  down  their  daily  consumption.  Our  re-
search,  and  research  in  several  other  countries,  call  into  question  whether  higher
prices  are  really  very  effective  in  preventing  youth  from  starting.  Although  the  im-
plications  of  our  findings  are  still  controversial,  they  tend  to  suggest  that  the  main
effect  of  higher  prices  is  through  encouraging  smokers  to  either  cut  down  or  quit.
By providing new insights about what influences health behaviors, health econom-
ics research helps shape public policies such as marketing restrictions or taxes that
have broad effects on consumers and thus on public health. In contrast, other social
and  behavioral  sciences  study  more  targeted  interventions,  such  as  an  individual-
level intervention to help smokers quit, or a school-level intervention to prevent ado-
lescents from abusing alcohol. Targeted interventions play an important role in pub-
lic  health  and  can  yield  highly  visible  success  stories  of  individuals  whose  health
was  improved.  Broad  public  policies  can  also  yield  important  health  improvements,
but  the  success  stories  are  found  in  data  that  might  show  that  the  population  rate
of smoking cessation increased over time, or that the population rate of drunk driv-
ing fell.

Health economics research on the role of health information has important impli-
cations for broad public policies. In addition to directly providing information, other
policies  such  as  marketing  regulations  affect  the  flow  of  health  information  to  con-
sumers.  Our  study  of  smoking  cessation  product  advertising  is  part  of  a  growing
body  of  evidence  that  direct-to-consumer  ads  increase  consumer  demand  for  a  vari-
ety  of  pharmaceutical  products.  The  U.S.  and  New  Zealand  are  the  only  countries
that  allow  DTC  advertising  of  prescription  pharmaceutical  products.  Even  in  these
two  countries,  DTC  ads  are  strictly  regulated.  In  the  U.S.  this  had  led  to  an  ironic
situation:  in  some  ways,  ads  for  prescription  pharmaceutical  products  for  smoking

6 Avery,  Rosemary,  Donald  Kenkel,  Dean  Lillard,  and  Alan  Mathios  (2007).  ‘‘Private  Profits
and Public Health: Does Advertising Smoking Cessation Products Encourage Smokers to Quit?’’
Journal of Political Economy 115 (3): 447–481.

7 Ippolito, Pauline M. and Alan Mathios (1990) ‘‘Information, Advertising and Health Choices:
A  Study  of  the  Cereal  Market.’’  RAND  Journal  of  Economics  21  (3):459–480.  Ippolito,  P.  and
Mathios,  A.,  (1995)  ‘‘Information  and  Advertising:  The  Case  of  Fat  Consumption  in  the  United
States,’’ American Economic Review: Papers and Proceedings, 85 (2) May.

8 Kenkel,  Donald  (1993).  ‘‘Drinking,  Driving,  and  Deterrence:  The  Effectiveness  and  Social
Costs  of  Alternative  Policies,’’  Journal  of  Law  and  Economics,  pp.  877–913.  Kenkel,  Donald
(1996). ‘‘New Estimates of the Optimal Tax on Alcohol,’’ Economic Inquiry 34: 296–319.

9 DeCicca, Philip, Donald Kenkel, and Alan Mathios (2002). ‘‘Putting Out the Fires: Will High-
er  Taxes  Reduce  the  Onset  of  Youth  Smoking?’’  Journal  of  Political  Economy  110  (1):  144–169.
DeCicca,  Phillip,  Donald  Kenkel,  Alan  Mathios,  Yoon-Jeong  Shin,  and  Jae-Young  Lim  (2008).
‘‘Youth Smoking, Cigarette Prices, and Anti-Smoking Sentiment.’’ Health Economics 17 (6): 733–
749. DeCicca, Philip, Donald Kenkel, and Alan Mathios (2008). ‘‘Cigarette Taxes and the Transi-
tion  from  Youth  to  Adult  Smoking:  Smoking  Initiation,  Cessation,  and  Participation.’’  Journal
of Health Economics 27 (4): 904–917.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

34

cessation have been more heavily regulated than cigarette advertisements. Food and
Drug Administration (FDA) regulations require prescription smoking cessation prod-
uct  ads  in  magazines  to  include  at  least  an  extra  page  of  disclosures  about  side  ef-
fects and contraindications; cigarette ads are only required to carry a short warning
label.  Easing  regulations  on  ads  for  smoking  cessation  products  could  exploit  more
fully  the  profit  incentives  to  promote  public  health.  Ads  for  other  pharmaceutical
products,  such  as  statins  to  treat  high  cholesterol,  have  similar  potential.  Because
the  potential  gains  and  harms  from  advertising  vary  widely  across  products,  it
might  make  sense  for  the  FDA  to  adopt  a  more  flexible  approach  to  regulate  DTC
advertising.

More  generally,  when  crafting  public  policy  it  is  important  to  keep  in  mind  the
private incentives to improve public health. People want to live healthier and longer
lives,  and  private  sector  firms  can  earn  profits  helping  them  do  so.  Public  policies
should be structured to facilitate rather than impede the public health gains enjoyed
when firms pursue private profits.

As  mentioned  above,  many  econometric  studies  estimate  the  price-responsiveness
of  consumer  demand  for  alcoholic  beverages  and  cigarettes.  Because  prices  can  be
manipulated  by  imposing  excise  taxes,  these  estimates  also  have  implications  for
public health policy. The National Institute on Alcohol Abuse and Alcoholism’s Spe-
cial  Reports  to  Congress  on  Alcohol  and  Health  and  the  Surgeon  General’s  Reports
on  Tobacco  and  Health  regularly  review  econometric  studies  of  the  price-  or  tax-re-
sponsiveness of alcohol and cigarette demand.

Health  economics  research  takes  on  hard  research  questions  about  the  impact  of
public  policies  on  health  behaviors.  Typically  we  use  observational  data  and  try  to
identify  natural  quasi-experiments  created,  for  example,  by  events  or  changes  in
policies. While I believe health economics research provides useful guidance for pol-
icy,  it  is  important  to  keep  these  limitations  in  mind.  For  example,  over  the  past
few  decades  the  Federal  Government  and  the  States  have  launched  massive  and
varied public policy campaigns to reduce smoking. As various policies have been en-
acted, smoking rates have fallen and public anti-smoking sentiment has grown. Yet
teasing  out  the  direction  of  causality  and  the  contribution  of  specific  policies  is  ex-
tremely difficult. An example is the controversy I mentioned earlier about the price-
responsiveness  of  youth  smoking.  Youth  smoking  rates  remain  higher  in  the  to-
bacco-producing  states,  which  until  recent  years  have  rarely  increased  cigarette
taxes. Are youth smoking rates high in these states because cigarette taxes are low?
Or  are  cigarette  taxes  low  because  smoking  is  part  of  the  culture  in  these  states?
Social science research also contributes to public policy when it reminds us of the
wisdom of the comment: ‘‘It ain’t so much the things we don’t know that get us into
trouble,  it’s  the  things  we  do  know  that  just  ain’t  so.’’ 10 This  in  turn  reminds  me
of  the  almost  inevitable  comment  at  the  end  of  academic  papers:  ‘‘More  research  is
needed.’’  This  academic  comment  is  not  an  admission  of  failure,  but  reflects  how
science progresses. Answers to hard research questions are re-examined and probed,
leading to new questions and better answers.

Because  it  is  still  a  young  field,  it  is  not  surprising  that  basic  research  questions
on  the  economics  of  health  behaviors  remain  unanswered.  Recently,  some  of  the
questions  receiving  the  most  attention  concern  health  disparities  related  to  socio-
economic  status.  Again,  smoking  provides  a  stark  example—it  is  increasingly  true
that smokers are more likely to have lower incomes and less schooling. For example,
in  2006  about  35  percent  of  high  school  dropouts  smoked,  compared  to  only  about
10  percent  of  college  graduates  and  less  than  seven  percent  of  those  with  graduate
degrees.  Why  is  this  the  case?  One  hypothesis  is  that  people  with  more  schooling
are better able to gather and process information about the health risks of smoking.
This explanation is supported by the fact that in the 1950s—before medical research
firmly  established  the  health  risks  of  smoking—college  graduates  were  about  as
likely  to  smoke  as  those  with  less  schooling.  But  this  explanation  is  hard  to  rec-
oncile with the persistence of the schooling gap in smoking 50 years later, when vir-
tually  everyone  understands  that  smoking  kills.  Health  economists  are  exploring
other explanations, such as the idea that there are other hard-to-observe differences
between people with different levels of schooling.

Understanding  the  schooling-smoking  link  might  provide  a  case  study  for  under-
standing  the  links  between  schooling  and  health  more  generally.  If  schooling  helps
people  make  healthier  choices,  investments  in  schooling  could  also  pay  off  in  the
form of reductions in obesity or other health problems. If other hard-to-observe fac-
tors are the root causes of both low schooling attainment and unhealthy choices, in-
vestments in more schooling may not be enough.

10 Attributed to Artemus Ward, American humorist, 1834–1867.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

35

Research  on  the  economics  of  health  behaviors  requires  data  on  health  behaviors
and on the factors that influence them. Federal and State governments’ data collec-
tion  efforts  are  a  very  valuable  resource  for  this  research,  including  the  National
Health  Interview  Survey,  the  Behavioral  Risk  Factor  Surveillance  Surveys,  the
Youth Risk Behavior Surveillance System, and the Tobacco Use Supplements to the
Current  Population  Survey.  Federal  support  for  ongoing  longitudinal  studies—in-
cluding  the  Panel  Study  of  Income  Dynamics,  the  Health  and  Retirement  Survey,
the  National  Longitudinal  Surveys  of  Youth,  and  the  National  Longitudinal  Study
of Adolescent Health—provides especially useful data to follow individual health be-
haviors  over  time.  Health  economists  often  use  data  from  ongoing  collections  to
study health behaviors before and after a natural quasi-experiment in policy or cir-
cumstances.  Innovations  in  data  collection,  such  as  the  collecting  biomarkers,
present  opportunities  to  move  health  economic  research  in  exciting  new  directions.
The  National  Institutes  of  Health  and  the  National  Science  Foundation  also  pro-
vide  important  resources  for  health  economics  research  through  supporting  investi-
gator-initiated data collection. The National Institute of Health’s data sharing policy
‘‘expects  and  supports  the  timely  release  and  sharing  of  final  research  data  from
NIH-supported  studies  for  use  by  other  researchers.’’  Data  sharing  is  essential  for
the  scientific  process.  With  data  sharing,  NIH  and  NSF  support  help  not  only  the
funded investigators, but can also prompt other researchers to replicate and extend
the  original  data  analysis,  and  to  use  the  data  in  new  ways  to  ask  different  ques-
tions.

An applied field like health economics relies on insights from economic theory and
uses  tools  and  methods  developed  in  econometric  theory.  NSF  support  for  even
seemingly  esoteric  research  topics  in  economic  and  econometric  theory  improves
health economics research over time. The NIH provides support for many economics
projects  with  more  immediate  significance  for  public  health.  Unfortunately,  some-
times  important  research  falls  in  between  the  cracks.  For  example,  developing  new
econometric  methods  for  the  analysis  of  data  on  health  behaviors  might  seem  ‘‘too
applied’’  to  NSF  reviewers  but  at  the  same  time  seem  ‘‘too  theoretical’’  to  NIH  re-
viewers.  Educating  NSF  and  NIH  reviewers  about  each  other’s  missions  could  help
better integrate federal funding for health economics research.

Another  source  of  missed  research  opportunities  is  the  gap  between  economists
and the social and behavioral scientists who design, implement, and evaluate public
health interventions. It is increasingly common for health economists to be involved
near  the  end  of  these  research  projects,  when  they  conduct  cost-effectiveness  anal-
yses of the interventions. This is an encouraging trend, and the results of cost-effec-
tiveness  analyses  help  to  maximize  the  health  benefits  from  limited  budgets  for
interventions.  As  social  scientists,  however,  economists  could  also  be  usefully  in-
volved  earlier  in  the  research  design.  For  example,  some  emerging  research  is  ex-
ploring  the  use  of  monetary  incentives  to  reduce  smoking  and  illicit  drug  use.  Be-
havioral economists integrate insights from psychology into standard economic mod-
els  of  consumer  behavior.  Data  from  intervention  research  could  provide  a  rich
source to testing predictions from behavioral health economics.

BIOGRAPHY FOR DONALD S. KENKEL

Donald  S.  Kenkel  is  a  Professor  in  the  Department  of  Policy  Analysis  and  Man-
agement at Cornell University, and a Research Associate of the National Bureau of
Economic  Research.  His  expertise  is  in  areas  of  health  economics  and  public  sector
economics.  Broadly  speaking,  most  of  his  research  is  on  the  economics  of  disease
prevention  and  health  promotion.  He  is  the  author  of  the  chapter  on  ‘‘Prevention’’
in  the  Handbook  of  Health  Economics.  He  has  conducted  a  series  of  studies  on  the
economics of public health policies, including: alcohol taxes and other policies to pre-
vent  alcohol  problems  (Journal  of  Applied  Econometrics  2001,  American  Economic
Review Papers & Proceedings 2005); cigarette taxes to prevent youth smoking (Jour-
nal of Political Economy 2002); and advertising to promote smoking cessation (Jour-
nal of Regulatory Economics 2007 and Journal of Political Economy 2007). Another
area  of  research  and  teaching  interest  is  in  cost-benefit  analysis  of  public  policies,
especially  policies  that  affect  health.  His  research  has  been  funded  by  the  National
Institute  on  Alcohol  Abuse  and  Alcoholism,  the  National  Cancer  Institute,  the  Na-
tional  Institute  on  Child  Health  and  Development,  as  well  as  private  foundations.

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you.
Dr. Koenig.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

36

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  HAROLD  G.  KOENIG,  PROFESSOR  OF  PSY-
CHIATRY  AND  BEHAVIORAL  SCIENCES;  ASSOCIATE  PRO-
FESSOR  OF  MEDICINE;  DIRECTOR  OF  THE  CENTER  FOR
THEOLOGY, SPIRITUALITY, AND HEALTH, DUKE UNIVERSITY
Dr. KOENIG. Thank you, Mr. Baird.
I  am  going  to  speak  on  religion,  spirituality,  and  public  health.
In overviewing this topic I would like to say that the United States
is  a  very  religious  and  spiritual  nation.  Stress  and  depression  are
common  and  increasing  in  our  country.  Stress  affects  physical
health  and  need  for  health  services.  Many  turn  to  religion  when
stressed,  facing  sickness,  or  disability.  Religion  and  spirituality
may  reduce  stress,  reduce  depression,  enhance  quality  of  life,  may
be  related  to  less  alcohol  and  drug  abuse,  less  crime,  delinquency,
related to better health behaviors, healthier lifestyles, better phys-
ical  health,  faster  recovery,  and  less  need  for  health  services.  May
also enhance the community’s resiliency after disaster or terrorism.
Implications for public health and patient care, I will make some
of  those  and  make  some  recommendations  as  well.  Ninety-three
percent of Americans believe in God or a higher power. Eighty-nine
percent  report  a  religious  affiliation.  Eighty-three  percent  say  it
is—that religion is very, is fairly or very important to them. About
two-thirds  of  Americans  are  members  of  a  church  or  synagogue  or
mosque. Fifty-eight percent pray every day, and 75 percent pray at
least  weekly.  Nearly  half  of  the  country  attends  church  at  least
monthly, and 42 percent weekly.

We  know  that  there  is  increased  stress  due  to  the  recent  eco-
nomic downturn. We know that depression is increasing due to loss
of jobs and homes. We know that debt is increasing, and people are
not  saving.  We  know  that  youth  are  facing  many,  many  choices
with very few absolute guides by which to guide their behavior and
their  choices.  The  population  is  aging,  facing  increasing  health
problems, fewer saving for retirement, and that is creating fear.

We  know  that  stress  and  depression  affect  physical  health  and
use  of  health  services,  that  diseases  like  heart  attacks,  hyper-
tension,  stroke,  infection,  wound  healing,  the  aging  process  itself
appears  to  be  affected  by  stress  and  depression,  and  all  of  that  in-
creases hospital stays and need for health services.

Many in the U.S. turn to religion to cope with stress and illness.
After  September  11,  90  percent  of  Americans  turned  to  religion.
That was reported in the New England Journal of Medicine. Ninety
percent of hospitalized patients rely on religion to cope, and nearly
half in some areas of the country say that it is the most important
factor  that  keeps  them  going.  Hundreds  of  quantitative  and  quali-
tative studies report similar findings.

Research  on  religion,  spirituality  and  health  is  increasing  dra-
matically.  Prior  to  the  year  2000,  if  you  did  an  online  search,  you
would  find  that  there  were  about  6,282  scientific  articles  on  the
topic.  In  the  last  seven  to  eight  years  that  has  increased  to  over
7,000  articles.  Just  in  the  last  seven  to  eight  years  those  are  the
number of articles. About 20 percent of those are original research
studies.  So  to  date  there  are  nearly  3,000  studies  looking  at  these
relationships.  More  research  has  been  conducted  recently  than  in
a long time previous to the year 2000.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

37

Now,  religious  involvement  can  buffer  stress,  reduce  depression,
enhance  quality  of  life.  Of  324  studies  looking  at  depression,  204
find significantly less depression or faster recovery from depression
in  those  who  are  more  religious.  Of  359  studies  looking  at  well-
being,  happiness,  meaning,  purpose,  hope,  278  show  significantly
more  positive  emotions  in  the  religious.  With  regard  to  increased
quality of life, 20 of 29 recent studies showing that.

Here is just an example of some of the research showing that re-
ligious  involvement  affects  the  recovery  rates  for  depression  over
time when you follow people.

Religion  is  also  related  to  less  drug  and  alcohol  use,  especially
among  the  young.  Of  324  studies,  276  show  significantly  lower
rates,  less  delinquency  and  crime  found  in  40  of  52  studies.  These
are  all  peer  review  studies  quantitative,  original  research  pub-
lished in science journals.

Religion  is  related  to  less  cigarette  smoking,  especially  among
the young. Fifty of 58 studies show that. Religious persons are also
more  likely  to  exercise.  Unfortunately,  it  is  not  related  to  diet  and
weight.  So  whatever  reason  that  is,  but  also  religion  is  related  to
less  extra-marital  sex  and  safer  sexual  practices  with  regard  to
fewer partners. So 45 of 46 studies show those relationships.

Here  is  a  slide  I  don’t  show  in  North  Carolina,  but  I  will  show
it here. Religious attendance and cigarette smoking. Clearly people
attending  services  more  aren’t  as  likely  to  smoke.  Religion  is  re-
lated  to  better  physical  health  and  recovery  from  illness.  Here  is
a list of the different diseases which are less frequent among those
who  are  more  religious.  This  is  just  an  example  of  survival  after
open  heart  surgery.  This  is  out  of  Dartmouth.  You  can  see  that
those  with  high  religious  support  and  high  social  support  have
much lower rates of death during the six months after surgery.

This  is  a  national  sample  of  twenty  thousand  people  looking  at
life expectancy. Among whites the length of survival is seven years
longer  among  those  attending  services  compared  to  those  who
aren’t. Among African-Americans it extends to 14 years longer. Re-
ligious  persons  need  and  use  less  health  care  services  as  well.  Be-
cause  there  is  greater  marital  stability,  there  is  more  social  sup-
port,  they  are  healthier,  and  that  translates  into  shorter  hospital
stays,  fewer  hospital  days,  and  less  time  spent  in  nursing  homes
because people are kept in the community longer.

Here  is  an  example  just  of  the  length  of  hospital  stay  at  Duke
Hospital based on religious affiliation alone. Here is looking at days
spent  in  long-term  care  after  hospital  discharge.  In  African-Ameri-
cans  that  means  fifty  days  in  the  10-month  period  following  dis-
charge compared to five days.

Religion  enhances  community  resiliency  to  disaster  and  ter-
rorism,  helps  people  to  cope  with  stress  from  an  individual  level,
helps long-term adaptation. At the community level religious orga-
nizations  are  present  in  every  community.  Clergy  are  oftentimes
the  first  responders.  Religious  communities  are  often  present  over
the  long-term  after  many  other  agencies  leave,  and  many  national
religious organizations are active in disaster response.

So what? So what? You can’t convert everybody or make them re-
ligious,  but  there  are  numerous  direct  public  health  and  patient
care  implications  which  have  nothing  to  do  with  prescribing  reli-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

38

gion, endorsing religion, or overstepping the bounds of church-state
separation guaranteed by the First Amendment.

Here  are  some  implications  for  public  health.  More  research  is
needed,  we  don’t  understand  the  mechanisms.  Even  small  health
effects  are  likely  to  lead  to  big,  public  health  impact,  given  that
there  are  200  million  church  members,  125  million  weekly
attenders.

While  not  ethical  or  desirable  to  change  a  person’s  religion  or
spirituality,  we  need  to  know  this  information  for  planning  health
services. They also discover information that are useful for enhanc-
ing  health  interventions  in  non-religious  people,  using  secular
interventions.  Congregations  are  one  of  the  few  places  where  per-
sons of all ages and races, and economic levels meet regularly. You
can  do  screening  there,  and  health  education.  Ideal  place  to  edu-
cate  youth  with  regard  to  substance  abuse;  stress  reduction  and
healthy  lifestyle  education  for  the  middle-aged;  and  training  for
volunteering  and  mentorship  for  the  elderly.  Altruism  is  a  basic
value for churches, and here is potential volunteers to support pro-
grams in the community during disasters and non-disaster periods.
Many implications for patient health. Religion may help patients
to  cope  with  illness,  may  affect  their  health  outcomes.  Many  pa-
tients  want  their  religion  acknowledged,  patients  have  spiritual
needs,  and  patients  are  often  isolated  from  sources  of  religious
help.  Religious  beliefs  influence  medical  decision-making  and  com-
pliance  with  treatment.  Religious  communities  support  patients  in
the  community.  We  want  health  care  professionals  to  take  a  brief
spiritual  history,  support  the  patient’s  beliefs  and  practices,  iden-
tify their spiritual needs, and refer them to appropriate people.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Dr.  Koenig,  I  am  going  to  ask  you  to  conclude
at  this  point,  because  we  are  about  four  minutes  over.  We  will  get
to  some  of  these  issues  in  a  second.  If  you  one  or  two  final  com-
ments but——

Dr. KOENIG. Okay. There are many recommendations as you can
see  for  Congress  here  in  terms  of  research,  in  terms  of  supporting
congregational  health  programs,  in  terms  of  educating  the  public,
and in terms of integrating faith-based organizations in disaster re-
sponse.

Thank you very much.
[The prepared statement of Dr. Koenig follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HAROLD G. KOENIG

Religion, Spirituality and Public Health: Research,

Applications, and Recommendations

Summary

This  report  reviews  original  research  published  in  social,  psychological,  behav-
ioral, nursing and medical journals since the 1800s that has examined relationships
between  religion/spirituality  (R/S)  and  the  health  of  individuals  and  populations.  I
describe (1) the prevalence of religious beliefs and practices in United States; (2) the
increasing stress in America and negative effects on physical health; (3) the role R/
S play in coping with stress and physical illness; (4) the relationships between reli-
gious  involvement,  stress,  and  depression;  (5)  the  relationships  between  religion,
substance  abuse,  and  health  behaviors;  (6)  the  relationships  between  religion  and
physical  health;  (7)  the  impact  on  need  for  medical  care  and  use  of  health  services;
and  (8)  the  effects  on  community  resiliency  following  natural  disasters  and  acts  of
terrorism.  This  review  suggests  that  as  many  as  3,000  quantitative  studies  have

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

39

now examined relationships between R/S and health (mental and physical), the ma-
jority  reporting  positive  findings.  I  examine  the  implications  this  research  has  for
public health and patient care, and make recommendations that could lead to a bet-
ter understanding of these relationships and to applications that may improve pub-
lic  health,  promote  community  resiliency,  enhance  patient  care,  and  lighten  the
ever-increasing  economic  burden  of  providing  health  care  and  protecting  our  popu-
lation.

Introduction

Until  recently,  scientists  have  largely  avoided  studying  the  relationship  between
religion and health. A young faculty member wishing to examine these relationships
was  often  told  that  conducting  such  research  amounted  to  an  ‘‘anti-tenure’’  factor.
Furthermore,  there  was  little  if  any  funding  from  NSF/NIH  to  support  such  re-
search. Religious beliefs and behaviors were largely thought of as too subjective, not
quantifiable,  unscientific,  and  based  in  fantasy  and  infantile  projections  or  illusion
(Freud).  As  a  result,  health  professionals  today  ignore  their  patients’  religious  or
spiritual needs, and have little appreciation for their relationship to health.

Times  are  changing.  There  has  been  a  tremendous  surge  in  research  examining
relationships  between  religion,  spirituality,  and  health  (95  percent  conducted  with-
out  funding).  Research  on  this  subject  carried  out  prior  to  the  year  2000  has  been
systematically reviewed in the Handbook of Religion and Health (Oxford University
Press,  2001).  That  review  uncovered  over  1200  studies  published  in  a  wide  array
for  psychological,  behavioral,  medical,  nursing,  sociological,  and  public  health  jour-
nals.  During  the  time  since  publication  of  this  book,  the  amount  of  research  on  the
subject  has  increased  dramatically.  An  online  search  using  the  keywords  ‘‘spiritu-
ality’’  and  ‘‘religion’’  between  2000  and  2008  in  PsychInfo  (the  American  Psycho-
logical Association’s online database of research in the psychological, social, and be-
havioral  sciences)  recently  uncovered  7,145  scientific  articles  (about  20  percent  re-
porting  original  research).  Repeating  the  same  search  but  restricting  the  years  to
1806 to 1999, uncovered 6,282 articles. Thus, more research on religion, spirituality
and health has been published in the past seven to eight years than was published
in  the  nearly  200  years  before  that.  Covering  this  massive  research  base,  then,  is
a daunting task.

The  present  report  reviews  original  research  conducted  in  the  social,  psycho-
logical,  behavioral,  and  medical  sciences  that  has  examined  relationships  between
religion/spirituality (R/S), and health. Where individual studies are cited, these rep-
resent  some  of  the  best  work  on  the  topic  in  terms  of  research  design.  They  often
utilize large representative population-based or clinical samples, control for relevant
confounders,  and  employ  distinctive,  uncontaminated  measures  of  religion/spiritu-
ality  (R/S).  Most  studies  are  observational  in  research  design,  although  a  small
number  of  clinical  trials  are  included.  Some  aspects  of  this  review  are  systematic
(for  example,  studies  on  depression,  positive  emotions,  substance  abuse,  delin-
quency,  health  behaviors),  while  others  are  not.  For  example,  studies  reported  on
physical  health  outcomes  have  been  chosen  to  illustrate  the  kinds  of  studies  pub-
lished,  but  the  review  is  not  systematic.  A  complete  systematic  review  of  this  area
is now underway (Handbook of Religion and Health, 2nd edition, Oxford University
Press, 2011).

Below I examine (1) the prevalence of religious beliefs and practices in the United
States; (2) the increasing stress in our population and the negative effects of stress/
depression  on  physical  health;  (3)  the  role  that  R/S  plays  in  coping  with  stress  and
physical illness; (4) the relationships between religious involvement, stress, and de-
pression; (5) the relationships between religion, substance abuse, and health behav-
iors; (6) the relationships between religious involvement and physical health; (7) the
impact  on  need  for  medical  care  and  use  of  health  services;  and  (8)  the  effects  that
religious  involvement  has  on  community  resiliency  following  natural  disasters  and
acts of terrorism. Next, I examine the implications of this research for public health
and  clinical  practice.  Finally,  I  make  a  series  of  recommendations  for  Members  of
Congress to consider.

Facts to Ponder
• The United States is a very religious nation:
Fact  #1:  93  percent  of  Americans  believe  in  God  or  a  higher  power,  according
to a Gallup Poll conducted in May 2008, (see website: http://www.gallup.com/poll/
109108/Belief-God-Far-Lower-Western-US.aspx).
Fact #2: 89 percent of Americans report affiliation with a religious organiza-
tion  (82  percent  Christian,  i.e.,  Protestant  or  Catholic),  according  to  a  representa-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

40

tive  national  survey  conducted  by  Baylor  Institute  for  Studies  of  Religion  in  Sep-
tember  2006  (see  website:  http://www.baylor.edu/content/services/document.php/
33304.pdf).  Same  figures  reported  by  Gallup  Poll  in  December  2007  (see  website:
http://www.gallup.com/poll/103459/Questions-Answers-About-Americans-Reli-
gion.aspx)
Fact  #3:  83  percent  of  Americans  say  religion  is  fairly  or  very  important  to
them,  according  to  a  September  2006  Gallup  Poll  (latest  data  available)  (see
website: 
http://www.gallup.com/poll/25585/Religion-Most-Important-Blacks-
Women-Older-Americans.aspx)
Fact  #4: 62 percent of Americans say that they are members of a church or
synagogue,  according  to  a  December  2007  Gallup  Poll  (latest  data  available)  (see
website:  http://www.gallup.com/poll/103459/Questions-Answers-About-Americans-
Religion.aspx)
Fact #5: 58 percent of Americans pray every day (and 75 percent at least week-
ly),  according  to  a  2008  U.S.  Religious  Landscape  Survey  (see  website:  http://reli-
gions.pewforum.org/)
Fact #6: 42 percent of Americans attend religious services weekly or almost
weekly  (and  55  percent  attend  at  least  monthly),  according  to  aggregate  Gallup
Pools  in  2007  (see  website:  http://www.gallup.com/poll/105544/Easter-Season-
Finds-Religious-Largely-Christian-Nation.aspx).
• Stress and depression are common in American society, especially due to the recent
economic  downturn.  Both  stress  and  depression  worsen  when  people  develop  med-
ical illness and health problems.

Fact  #1:  Stress  levels,  and  likely  stress-related  disorders,  are  increasing  in
the  United  States,  based  on  Associated  Press-AOL  poll  (see  website:  http://
www.aolhealth.com/healthy-living/debt-stress;  also  see:  http://www.usatoday.com/
news/health/2007-10-23-stress¥N.htm)
Fact  #2:  Rates of significant depression in the community are about five to
ten  percent,  and  place  a  substantial  burden  on  the  economy  due  to  cost  of
treating  depression  and  time  lost  from  work  due  to  depression-related  disability
(Journal of the American Medical Association 2002, 287:203–209; Journal of Clinical
Psychiatry 2003m 64:1465–1475; PharmacoEconomics 2007, 25:7–24)
Fact  #3:  Nearly 50 percent of hospitalized medical patients develop depres-
sive disorder, usually due to the prolonged stress and life changes caused by med-
ical problems (American Journal of Psychiatry 1997; 154:1376–1383)
• Stress  and  depression  have  effects  on  physical  health  and  need  for  health  services
Fact #1: Psychological stress and depression adversely affect health. This ap-
plies  to  a  wide  range  of  medical  outcomes  (hypertension,  myocardial  infarction,
stroke,  speed  of  wound  healing,  etc.),  and  may  even  affect  the  aging  process  itself
(based on changes at the DNA level) (Lancet 1996, 346:1194–1196 (wound healing);
New England Journal of Medicine 1998, 338:171–179 (general review); Lancet 2003,
362:604–609  (prognosis  after  myocardial  infarction);  Proceedings  of  the  National
Academy of Sciences 2004,101:17312–5 (cellular aging) )
Fact  #2:  Depression  increases  length  of  hospital  stay  and  cost  of  medical
services,  in  addition  to  adversely  affecting  the  quality  of  life  of  the  patient  and
their  family  (American  Journal  of  Psychiatry  1998,  55:871–877;  Social  Psychiatry
and  Psychiatric  Epidemiology  2004,  39:293–298;  for  more  recent  information,  see
the following NIH report: http://www.nih.gov/news/pr/jan2007/nimh-19.htm)
• Many in the United States turn to religion for comfort when stressed or sick.
Fact  #1:  Religion  is  often  used  to  cope  with  stress.  Following  the  terrorist  at-
tacks on September 11, 2001, research shows that nine out of ten Americans turned
to religion to cope (New England Journal of Medicine 2001, 345:1507–1512)
Fact  #2:  Religion  is  often  used  to  cope  with  mental/physical  health  prob-
lems. Research shows that in some areas of the United States, nine out of ten hos-
pitalized patients say they use religion to cope with illness, and over 40 percent say
that  it  is  the  most  important  factor  that  keeps  them  going.  (Handbook  of  Religion
and Health, 2001; Oxford University Press). Since the year 2000, over 130 separate
quantitative  studies  have  documented  high  rates  of  religious  coping  in  a  range  of
health  conditions,  especially  in  minority  groups  and  in  women.  This  number  does
not  include  hundreds  of  peer-reviewed  published  qualitative  studies  (in  the  words
of patients) that support these findings.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

• Religious involvement may help to reduce stress, minimize depression, and enhance

quality of life.

41

Fact #1: Because of its effectiveness as a coping behavior, religious involvement may
reduce  psychological  stress,  buffer  against  depression,  and  speed  recovery
from emotional disorders  (American  Journal  of  Psychiatry  1992,  149:1693–1700;
American Journal of Psychiatry 1998, 155:536–542; Journal of Nervous and Mental
Disease 2007, 195:389–395).

Of  studies  examining  religion  and  depression  prior  to  the  year  2000,  64  of  101
studies  (64  percent)  reported  less  depression  or  faster  recovery  from  depression
among  the  more  religious  (Handbook  of  Religion  and  Health,  ibid).  Since  the  year
2000  (past  seven  to  eight  years),  140  of  223  studies  (63  percent)  reported  less  de-
pression  or  faster  recovery  from  depression  in  the  more  religious  (unpublished  re-
view).
Fact  #2:  Religious  involvement  is  associated  with  positive  emotions  (greater  well-
being,  happiness,  optimism,  hope,  meaning  and  purpose  in  life)  and  higher  quality
of life.

Well-being: Of research conducted prior to the year 2000, 106 of 131 studies (81
percent)  reported  that  religious  persons  experienced  more  positive  emotions  (Hand-
book  of  Religion  and  Health,  ibid).  Since  the  year  2000  (past  seven  to  eight  years),
172  of  228  studies  (75  percent)  have  reported  this  same  finding  (unpublished  re-
view).  Quality  of  Life:  Since  the  year  2000,  20  of  29  studies  on  R/S  and  quality
of life reported that they were positively associated.
• Religious  involvement  is  related  to  lower  rates  of  alcohol  and  drug  abuse,  less

crime and delinquency, and better grades in school.

Fact  #1:  Religious  involvement  predicts  lower  rates  of  alcohol  and  drug  use,
particularly  in  high  school  students,  college  students,  and  young  adults  (Prevention
Science  2001,  2(1):29–43;  Social  Science  Research  2003,  32:633–658;  Psychology  of
Addictive Behaviors 2003, 17:24–31; Social Science & Medicine 2003, 57:2049–2054;
Journal  of  Adolescent  Health  2006,  39:374–380;  Journal  of  Adolescent  Health  2007,
40:448–455; Alcoholism: Clinical and Experimental Research 2008, 32:723–737).

Concerning research published prior to the year 2000, 124 of 138 studies (90 per-
cent)  reported  less  alcohol  and  drug  use/abuse  in  those  who  were  more  religious
(Handbook  of  Religion  and  Health,  ibid).  Since  the  year  2000  (past  seven  to  eight
years),  an  incomplete  review  indicates  that  152  of  186  studies  (82  percent)  reported
this  same  finding  (unpublished  review).  Thus,  276  of  324  studies  report  significant
inverse relationships between religious involvement and substance abuse.
Fact #2: Delinquency rates and crime are less frequent in those who are more
religious  (Journal  of  Adolescent  Research  1989;  4:125–139;  Sociology  of  Religion
1996; 57:163–173; Social Forces 2004; 82:1553–1572; Journal of Family Issues 2008;
29:780–805).

Prior  to  the  year  2000,  28  of  36  studies  (78  percent)  reported  that  delinquency
or  crime  rates  were  lower  among  the  more  religious  (Handbook  of  Religion  and
Health, ibid). Since the year 2000 (past eight years), an incomplete review indicates
that 12 of 16 studies (75 percent) report similar findings.
• Religious  involvement  is  related  to  healthier  lifestyles  and  fewer  risky  behaviors

that could adversely affect health

Fact #1: Religious involvement is associated with better health behaviors, including
less cigarette smoking and more exercise (Cigarette smoking: Journal of Geron-
tology,  Medical  Sciences  1998,  53:M426–434;  Prevention  Science  2001,  2:29–43;  So-
cial  Science  &  Medicine  2003,  57:2049–2054;  Families  in  Society  2004,  85:495–510;
Nicotine  &  Tobacco  Research  2006,  8:123–133;  Journal  of  Adolescent  Health  2007,
40:506–513;  Exercise:  American  Journal  of  Public  Health  1997,  87:957–961;  Activi-
ties,  Adaptation  &  Aging  2002,  26:17–26;  Family  &  Community  Health  2006,
29:103–117)

Smoking: Prior to the year 2000, 22 of 25 studies (88 percent) indicated that reli-
gious persons are less likely to smoke cigarettes (Handbook of Religion and Health,
ibid).  Since  the  year  2000,  an  incomplete  review  indicates  that  28  of  33  studies  (85
percent) reported this finding. Exercise: Four of six studies have reported that reli-
gious  persons  are  more  likely  to  exercise.  Weight,  however,  is  another  issue;  only
one of eight studies show that religious persons weigh less than those who are less
religious (probably because of those potluck suppers!).
Fact #2: Religious involvement is related to less extra-marital sex and safer sex-
ual  practices  (fewer  partners)  (Social  Psychology  Quarterly  1985;  48:381–387;
American  Journal  of  Public  Health  1992;  82:1388–1394;  Journal  of  the  American

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

42

Medical  Association  1997,  278:823–832;  Social  Science  &  Medicine  2003,  57:2049–
2054; American Journal of Community Psychology 2004, 33(3–4):151–161; Pediatrics
2006, 118:189–200).

Prior  to  the  year  2000,  37  of  38  studies  reported  this  finding.  Since  2000,  an  in-

complete review indicates that eight of eight studies (100 percent) report this.
Fact #3: Religious involvement is related to a lower risk, healthier lifestyle, par-
ticularly among youth. This includes greater likelihood of wearing seat belts, bet-
ter  sleep  quality,  regular  vitamin  use,  regular  physical  and  dental  visits,  etc.  (Psy-
chological  Reports  1991;  68:819–826;  Health  Education  and  Behavior  1998;  25:721–
741;  European  Journal  of  Pediatrics  2005;  164:371–376;  Preventive  Medicine  2006;
42:309–312; Journal of the National Medical Association 2006, 98:1335–1341).
• Religion is related to better physical health and faster recovery
Fact  #1:  Religious  involvement  is  associated  with  less  cardiovascular  disease,  im-
proved outcomes following cardiac surgery, lower rates of stroke, less cardiovascular
reactivity and lower blood pressure, better immune/endocrine functioning, improved
outcomes  for  patients  with  HIV/AIDS,  lower  risk  of  developing  or  better  outcomes
from cancer, and less susceptibility to infection:

Coronary  artery  disease:  International  Journal  of  Cardiology  1986,  10:33–41;
Cardiology  1993,  82:100–121;  American  Journal  of  Cardiology  1996,  77:867–870;
Journal of Clinical Epidemiology 1997, 50:203–209.

Cardiac  surgery:  Psychosomatic  Medicine  1995,  57:5–15;  Health  Psychology

2004, 23:227–238.

Cardiovascular  reactivity:  International  Journal  of  Neuroscience  1997,  89:15–
28;  Annals  of  Behavioral  Medicine  2004,  28:171–178;  Journal  of  Health  Psychology
2005; 10:753–766.

Blood pressure: Hypertension 1988; 12:457–461; Hypertension 1995; 26:820–829;
International Journal of Psychiatry in Medicine 1998, 28:189–213; Behavioral Medi-
cine 1998, 24:122–130; Psychosomatic Medicine 2001, 63:523–530; Journal of Geron-
tology 2002, 57B: S96–S107; Journal of Biosocial Science 2003, 35:463–472; Psycho-
somatic Medicine 2006, 68:382–385.

Stroke:  American  Journal  of  Epidemiology  1992,  136:884–894;  Stroke  2000,

31:568–573.

Metabolic  problems:  Diabetes  Care  2002,  25(7):1172–1176;  Archives  of  Internal

Medicine 2006, 166:1218–1224; Psychosomatic Medicine 2007, 69:464–472.

Immune/endocrine: Psychology and Health 1988, 2:31–52; International Journal
of  Psychiatry  in  Medicine  1997,  27:233–250;  Journal  of  Psychosomatic  Research
1999,  46:165–176;  Breast  Journal  2001,  7:345–353;  Annals  of  Behavioral  Medicine
2002;  24:34–48;  Journal  of  Biological  Regulators  &  Homeostatic  Agents  2003,
17:322–326;  Health  Psychology  2004,  23:465–475;  International  Journal  of  Psychi-
atry  in  Medicine  2004,  34:61–77;  Journal  of  General  Internal  Medicine  2006,
21:S62–68; Journal of Psychosomatic Research 2006, 61:51–58.

Cancer: Journal  of  the  National  Cancer  Institute  1989,  31:1807–1814  (misc.  can-
cers);  Journal  of  the  Royal  Society  of  Medicine  1993,  86:645–647  (colorectal);  Social
Indicators  Research  1996,  38:193–211  (misc.  cancers);  International  Journal  of  Psy-
chiatry  in  Medicine  2002,  32:69–89  (gastrointestinal);  International  Journal  of  Psy-
chiatry  in  Medicine  2003,  33:357–376  (breast);  American  Journal  of  Epidemiology
2003; 158:1097–1107 (colon); Oral Oncology 2006, 42:893–906 (oral).

Infection susceptibility: British Medical Journal 2006, 332(7539):445–450.
For  reviews  of  the  research  before  2000,  see  Handbook  of  Religion  and  Health,
ibid. For a more recent review, see Medicine, Religion and Health (2008, Templeton
Press).  For  a  critique  of  this  research,  see  Lancet  1999,  353(9153):664–667,  and
Blind Faith (2006, St. Martin’s Press).
Fact  #2:  Religious  involvement  predicts  greater  longevity  and  lower  mortality,
with  religious  attendance  being  the  strongest  predictor  (and  associated  with  seven
to  fourteen  years  of  additional  life)  (American  Journal  of  Public  Health  1996,
86:341–346;  American  Journal  of  Public  Health  1997,  87:957–961;  Demography
1999;  36:273–285;  Journal  of  Gerontology,  Medical  Sciences  1999,  54:M370–M37;
Journal  of  Gerontology,  Medical  Sciences  2000,  55:M400–405;  Archives  of  Internal
Medicine  2001,  161:1881–1885;  Annals  of  Behavioral  Medicine  2001,  23:68–74;  Re-
search  on  Aging  2002;  22:630–667;  American  Journal  of  Epidemiology  2002,
155:700–709;  Journal  of  Health  and  Social  Behavior  2004,  45:198–213;  Annals  of
Epidemiology  2005,  15:804–810;  International  Journal  of  Epidemiology  2005,
34:443–451;  Journal  of  Clinical  Epidemiology  2005,  58:83–91;  Journal  of  Geron-
tology 2005, 60:S102–S109; Journals of Gerontology 2006, 61:S140–S146).

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

43

Fact #3: Religious activity predicts slower progression of cognitive impairment
with aging, and may be associated with a slower progression of Alzheimer’s disease
(Journal of Gerontology 2003, 58B:S21–S29; Journal of Gerontology 2006, 61:P3–P9;
Neurology  2007,  68:1509–1514  (Alzheimer’s);  Journal  of  Gerontology,  Medical
Sciences 2008, 63:480–486)
Fact #4: Religious involvement predicts less functional disability with increasing
age,  and  faster  functional  recovery  following  surgery  (American  Journal  of  Psychi-
atry  1990,  147:758–759;  Journal  of  Gerontology  1997,  52B:S306–S316;  Journal  of
Aging and Health 2004, 16:355–374; Research on Aging 2008, 30:279–298).
• All  things  being  equal,  religious  people  need  and  use  fewer  health  care  services;
this  is  because  they  are  healthier,  more  likely  to  have  intact  families  to  care  for
them, and have greater social support

Fact #1: Religious involvement is related to greater marital stability and social sup-
port,  particularly  in  minority  communities.  This  affects  the  kind  of  support  and
monitoring  a  person  with  chronic  illness  will  have  in  the  community  (which  may
keep them out of the hospital or out of a nursing home). Marital stability: Journal
of  Health  and  Social  Behavior  1989,  30:92–104;  Behavior  Genetics  1992,  22:43–62;
Journal  for  the  Scientific  Study  of  Religion  1997,  36:382–392;  Addiction  2007,
102:786–794.  Enhanced  family  relationships:  Sociological  Quarterly  2006;
47:175–194.  Social  support:  Research  on  Aging  1991,  13:144–170;  Journal  of  Ger-
ontology  1997,  52B:300–305;  American  Journal  of  Geriatric  Psychiatry  1997,  5:131–
143;  Health  Care  for  Women  International  2001,  22:207–227;  Journal  of  Palliative
Medicine 2006, 9:646–657; Journal of Health Psychology 2007, 12:580–596). Prior to
the  year  2000,  19  of  20  studies  found  that  religious  persons  had  significantly  more
social support.
Fact  #2:  Religious  involvement  is  associated  with  lower  rates  of  health  services
use (medical), both acute hospitalization and long-term care (Social Science & Medi-
cine 1988, 27:1369–1379; Southern Medical Journal 1998, 91:925–932; International
Journal  of  Psychiatry  in  Medicine  2002,  32:179–199;  Archives  of  Internal  Medicine
2004, 164:1579–1585).
• Communities  with  high  percentage  of  religious  involvement  recover  more  quickly

from natural disasters and acts of terrorism

Fact  #1:  After  the  police,  firefighters,  and  emergency  medical  technicians,  religious
communities are often the first responders and often the most enduring responders
following disasters. The extensive literature (both research studies and popular arti-
cles) documenting this fact is described in two books, In the Wake of Disaster: Reli-
gious  Responses  to  Terrorism  and  Catastrophe  (Templeton  Press,  2006),  and  Tend
My Flock: Emergency Planning for Faith Communities (forthcoming, 2009).
Fact  #2:  Religious  involvement  is  related  to  better  mental  health,  greater  commu-
nity  resilience,  and  higher  social  capital  following  disasters  (Journal  of  Community
Psychology  2000,  28:169–186;  Annals  of  the  New  York  Academy  of  Sciences  2006,
1094:303–307; Journal of Health Care for the Poor & Underserved 2007, 18:341–354;
Social Science & Medicine 2008, 66:994–1007).

Implications for Public Health and Patient Care

So  what?  Should  we  try  to  make  people  more  religious?  There  are  numerous  di-
rect  public  health  and  clinical  applications  for  all  of  the  above  that  have  nothing
to  do  with  prescribing  religion,  endorsing  religion,  or  over-stepping  the  bounds  of
church-state  separation  that  the  1st  Amendment  guarantees.  I  divide  the  implica-
tions of this research into two categories: implications for public health and implica-
tions for clinical care.

Implications for Public Health

(1) More research is needed. Although there is every reason based on existing re-
search  to  suggest  that  religious  involvement  is  related  to  better  health,  we  don’t
really  understand  why  this  is  the  case.  Religion  can  certainly  have  negative  health
effects as well, but certain aspects of religion (cognitive, behavioral, or social) appear
have  positive  effects  on  health  and  well-being.  Is  this  not  relevant  to  the  health  of
our  population  and  resiliency  of  our  communities?  The  problem  is  that  we  don’t
know what aspects of religion are particularly healthy, or how these health benefits
occur in terms of behavioral and physiological mechanisms. We also don’t fully know
how religion impacts the health of communities, or their resiliency to crime, poverty,
teenage  pregnancy,  school  performance,  venereal  disease  transmission,  natural  dis-
asters, etc. Given the widespread prevalence of religious beliefs and activities (with

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

44

nearly 200 million church members, and over 125 million weekly church attendees),
even  small  effects  on  either  individual  or  community  health  could  have  enormous
public health impact.

(2)  Although  it  is  not  ethical  or  desirable  to  change  or  increase  religious  involve-
ment for health reasons, it is important for social and behavioral scientists to learn
how R/S is affecting health and then inform the public about this. People, then, will
need  to  make  their  own  choices  in  this  regard,  free  from  coercion  or  manipulation.
Furthermore, doesn’t the majority of the U.S. population for whom religion is impor-
tant  deserve  to  know  what  effect  their  religious  beliefs  and  practices  are  having  on
their  health?  This  is  particularly  true  since  certain  religious  practices  in  some  set-
tings may actually worsen health (about five to ten percent of studies find negative
correlations between religion and health). For religious beliefs, practices, and rituals
that are shown to improve health, knowing this may help to boost the health effects
that  these  beliefs/practices  have  for  religious  people  (since  it  may  encourage  them
to  continue  these  practices,  or  may  help  them  to  utilize  their  beliefs  to  help  them
change unhealthy lifestyles). Thus, education of the public and dissemination of re-
search  findings  about  factors  that  may  affect  health  is  an  important  role  for  both
health  professionals,  as  well  as  for  government  agencies  interested  in  maintaining
and enhancing the health of the population.

(3) There are many human characteristics that we study in the social and behav-
ioral sciences that we cannot change, but need to understand what impact they are
having  on  health  for  planning  purposes  (i.e.,  anticipating  health  care  needs  of  the
population).  These  include  age,  gender,  race,  ethnic  background,  sexual  preference,
political belief, etc. There are also characteristics that we may be difficult to change,
and yet we need to know how these factors affect health and use of health services.
These  include  the  effects  of  poverty,  personality,  level  of  social  involvement,  health
habits,  obesity,  and  so  forth.  This  doesn’t  prevent  us  from  conducting  research  to
better  understand  how  these  factors  affect  health.  For  some  reason,  however,  reli-
gion  seems  to  be  placed  in  a  different  and  separate  category.  Currently,  there  is
widespread  bias  in  the  mainstream  scientific  community  against  research  on  the
health  effects  of  traditional  religious  beliefs  and  practices  [just  take  a  look  at  the
portfolio  of  NSF/NIH  grants  and  see  how  many  grants  in  the  psychological,  social,
and behavioral sciences are focused this area of research].

(4)  What  about  one-third  of  the  U.S.  population  who  are  not  religious?  It  may  be
that  they  too  will  benefit  from  research  on  religion,  spirituality  and  health.  By
learning about how R/S affects health, we can apply this knowledge to non-religious
settings  and  to  non-religious  people  using  secular  techniques.  For  example,  how
does  religious  involvement  convey  meaning  and  purpose,  hope,  self-esteem,  protec-
tion  from  depression,  and  buffer  against  stress  (and  perhaps  consequently  reduce
blood  pressure,  heart  attacks,  and  stroke,  or  slow  the  development  of  cognitive  im-
pairment  and  disability  with  age)?  If  we  know  the  mechanisms,  we  could  use  them
to enhance the way secular beliefs and behaviors provide these healthy effects. This
would benefit everyone.

(5)  There  is  even  some  research  that  suggests  that  communities  where  high  pro-
portions  of  the  population  are  members  of  religious  groups  have  better  health  in
general,  even  the  non-religious  people  who  live  in  those  communities  (see  Annals
of  Epidemiology  2005,  15(10):804–810;  American  Journal  of  Sociology  2005,
111:797–823). Shouldn’t public health experts be interested in why and how this oc-
curs? Would such research not provide clues on how to enhance the health of entire
populations?

(6)  There  are  few  places  where  people  of  all  ages  (young,  middle-aged,  and  elder-
ly),  all  socioeconomic  levels,  and  all  ethnic  backgrounds  congregate  on  a  regular
basis  as  happens  in  religious  communities.  This  makes  religious  organizations  an
ideal  route  by  which  to  provide  health  screening,  health  education,  and  other  dis-
ease  detection  and  prevention  services.  A  few  studies  have  shown  that  health  edu-
cation  programs  in  churches  can  affect  diet,  weight,  exercise,  and  other  health  be-
haviors,  and  this  is  particularly  true  for  minority  communities  who  often  do  not
have  easy  access  to  such  information  or  to  preventative  health  care  services.  Reli-
gious communities may also be an ideal place to provide alcohol and drug education,
as  well  as  inculcate  moral  values  and  character  that  could  affect  future  decisions
that impact health, pro-social behaviors, and even affect the ability to afford health
insurance  during  adulthood.  More  research  is  needed  and  effective  programs  devel-
oped.  Again,  such  efforts  could  have  a  direct  impact  on  public  and  community
health.

(7)  Religious  communities  often  have  altruism  as  one  of  their  basic  values.  Thus,
members  of  churches,  synagogues  and  mosques  represent  an  army  of  potential  vol-
unteers to assist with social programs, mentoring, and direct service provision. This
is perhaps most evident with regard to disaster preparation and response. Why are

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

45

we not supporting and nourishing this role that many faith communities are already
engaged  in?  Instead,  faith  groups  often  meet  resistance  from  formal  emergency
management services when they try to help, since they are not integrated into these
efforts.  Without  the  volunteer  help  that  faith  communities  provide,  it  is  not  hard
to  imagine  what  the  additional  cost  to  FEMA  might  be.  The  health  of  our  commu-
nities,  particularly  when  affected  by  natural  disasters  or  acts  of  terrorism,  may  de-
pend on whether religious communities are fully prepared and involved in response
efforts.

Implications for Patient Care

(1)  If  future  research  confirms  that  religious  involvement  significantly  affects
mental  and  physical  health,  then  health  professionals  need  to  be  educated  about
this and need to consider this in their treatment of patients. In fact, one could argue
that  there  is  already  sufficient  research  evidence  to  begin  to  do  this.  Furthermore,
there  are  other  reasons  why  health  professionals  should  be  integrating  spirituality
into  patient  care.  Here  are  a  few  (see  Spirituality  in  Patient  Care,  2007,  for  a  com-
plete description):

• Many  patients  are  religious  or  spiritual,  and  would  like  it  addressed  in  their
health  care.  Because  religious  beliefs  are  used  to  cope  with  illness  (either
mental  or  physical),  religious  patients  would  like  their  spiritual  needs  to  be
acknowledged  and  addressed  by  their  physicians  (and  by  nurses  who  provide
more direct and personal care)
• Patients,  particularly  when  hospitalized  or  imprisoned  by  chronic  illness,  are
often  isolated  from  their  religious  communities.  Our  country  has  recognized
that  when  people  are  prevented  from  practicing  their  religious  faith  because
of circumstances imposed on them, we have provided the resources necessary
for  them  to  practice  their  faith  (based  on  the  principle  of  religious  freedom).
This  is  why  we  have  chaplains  in  the  army,  and  in  federal  and  state  prisons
and  psychiatric  facilities.  Hospitalized  patients  with  medical  problems  or  the
chronically  ill  are  no  different.  Many  people  are  hospitalized  far  away  from
their  religious  communities  of  support  (this  is  especially  true  for  nursing
homes,  where  contact  is  minimal  even  when  religious  communities  are  near-
by).
• Religious beliefs affect medical decisions, and may conflict with medical treat-
ments.  This  is  a  very  practical  reason  why  health  professionals  need  to  com-
municate  with  patients  about  religious  or  spiritual  beliefs.  Studies  find  that
45  percent  to  73  percent  of  seriously  ill  patients  indicate  that  their  religious
affect  their  medical  decisions  (Archives  of  Internal  Medicine  1999,  159:1803–
1806;  Journal  of  Clinical  Oncology  2003,  21:1379–1382;  Family  Medicine
2006,  38:83–84).  Yet  90  percent  of  physicians  do  not  take  a  spiritual  history
or discuss these matters with patients, and 45 percent of physicians say that
it is not appropriate to do so (Medical Care 2006, 44:446–453). How can phy-
sicians  practice  competent  medicine  if  they  don’t  have  knowledge  about  fac-
tors that will affect compliance with the treatments they prescribe?
• Religious struggles or spiritual conflicts over medical issues have been shown
to predict increased mortality and worse medical outcomes (see Archives of In-
ternal  Medicine  2001,  161:  1881–1885).  If  left  undetected  and  not  addressed,
these  struggles  may  adversely  affect  disease  course  despite  the  best  of  med-
ical treatments.
• Religion influences health care in the community. Because of the rising costs
of  health  care,  most  health  care  is  now  shifting  out  of  the  hospital  and  into
the  community.  Hospital  stays  are  becoming  shorter  and  shorter  (since  hos-
pitalization is the most expensive form of medical care), and people are being
discharged  sicker  and  sicker  into  the  community.  If  patients  are  involved  in
a  religious  community,  they  will  have  a  ready  support  system  that  can  pro-
vide  emotional  support,  monitor  compliance,  and  provide  practical  services
(meals,  home-maker  services,  respite  care,  rides  to  physician  office).  If  they
are  not,  then  they  are  dependent  on  family  members  for  support,  and  if  no
family  is  available,  then  they  are  forced  to  rely  on  the  government.  This  will
become  a  real  issue  as  our  population  ages  and  the  medical  needs  escalate
(Faith in the Future: Healthcare, Aging, and the Role of Religion—see Further
Readings).

(2) What are some sensible ways that clinicians can integrate spirituality into pa-
tient  care,  without  prescribing  religion  or  coercing  patients  to  believe  or  practice?
First  of  all,  most  of  their  patients  are  already  religious  to  at  least  some  degree  (re-
call that up to 90 percent of seriously ill patients in some parts of the U.S. use reli-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

46

gion  to  cope),  so  clinicians  don’t  have  to  promote  religion.  It’s  already  there.  What
they do need to do, however, is to recognize it, support it, and consider it when mak-
ing  medical  decisions  and  developing  treatment  plans.  Here  are  some  ways  to  do
that:

• For patients admitted to the hospital or those with serious or chronic medical
illness, physicians should take a brief, screening spiritual history that identi-
fies if spiritual beliefs are (1) important to the patient, (2) helping the patient
to  cope  (or,  alternatively,  are  causing  spiritual  struggles),  (3)  influence  med-
ical decisions or conflict with treatments prescribed, (4) membership in a sup-
portive  spiritual  community,  and  (5)  whether  there  are  any  spiritual  needs
that  someone  should  address  (see  Journal  of  the  American  Medical  Associa-
tion 2002, 288:487–493). This takes about two minutes to conduct.
• Support  (verbally  and  non-verbally)  the  religious  or  spiritual  beliefs  of  pa-
• If  spiritual  needs  or  conflicts  are  identified,  refer  patients  to  professional
• If  patients  are  not  religious,  then  the  spiritual  history  should  focus  on  what
gives  patients  lives  meaning  and  purpose  in  the  setting  of  illness  (grand-
children,  hobbies,  etc.),  and  then  those  activities  supported.  Religion  should
never  be  prescribed,  forced,  or  even  encouraged  in  patients  who  are  not  al-
ready  religious,  so  as  not  to  add  guilt  to  the  already  heavy  burden  of  illness.
Inquiry  and  support  in  this  area  must  always  be  patient-centered  and  pa-
tient-directed.

chaplains or trained pastoral counselors to address these needs.

tients if those beliefs are helping the patient to cope.

(3)  Health  professionals  in  hospital  and  outpatient  settings  should  be  willing  to
accommodate  the  religious  or  spiritual  beliefs  and  traditions  of  patients.  Examples:
For  the  American  Indian,  this  may  involve  altering  the  environment  (or  providing
alternative  environments)  so  that  traditional  spiritual  ceremonies  concerning  sick-
ness  and  death  may  be  performed  (if  requested  by  the  patient  or  family).  For  the
Muslim patient, the environment should be altered so that the patient can perform
his or her daily prayers, and care arranged so that only gender-matched health pro-
fessionals  give  personal  care.  Religious  and  cultural  sensitivity  will  help  both  the
patient  and  the  family  to  cope  better  with  illness,  will  improve  patient  and  family
satisfaction with care, and thereby will likely enhance medical outcomes.

(4)  Efforts  should  be  made  to  ensure  that  there  are  adequate  numbers  of  chap-
lains  available  so  that  patients’  spiritual  needs  can  be  adequately  addressed.  A  re-
cent  study  conducted  by  Harvard  investigators  documented  that  three-quarters  (72
percent)  of  patients  dying  of  cancer  said  that  their  spiritual  needs  were  minimally
or not at all met by the medical system (i.e., doctors, nurses, or chaplains) (Journal
of  Clinical  Oncology  2007,  25:555–560).  Currently,  there  are  only  enough  chaplains
in U.S. hospitals to see about 20 percent of patients (one in five) (International Jour-
nal  of  Psychiatry  in  Medicine  2005,  35:319–23).  There  are  typically  no  chaplains  in
outpatient  settings  and  no  chaplains  in  nursing  homes.  Who  meets  these  patients’
spiritual needs?

Recommendations

Recommendations for Members of Congress emphasize their providing support for
research  on  R/S  and  health  (support  for  both  research  training  and  research
projects); public education of the role of religion in health and wellness; health pro-
fessional  education  on  why  and  how  to  integrate  spirituality  into  patient  care;  and
motivating  health  care  systems  to  allow  health  professionals  the  time  necessary  to
address  the  spiritual  needs  of  patients.  Finally,  recommendations  are  provided  for
supporting and integrating efforts by religious organizations in disaster preparation
and response.

I. Support Research
(1).  Because  research  on  the  effects  of  religious/spiritual  beliefs  and  behaviors  is  a
substantial need, current barriers at NSF/NIH to funding research on the ef-
fects  of  traditional  religious  beliefs/behaviors  need  to  be  overcome.  This
could be done by (1) assigning a specific branch at NSF/NIH to review such grants,
(2)  ear-marking  funds  to  support  such  research,  (3)  establishing  review  sections  at
NSF/NIH  with  the  specific  expertise  and  sensitivity  to  this  topic  so  as  to  give  such
grants a fair chance of being awarded.
(2).  Provide  NSF/NIH  training  grants  to  support  the  development  of  young  re-
searchers  on  university  faculty  to  conduct  research  in  this  area,  or  to  help  senior

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

47

investigators to transition their research into this area. There are currently models
at NSF/NIH of junior and senior investigator awards, but none focus on supporting
the training of researchers to study the health effects of R/S.
(3). Urge NSF/NIH to develop a ‘‘request for proposals’’ (RFP) in the area of the
effects  of  traditional  religious  beliefs  and  behaviors  on  mental,  physical,  and  social/
community health. The John Templeton Foundation may be willing to partner with
the NSF/NIH to provide support for such a competitive grants program.
(4). Establish an intramural research program at the NSF/NIH to examine the
impact  of  religious  beliefs  and  practices  on  public  health,  the  cost-savings  that  this
might produce, and the effectiveness and acceptability of disease detection and pre-
vention  programs  within  (or  in  cooperation  with)  religious  organizations,  especially
in minority congregations.

II. Support Congregational Health Programs
(1). Consider partial government support for parish nurse programs within reli-
gious  congregations  that  provide  disease  screening,  health  education,  lifestyle
change,  and  volunteer  recruitment  and  training  for  service  delivery.  If  that  latter
keeps members of religious communities in their homes and out of hospitals or nurs-
ing  homes,  then  this  could  represent  a  substantial  cost  savings  for  Medicare  and
Medicaid.
(2).  Along  these  same  lines,  encourage  the  development  of  health  care  system-
religious congregation partnerships. This would involve closer working relation-
ships  between  local  hospitals  or  medical  systems  and  religious  communities  for  the
purposes  of  providing  early  disease  detection  and  referral  for  treatment,  volunteer
recruitment  and  training,  and  the  teaching  of  health  promotion  activities  that  en-
courage  self-care,  keep  people  healthy,  and  reduce  the  need  for  expensive  medical
services  (Florida  Hospital  is  a  good  model  to  follow).  Such  efforts  could  also  be  ex-
panded  outside  of  congregations  to  persons  in  the  general  community  who  need
services, but have fallen through the cracks of the current health care system.

III. Educate the Public
(1).  Develop  a  public  education  campaign  to  help  disseminate  research  findings
(both  past  research  and  new  research)  on  the  role  that  R/S  plays  in  maintaining
health  and  well-being.  There  is  already  great  public  interest  in  this  topic  as  exem-
plified  by  multiple  cover  stories  on  spirituality  and  health  in  popular  magazines
such as Reader’s Digest, Newsweek, Time, Prevention, and others.
(2). Support/encourage adult education classes at State and federally funded uni-
versities  to  teach  the  public  about  relationships  between  R/S  and  health,  and  how
people can take advantage of these relationships to prevent disease, overcome addic-
tion, and enhance their health and well-being. These classes should also emphasize
the  seeking  of  timely  medical  care,  and  the  important  role  that  allopathic  medicine
plays in health and wellness. Religion and medicine should complement each other,
not compete or conflict.
(3).  The  public  should  be  taught  how  to  talk  with  their  doctors  about  R/S.  If
religion  is  important  to  a  patient,  should  this  be  a  consideration  in  their  selection
of a physician? What are some ways that patients can communicate with their phy-
sicians  about  the  important  role  that  religion  plays  in  their  lives  and  how  it  could
influence  their  medical  decisions?  A  recent  article  by  Elizabeth  Cohen  on  CNN.com
illustrates  such  an  approach  (see  website:  http://www.cnn.com/2008/HEALTH/
09/11/ep.faith.medicine/index.html?iref=newssearch).
(4). The public should also be taught how to talk with their clergy about initi-
ating  a  health  programs  within  their  local  religious  congregation.  If  the  500,000
religious  congregations  in  America  all  had  such  programs,  then  two-thirds  of  the
U.S.  population  would  be  exposed  to  disease  detection,  disease  prevention,  and
health  promotion  efforts.  Since  persons  of  all  ages  participate  regularly  in  religious
congregations, this means that health education efforts would occur at all ages, from
the  young  (focused  on  substance  abuse  prevention  and  character  development)  to
the  middle  aged  (focused  on  healthy  eating,  exercise,  stress-reduction,  etc.)  to  the
elderly (focused on volunteering, mentoring and generative types of activities).

IV. Include Faith Communities in Disaster Preparation and Response

Part of maintaining public health involves protecting communities who may be in
constantly  threat  of  natural  disasters  and  even  terrorist  attacks,  and  helping  them

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

48

to  recover  if  those  events  occur.  Religious  organizations  already  play  a  big  role  in
this  regard,  both  at  the  individual  level  in  helping  persons  cope  with  the  stress  of
the event and on the community level in helping communities minimize their losses
in  the  short-term  and  recover  over  the  long-term.  What  can  the  government  do  to
support  faith-based  efforts?  Here  are  some  recommendations  (see  In  the  Wake  of
Disaster for more details):
(1).  Research  and  Education.  Research  is  needed  to  determine  the  prevalence  of
spiritual  needs  and  the  extent  to  which  they  are  met  (and  by  whom)  during  each
phase  of  a  disaster.  Further  research  on  the  relationship  between  addressing  spir-
itual  needs  and  long-term  mental  health  outcomes  following  disasters  is  critically
needed. Systematic data are needed on the activities of clergy and non-clergy volun-
teers from the faith community following disasters. Although more research is clear-
ly needed, much is already known that justifies a major educational initiative. Edu-
cation  is  needed  for  Emergency  Management  Services  (EMS)  agencies/personnel,
mental  health  authorities,  and  faith-based  groups  to  help  dispel  myths  and  mis-
conceptions about each other, to define the unique roles that each group serves, and
to  emphasize  the  consequences  of  not  valuing  and  not  including  each  other  in  the
disaster response.
(2).  Leadership.  Government  supported  EMS  agencies  should  take  the  lead  in  in-
viting Faith-Based Organizations (FBOs) to participate in disaster planning and re-
sponse.  Government  agencies  should  encourage  interested  FBO’s  to  identify  the
types  of  resources  they  wish  to  contribute  to  the  disaster  response  effort.  This  may
involve  efforts  to  coordinate  disaster  response;  mobilize  and  train  clergy  and  con-
gregational  volunteers  to  provide  psychological,  social  and  spiritual  support;  raise
funds  or  material  necessities  to  assist  victims  during  their  recovery;  or  many  other
potential activities.
(3). Organize and coordinate. Government supported EMS agencies need to take
the  initiative  to  establish  a  body  to  coordinate  FBO  efforts.  Once  established,  it
could organize itself into national and local networks.
(4).  Include  in  Planning  Phase.  On  the  local  level,  EMS  agencies  should  include
deployment of FBO resources as part of their response protocol. As noted above, this
would require that the leaders of local FBOs are included in disaster response plan-
ning.
(5). Encourage teamwork, partnership and collaboration. Partnerships should
be  encouraged  between  mental  health  workers  and  local  faith-based  groups.  Local
mental health workers should be encouraged to visit or participate on local ministe-
rial associations or church councils. In this way, the two groups could develop work-
ing  relationships  and  establish  referral  patterns  before  a  disaster  strikes.  Mental
health counseling services could offer a spiritual component by developing a referral
network  with  local  pastoral  counselors  or  clergy.  Faith-based  groups,  in  turn,  could
refer  members  who  need  specialized  mental  health  care  to  mental  health  profes-
sionals.  Furthermore,  mental  health  professionals  could  provide  education  to  faith-
based  communities  on  how  to  identify  mental  disorders,  which  kinds  of  interven-
tions might be helpful, and when to refer.
(6).  Consider  making  trained  clergy  ‘‘first  responders.’’  Besides  offering  nec-
essary spiritual support, local clergy are ideally positioned to serve as first respond-
ers in meeting the psychological needs of disaster survivors and triaging those with
more  complex  needs  to  mental  health  professionals—enhancing  the  efficiency  with
which  scarce  specialized  mental  health  services  can  be  delivered.  In  many  commu-
nities,  clergy  serve  this  function  anyway  following  disasters  (by  default).  However,
making this part of the formal EMS response would help to systematize and coordi-
nate the effort.
(7).  Credential.  There  needs  to  be  a  way  of  screening  clergy  before  sending  them
out  into  the  field  to  ensure  that  they  are  adequately  trained.  Basic  national  stand-
ards should be established for credentialing clergy, as well as methods of identifying
clergy  credentialed  in  disaster  response  prior  to  a  disaster.  This  needs  to  be  done
as  part  of  pre-disaster  planning  to  ensure  that  it  is  part  of  a  coordinated  response.
(8). Fund. First, provide greater flexibility in support mechanisms by offering more
grant  options  than  SAMHSA  currently  offers.  The  options  should  address  the  pas-
toral care needs of disaster victims during long-term recovery extending beyond the
first  few  months  after  the  event.  It  is  during  recovery,  as  people  begin  to  put  their
lives back together, that issues of meaning and purpose in life begin to surface and
pastoral  care  services  are  most  needed.  Second,  make  it  easier  for  FBO  groups  to
apply for available funding to help support their preparation and response.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

49

V. Educate Health Professionals
(1). Physicians, nurses, social workers, counselors, and hospital administrators need
to be informed of the existing research on R/S and health, and the rationale
for integrating spirituality into patient care. Most health professionals did not
receive  training  on  how  to  do  this,  and  many  are  nervous  about  doing  so  and  feel
unprepared. They don’t know how to take a spiritual history or what to do with the
information  they  learn  from  it.  They  don’t  know  what  a  chaplain  does,  the  type  of
training a professional chaplain receives, or how the chaplain can be useful to them
or their patients. They don’t know what benefits might result from their addressing
the  spiritual  needs  of  patients  and  ensuring  that  those  needs  are  appropriately  ad-
dressed.  Many  medical  schools  are  now  developing  courses  on  religion,  spirituality
and  medicine  for  medical  students.  In  fact,  nearly  100  of  the  141  medical  schools
in the U.S. and Canada now have such courses (70 percent of which are a required
part of the curriculum).
(2). These medical courses, however, are a relatively new development. In 1992, only
three  medical  schools  had  such  courses.  As  a  result,  most  physicians  in  practice
today have no training in this regard. The same is true for nurses and other health
professionals.  This  means  that  CE  (continuing  education)  programs  are  need-
ed  to  train  current  health  professionals  about  how  to  sensitively  and  sensibly  ad-
dress  spiritual  issues  with  patients.  These  CE  programs  could  be  held  at  regional
medical centers or in local hospitals, with several institutions linked by video-confer-
encing or Internet-based methods.

VI. Initiate Health Care System Changes
(1).  Even  with  adequate  education  and  training,  health  professionals  need  time
to  address  the  spiritual  needs  of  patients.  Administering  a  screening  spiritual
history, supporting patients’ beliefs, and referral to pastoral care all take time, pre-
cious  time  that  most  health  professionals  don’t  have  in  the  busy  clinic  or  hospital
setting.  While  freeing  up  such  time  will  be  modestly  expensive  in  the  short-term,
there  is  every  reason  to  think  that  it  will  be  cost-effective  in  the  long-term.  If  pa-
tients  have  their  spiritual  needs  addressed,  this  will  likely  influence  their  health
over  the  long-term  and  reduce  their  need  for  future  health  services  (as  well  as  en-
hance  satisfaction  and  help  them  move  more  smoothly  through  the  health  system).
In  the  only  clinical  trial  that  has  examined  this  possibility,  researchers  found  that
physicians taking a spiritual history (which added 2.1 minutes to the visit) resulted
within  three  weeks  in  oncology  patients  experiencing  less  depression,  greater  func-
tional  well-being,  and  a  strengthening  of  the  doctor-patient  relationship  (see  Inter-
national Journal of Psychiatry in Medicine 2005, 35:329–347).
(2). Government-funded health programs should emphasize the importance of health
professionals  addressing  the  spiritual  needs  of  patients  and  need  to  free  them  up
from  other  responsibilities  to  do  so  (this  is  true  for  physicians,  but  perhaps  even
more  true  for  nurses).  This  may  require  providing  monetary  or  some  other  types  of
incentive  for  hospitals  to  free  up  time  for  physicians,  nurses,  social  workers,  and
chaplains to address these issues. Perhaps tying this to Medicare/Medicaid reim-
bursement based  on  post-hospitalization  patient  satisfaction  surveys  might  be  one
route  to  go.  This  would  require  that  all  hospitals  include  post-hospitalization  sur-
veys that assess patient satisfaction with spiritual care, which few such survey cur-
rently do.

To 

go 

to 

Suggested Readings
Medicine, Religion and Health. Templeton Press (September, 2008)

website: 

The  latest  review  and  discussion  of  research  on  religion,  spirituality  and  health
(including  both  mental  and  physical  health),  written  in  a  reader-friendly,  non-re-
searcher  format  (updates  the  Handbook  of  Religion  and  Health,  2001).  Length:  235
pages. 
order, 
http://www.templetonpress.org/
book.asp?book¥id=124
Spirituality in Patient Care, 2nd Edition. Templeton Press (2007)

This  book  is  for  health  professionals  interested  in  identifying  and  addressing  the
spiritual  needs  of  patients.  It  addresses  the  whys,  hows,  whens,  and  whats  of  pa-
tient-centered  integration  of  spirituality  into  patient  care,  including  details  on  the
health-related  sacred  traditions  for  each  major  religious  group.  This  book  provides
health  care  professionals  with  the  training  necessary  to  screen  patients  sensitively
and competently for spiritual needs, begin to communicate with patients about these
issues,  and  learn  when  to  refer  patients  to  trained  spiritual-care  professionals  who

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

50

order, 

go 

pages.  To 

can competently address spiritual needs. Sections specifically address mental-health
professionals, nurses, chaplains and pastoral counselors, social workers, and occupa-
tional and physical therapists. A ten-session model course curriculum on spirituality
and health care for medical students is provided, with suggestions on how to adapt
it for the training of nurses, social workers, and other health professionals. Length:
264 
to  website:  http://www.templetonpress.org/
book.asp?book¥id=105
Handbook of Religion and Health. Oxford University Press (2001)

This is a comprehensive review of history, research, and discussion of religion and
health.  Its  35  book  chapters  span  mental  and  physical  health,  from  well  being  to
depression  to  immune  function,  cancer,  heart  disease,  stroke,  chronic  pain,  dis-
ability,  and  others.  Appendix  lists  1200  separate  scientific  studies  on  religion  and
health  that  are  reviewed  and  rated  on  0–10  scale,  and  followed  by  2000  references
and  extensive  index  for  rapid  topic  identification.  This  is  the  most  cited  of  all  ref-
erences  (books,  book  chapters,  and  peer  review  articles)  on  religion  and  health.
Length: 714 pages.
The Link Between Religion and Health: Psychoneuroimmunology and the Faith Fac-
tor. Oxford University Press (2002)

Edited  volume  (15  chapters)  examines  the  role  of  psychoneuroimmunology  as  an
explanation  for  the  link  found  between  religion  and  physical  health.  Leaders  in
psychoneuroimmunology  discuss  their  respective  areas  of  research  and  how  this  re-
search can help elucidate the relationship between religion and health. This volume
reviews  research  on  religious  involvement,  neuroendocrine  and  immune  function,
and  explores  further  research  needed  to  better  understand  these  relationships.
Length: 304 pages
Faith  in  the  Future:  Healthcare,  Aging  and  the  Role  of  Religion.  Templeton  Press
(2004)

This  book  presents  a  compelling  look  at  one  of  the  most  serious  issues  in  today’s
society:  health  care  in  America.  How  will  we  provide  quality  health  care  to  older
adults  who  will  need  it  during  the  next  30–50  years?  Who  will  provide  this  care?
How  will  it  be  funded?  How  can  we  establish  effective,  comprehensive,  and  cost-ef-
fective  systems  of  care  as  demographic  and  health-related  economic  pressures
mount?  Innovative  programs  created  and  maintained  by  volunteers  and  religious
congregations are emerging as pivotal factors in meeting health care needs. Summa-
rizing decades of scientific research and providing numerous inspirational examples
and  role  models,  the  authors  present  practical  steps  that  individuals  and  institu-
tions may emulate for putting faith into action. Length: 200 pages. To order: http:/
/www.templetonpress.org/book.asp?book¥id=63
In the Wake of Disaster: Religious Responses to Terrorism & Catastrophe. Templeton
Press (2006)

Based  on  White  Paper  produced  for  the  Center  for  Mental  health  Services
(CMHS)  of  the  U.S.  Department  of  health  and  Human  Services  (DHHS).  Examines
psychological responses to natural disasters and acts of terrorism, outlines the emer-
gency response system in the United States, and describes that role that individual
religious  faith  plays  in  coping  with  disaster.  However,  the  main  focus  of  the  book
is describing the role that faith-based organizations play in responding to disasters,
and  discusses  the  many  ways  that  they  are  involved  at  all  stages  whenever  a  dis-
aster strikes. See pp. 109–119 for recommendations to public policy-makers. Length:
162 pages. To order: http://www.templetonpress.org/book.asp?book¥id=84
Faith  and  Mental  Health:  Religious  Resources  for  Healing  (Templeton  Press,  2005)
This book is also based on White Paper produced for the Center for Mental health
Services  (CMHS)  of  the  U.S.  Department  of  health  and  Human  Services  (DHHS).
It  provides  an  updated  review  of  the  history,  research,  and  interventions  related  to
religion and mental health. The focus is on examining faith-based delivery of mental
health  services.  Five  faith-based  organizations  are  discussed:  clergy  and  local  reli-
gious  congregations,  networking  and  advocacy  groups  for  the  chronically  mentally
ill,  national  religious  organizations  that  deliver  mental  health  services,  and  groups
that deliver faith-based mental health services but do not belong to a national reli-
gious  group  (religious  counselors,  chaplains,  pastoral  counselors).  See  pp.  255–275
for  recommendations  to  public  policy-makers.  Length:  342  pages.  To  order:  http://
www.templetonpress.org/book.asp?book¥id=80
Handbook of Religion and Mental Health. Academic Press (1998)

Due  to  our  religiously  diverse  society,  The  Handbook  of  Religion  and  Mental
Health  is  a  useful  resource  for  mental  health  professionals,  religious  professionals,
and counselors. The book describes how religious beliefs and practices relate to men-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

51

tal health and influence mental health care. It presents research on the association
between  religion  and  personality,  coping  behavior,  anxiety,  depression,  psychoses,
and  successes  in  psychotherapy,  and  discusses  specific  religions  and  their  perspec-
tives  on  mental  health.  Chapters  address  clinical  considerations  when  treating
Protestants,  Catholics,  Mormons,  Unitarians,  Jews,  Buddhists,  Hindus,  and  Mus-
lims. Length: 408 pages.

BIOGRAPHY FOR HAROLD G. KOENIG

Dr.  Koenig  completed  his  undergraduate  education  at  Stanford  University,  his
medical  school  training  at  the  University  of  California  at  San  Francisco,  and  his
geriatric medicine, psychiatry, and biostatistics training at Duke University Medical
Center. He is board certified in general psychiatry, geriatric psychiatry and geriatric
medicine,  and  is  on  the  faculty  at  Duke  as  Professor  of  Psychiatry  and  Behavioral
Sciences,  and  Associate  Professor  of  Medicine.  He  is  also  a  registered  nurse  (RN).
Dr.  Koenig  is  founder  and  former  Director  of  Duke  University’s  Center  for  the
Study  of  Religion,  Spirituality  and  Health,  and  is  founding  Co-Director  of  the  cur-
rent  Center  for  Spirituality,  Theology  and  Health  at  Duke  University  Medical  Cen-
ter. He has published extensively in the fields of mental health, geriatrics, and reli-
gion,  with  over  300  scientific  peer-reviewed  articles  and  book  chapters  and  nearly
40  books  in  print  or  in  preparation.  He  is  the  former  Editor-in-Chief  of  the  Inter-
national  Journal  of  Psychiatry  in  Medicine  and  of  Science  and  Theology  News.  His
research on religion, health and ethical issues in medicine has been featured on over
50 national and international TV news programs (including The Today Show, ABC’s
World News Tonight, and several times on Good Morning America), over 80 national
or  international  radio  programs  (including  multiple  NPR  and  BBC  interviews),  and
hundreds  of  national  and  international  newspapers  or  magazines  (including  cover
stories for Reader’s Digest, Parade Magazine, and Newsweek). Dr. Koenig has given
testimony  before  the  U.S.  Senate  (September  1998)  and  the  U.S.  House  of  Rep-
resentatives  (September  2008)  concerning  the  effects  of  religious  involvement  on
public  health.  He  has  been  interviewed  by  James  Dobson  on  Focus  on  the  Family
and  by  Robert  Schuller  in  the  Crystal  Cathedral  on  the  Hour  of  Power.  Dr.  Koenig
has been nominated twice for the Templeton Prize for Progress in Religion.

His  books  include  The  Healing  Power  of  Faith  (Simon  &  Schuster,  2001);  The
Handbook of Religion and Health (Oxford University Press, 2001); and his autobiog-
raphy, The Healing Connection (2004); Faith and Mental Health (2005); In the Wake
of Disaster (Templeton Press); Kindness and Joy (2006); Spirituality in Patient Care,
2nd  edition  (2007);  and  Spirituality  and  Medicine  (2008)  published  by  Templeton
Foundation Press. Dr. Koenig travels widely to give workshops and seminar presen-
tations (see
http://www.dukespiritualityandhealth.org/about/speaking¥engagements.html).

DISCUSSION

Chairman  BAIRD.  Thank  you,  Doctor,  and  thanks  to  all  our  wit-
nesses  for  outstanding  comments  and  observations  and  most  in-
formative.

We  will  proceed  now  in  the  questioning.  I  will  yield  myself,  rec-
ognize myself for five minutes, and then we will follow with my col-
leagues.

First  of  all,  I  want  to  thank  you  all.  As  a  social  scientist,  some
of the friends here from the social science community will recognize
that I have been one of the most passionate advocates and harshest
critics  of  my  own  disciplines,  and  the  reason  is  I  believe  we  have
so  much  to  offer,  and  we  so  often  don’t  offer  it  as  well  as  we  can.
And  the  exception  to  that  is  illustrated  by  the  testimony  today.
And I congratulate you.

What  I  find  most  impressive  is  that  we  are  talking  about  rig-
orous empirical designs, followed by applications in the real world,
followed by testing those applications with real world impacts. And
all  of  this  stemming  in  many  cases  from  basic  research  that  then

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

52

gets  moved  up  as  science  is  supposed  to.  And  with  real  world  im-
pacts.

What I would like to do is follow up on each of the examples, and

we will probably have a second round of questions as well.

Let  me  start,  we  will  just  follow  in  order.  Dr.  Barrett,  when  you
talk about the example of teaching emotional, I am blanking on the
word.  Literacy.  Thank  you.  So  I  may,  give  us  an  example  of  how
you would do that with a person and with what impact that might
have. How would it change things?

Dr.  BARRETT.  Sure.  Well,  I  mean,  first  of  all,  I  should  point  out
that I don’t personally do work on emotional literacy. That work is
actually  being  done  by  other  people.  I  did  the  basic  research,  and
my lab pretty much continues to do basic research on emotions.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Well,  let  me  jump  to  the  basic  research  then.
Dr. BARRETT. But I can answer that question——
Chairman BAIRD.
Dr.  BARRETT.—for  you.  So  basically,  I  mean,  my  husband  tells  a
joke. Right. The joke he tells is that when he first met me, he knew
three emotion words; happy, sad, and hungry. And——

Chairman BAIRD. My kind of guy.
Dr.  BARRETT.—that  usually  gets  laughs  but,  you  know,  but  the
point being that what you do, what emotional literacy programs do
is  they  turn  people  into  emotional  experts  who  have  a  large  emo-
tion  vocabulary,  so  they  have  a  lot  of  different  words  for  emotion,
and they understand the distinctions between those words. So they
understand  the  difference  not  just  between  anger  and  sad  but  be-
tween  irritation  and  anger  and  rage.  And  they  use  those  words  to
help them to better see emotion, you know, more precisely see emo-
tion  in  other  people,  to  more  precisely  label  their  own  responses,
and to better know how to act.

So  if  I  just  feel  bad,  that  doesn’t  tell  me  very  much  about  what
to  do  next.  However,  if  I  understand  that  I  am  feeling  irritated  as
opposed  to  enraged,  then  I  can  plan  something  more,  my  response
a little bit more precisely.

So  it  basically  has  to  do  with  using  words  to  shape  the  experi-
ence  of  emotion  and  the  perception  of  emotion,  to  be  able  to  see
emotions in others. And this sort of sounds like just word play until
you  realize  that  actually  words  have,  are  a  constitutive  rule  in
emotion,  that  is,  emotions,  you  know,  there  was  just  an  article  in
Newsweek  this  week  about  emotion,  that,  you  know,  fear  can  be
found in this part of the brain, and anger can be found in that part
of the brain, and you know, that is, it is an unfortunate article, be-
cause  there  isn’t  a  tremendous  amount  of  science  to  back  up  those
claims.

And  so  if  you  take  a  model  like  that,  then  it  seems  like  this  is
just  wordplay.  But  if  you  believe  that  the  words  that  people  use
and the language that they speak actually has some real informing
emotions  and  in  grounding  emotion  perception,  then  it  becomes  a
completely common-sensical thing to do.

Chairman  BAIRD.  And  your  research  and  that  of  our  colleagues
in  the  field  has  been  able  to  empirically  identify  that  people  differ
in  how  they  process  their  own  emotional  experience  and  commu-
nicate  their  own  emotional  experience,  and  that  that  difference
then relates to a host of other variables.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

53

Dr. BARRETT. Yes.
Chairman  BAIRD.  And  by  educating  people  about  these  issues,

you can then influence other variables.

Dr.  BARRETT.  Yes.  Exactly.  So  in  our  lab  we  spent  almost  a  dec-
ade  doing  research  that  was  funded  both  by  the,  mainly  actually
by NSF with some support from NIH but mostly it came from NSF,
where we did something called, we call it experience sampling, but
basically  people  almost,  over  700  people  took  little  palm  pilots  out
into  the  world  with  them,  and  we  measured  a  number  of  things
about their emotional experiences and then brought them back into
the  lab  and  did  very  controlled  measurements  there  of  their  body,
of  their  faces,  and  so  on.  We  actually  also  did  some  brain  imaging
with  these  people,  and  what  we  found  really  clearly  was  there  is
no  question  that  people  vary  in,  not  just  in  the  words  that  they
know for emotion but actually in the precision of their experiences
and  that  these  have  effects  in  peoples’  ability  to  perceive  emotion
in others and to regulate their own responses and so on.

Chairman BAIRD. Great. Thank you.
I  am  going  to  go  over  my  time  just  a  little  bit,  because  I  want
to  follow  up  with  Dr.  Jemmott.  I  want  to  compliment  you  for  your
courage. In this institution over the last few years anything dealing
with  sexuality  has  been  a  target  for  reverse  earmarking.  By  that
I  mean  Members  of  Congress  during  an  appropriations  debate  tar-
get  studies  based  solely  on  their  title.  Dr.  Ehlers  and  I  both  have
been enraged by this in the past, knowing nothing about the study.
They  just  say,  oh,  this  deals  with  sex.  We  don’t  think  we  should
spend any money on sex, therefore, we are going to cut the budget.
What  you  have  done  is  stepped  forward  and  said,  look.  We  can
make  a  research-based  effort  to  identify  how  to  intervene  in  a
deadly  behavior  and  disease  system  and  apparently  with  good  re-
sults.

Could you give it some sense of outcome? Just, you talked about
the  various  metrics  against  which  you  measure.  Just  give  us  a
sense  of,  you  know,  you  got  these  various  intervention  programs.
What are the outcome? What have we seen in terms of outcome for
these things?

Dr. JEMMOTT. Well, one study that we, we have done two——
Chairman BAIRD. Make sure, please make sure your mic is on up
there. Maybe. That is hard. You might want to lower the mic a lit-
tle bit to yourself. Okay.

Dr.  JEMMOTT.  Okay.  We  did  two  studies  that  were  done  in  clin-
ics, and when you are working in a clinic, it is possible to have ac-
tual  sexual  outcomes  in  terms  of  sexually-transmitted  diseases.
One study was with African-American women in Newark, New Jer-
sey,  and  the  educators  in  that  study  were  nurses.  We  developed  a
very,  very  brief  intervention  that  is  appropriate  in  that  setting,  20
minutes, and it dealt with the skills necessary to use condoms and
to reduce your number of partners, et cetera. And——

Chairman BAIRD. It is not just how to put a condom on. It is how
to  convince  your  partner  that  a  condom  is  the  way  you  are  going
to go.

Dr. JEMMOTT. Absolutely. And it is using it correctly as well. And
we  followed  the  women  who  received  the  intervention  for  a  year,
and we found that those who received the intervention had a lower

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

54

rate  of  chlamydia,  gonorrhea,  and  trichomoniasis  compared  to  a
control  group  of  women  who  also  received  an  intervention  from
nurses that dealt with chronic disease prevention.

We  did  a  similar  study  in  Philadelphia  with  African-American
and  Latino  adolescent  girls  who  were  15,  about,  approximately  15
years of age. They were all sexually experienced. They were in the
adolescent  medicine  clinic.  They  received  a  skill-building  interven-
tion. Some of them received an intervention that dealt with chronic
disease prevention, and we followed them for a year. We found sig-
nificant  reductions  in  their  number  of  partners,  increased  use  of
condoms,  and  a  lower  rate  of  chlamydia,  gonorrhea,  and  trich,
trichomoniasis in that study as well.

So we have been able to have outcomes in terms of sexual behav-
ior  as  well  as  sexually-transmitted  disease.  Obviously  when  you
work  with  younger  populations  it  is  not  really  feasible  to  look  at
sexually-transmitted disease as an outcome, so in those populations
you  want  to  look  at  self-recorded  behaviors,  especially  abstinence.
We  have  a  study  that  we  just  completed  in  South  Africa  that  is
currently  under  review  where  they  were  grade  six  students  in
South Africa, hardly any of them were sexually active at the begin-
ning  of  the  study.  Their  average  age  was  about  12,  and  only  three
percent were sexually active. We followed them for a year after the
intervention,  and  fewer  of  them  reported  sexual  intercourse  over
that  period,  unprotected  sex,  and  reported  fewer  partners,  you
know, again, compared to a control group that received the chronic
disease prevention, intervention.

So we have had some positive outcomes, you know, not just here
in  the  United  States,  with  a  variety  of  populations  but  also  over-
seas.

Chairman  BAIRD.  And  especially  given  that  you  are  speaking

today on the HIV capital of the United States of America.

Dr. Ehlers.
Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Just  a  quick  follow  up.
Did I understand you correctly to say that your abstinence program
actually worked?

Dr. JEMMOTT. Yes.
Mr. EHLERS. Because we have a lot of debate about that here in

the Congress.

Dr.  JEMMOTT.  Yes.  We  have  an  abstinence  program  that  works.
It  worked  in  a  study  that  we  did  here.  We  have  had  two  of  them.
One  worked  briefly  for  three  months,  but  then  in  a  second  study,
which  is  also  under  review  right  now,  we  followed  the  adolescents
for two years and found a significant effect of our abstinence inter-
vention in reducing initiation of sexual involvement.

And  the  participants  were  grades  six  and  seven  African-Amer-
ican  adolescents  in  Philadelphia,  and  again,  it  was  compared  to  a
control group of adolescents who learned about chronic disease pre-
vention.

Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you.  And  Dr.  Kenkel,  you  mentioned  some
studies  on  how  increasing  costs  led  to  reduction  of  use.  I  assume
that applies only for non, the beginning of use of non-addictive sub-
stances,  or  would  that  also  apply  to  someone  who  is  smoking  or
someone  who  is  using  hard  drugs?  Did  the  cost  increase  result  in

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

55

less  use,  or  is  it  beyond  help  simply  because  it  is  an  addictive  be-
havior?

Dr.  KENKEL.  No.  Actually  the  research  suggests  that  a  number
of addictive behaviors, addicts do seem to respond to higher prices.
There is a controversially-named theory at least developed by Gary
Becker  and  Kevin  Murphy  at  the  University  of  Chicago  called
model of rational addiction. Now, I know to a lot of people that al-
most sounds like an oxymoron, but the basic idea is simply that ad-
dicts  still  respond  to  the  same  kind  of  incentives  that  non-addicts
do,  and  it  may  be  difficult,  and  it  certainly  is  more  difficult  to
change  behavior,  but,  again,  there  is  evidence  that  shows  that
when  the  price  of  cigarettes  go  up,  people  are  more  likely  to  quit
smoking.  My  research  found  pretty  heavy  drinking  responded.
Maybe  not  the  heaviest  drinking  but  some  very  heavy  drinking
seemed  to  respond  to  higher  prices.  And  there  has  been  some  re-
search that looked into the same kind of price responsiveness of il-
licit  drugs,  including  heroin.  And  all  of  those  find  some  evidence
that  higher  prices  can  reduce  consumption  of  these  goods,  even  by
the addicts.

Mr. EHLERS. And even for hard drugs then?
Dr.  KENKEL.  The  hard  drug,  there  has  been  some  studies.  I

mean, that is a very, very difficult——

Mr. EHLERS. Yeah.
Dr.  KENKEL.—thing  to  study.  I  mean,  basically  on  the  data  we
don’t know that much about the use, nor do we know exactly about
what  prices  people  are  paying.  So  trying  to  figure  out  how  much
prices  affect  use,  it  is  a  doubly  difficult  challenge.  But  there  have
been some studies that indicate that, yes, even the heroin——

Mr. EHLERS. And Dr. Koenig, I really enjoyed your presentation,
perhaps because I am a religious person, but I suspect most every-
one just drives themselves that way in some fashion.

But  what,  are  there  any  implication  you  can  draw?  You  can’t
somehow instill religion in a person to try to improve their health.

Dr. KOENIG. Yes.
Mr.  EHLERS.  And  another  question  is  is  it  perhaps  the  health
outcomes  are  related  to  the  fact  that  a  number  of  religious  behav-
iors  are  related  to  health?  For  example,  for  years  some  denomina-
tions  have  strongly  discouraged  smoking,  long  before  the  Surgeon
General’s report. Others discouraged drinking very strongly.

Is  it  related  to  that,  or  is  it,  in  fact,  intrinsic  to  the  belief  of  the

person, him or herself?

Dr.  KOENIG.  It  is  related  to  as  you  described,  better  health  be-
haviors,  less  cigarette  smoking,  more  exercise,  et  cetera,  et  cetera.
The  religious,  you  know,  beliefs  that  say  you  shouldn’t  over  drink,
et cetera, et cetera, so that is a major factor.

Also,  there  is  the  social  factor,  the  fact  that  people  have  more
support  in  religious  congregations,  and  then  also  there  is  the  cog-
nitive, the beliefs themselves. They oftentimes are positive or opti-
mistic about coping with stress, about deriving meaning to the neg-
ative experiences which help people to cope better.

In terms of the applications, there are practical applications. Be-
cause it is so common, so frequent that people have religious beliefs
and  behaviors,  how  are  those  affecting  health?  And  how  as  people
become  more  secular  in  this  country,  how  will  that  affect  the  in-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

56

crease  in  health  problems?  And  so  those  are  just  some  of  the
issues.  Clinically  there  is  the  issue  of  people  have  spiritual  needs,
and doctors aren’t addressing them. Ninety percent of doctors never
even  talk  to  a  patient  about  their  religious  beliefs,  and  yet  those
are  affecting  their  compliance,  their  coping  with  illness,  et  cetera.

So those are the issues.
Mr. EHLERS. Okay. Thank you. I was just reading the Old Testa-
ment  recently  and  the  early  part  of  it,  and  it  is  just  striking  read-
ing  through  all  the  rules  and  restrictions  that  Moses  put  in  place,
how  many  of  them  are  really  health  related.  So  this  goes  back  a
long way.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Lipinski.
Mr.  LIPINSKI.  I  would  like  to  thank  the  Chairman  for  holding
this hearing and the hearings that we have held and probably most
importantly  right  now  is  last  year  in  the  fight  where  there  was  a
threat  to  NSF  funding  for  social  sciences,  and  Dr.  Baird  really
stepped up there, and I gave a little bit of help there, but we made
sure  that  that  wasn’t,  we  made  sure  we  took  care  of  that  in  the
America COMPETES Act.

And  Chairman  Baird  is  the  only  one  who  I  allow  to  call  me  Dr.
Lipinski,  and  this  is  the  only  place  he  is  allowed  to  do  it,  here  in
this  Subcommittee.  I  do  have  my  Ph.D.  from  Duke  in  political
science,  so  I  have  fond  memories  of  Duke,  a  great  university.  I
spent maybe too many years in school. One of the classes that I re-
member  more  from  than  any  other  perhaps,  when  I  was  at  Stan-
ford  I  took  a,  got  a  degree  in  engineering  economic  systems.  Deci-
sion  analysis  was  something  that  was,  I  was  very  interested  in.  I
took  a  class  from  Amos  Diversky,  and  you  know,  decision  theory,
and really the fact that the risk aversion that people have and how
people make choices not really necessarily based on what economi-
cally would seem to be the clearer choice.

So  I  really  think  that  so  much  of  that  could  be  used,  utilized  in
making public policy, and Dr. Kenkel, I know you were, you know,
you  were  talking  about  incentivising.  We  do  a  lot  of  that  in  public
policy, although sometimes we don’t like to admit that. But I think
a  lot  of  the  research  that  you  were  doing  you  are  talking  about  in
terms of smoking, some of that is obviously economic when you are
talking about whether or not the economics actually impacts people
who  are  addicted  to  drugs.  And  I  think  that  is  very  important
work, but also looking at, beyond the economics of what psychology
tells us about choices that people make.

What  you,  I  just  want  to  ask  you,  Dr.  Kenkel,  what  else,  what
do  you  think  we  should  be  doing  more  of  here  in  terms  of  helping
to,  you  know,  put  the  question  aside  of  what  policy  should  we  be
doing  to  incentivise  what  behavior  we  want  to  see  more  of  or  less
of  here  in  this  country,  but  what  should  we  be  doing  in  terms  of
funding? How could we better fund, you know, the type of research
that would be helpful to us in making public policy?

Dr.  KENKEL.  That  is  a  tough  question  obviously.  In  the  kind  of
social science research that health economists use relies very heav-
ily on secondary data sets, and so as I said, mentioned before, you
know, the continued support and expanded support for the ongoing
data  collection  efforts  of  both  the  Federal  Government  and  also,
you  know,  investigator-initiated  data  collections.  You  know,  I  am

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

57

thinking about these ongoing, longitudinal data sets like the Michi-
gan Panel Survey of Income Dynamics or the Fireman Health Sur-
veys,  provide  incredibly  rich  resource  for  health  economists  and
other social scientists to both explore the questions that, you know,
the data sets were designed to answer but also a lot of times to ex-
ploit them to answer some new questions. So I think a lot of times
the,  a  lot  of  the  economics  research  actually  wasn’t  planned  nec-
essarily to be used in these data sets, but we suddenly realized we
could  exploit  the  natural  experiment  that  was  created  in  the  data,
using ongoing data collection.

With that, I think providing a support for some of the new devel-
opments in data collection, biomarkers, for example, are an exciting
idea  to  connect  some  of  the  traditional  social  science  kind  of  vari-
ables  about  schooling  and  income  and  socioeconomic  status  with
data  actually  on  a  much  more  health-related,  even  genetic-related
information, something they are beginning to use.

The  same  types  of  innovations  would  really  also  be  possible,  I
think, and should be encouraged in kind of trying to provide those
links between economics and the other social science. New sub-field
of economics known as behavioral economics, which exactly tries to
do  what  you  suggest,  that  is,  import  the  insights  from  psychology
and improve the economic models to explore when is it going to be
the case where the economic model isn’t really capturing fully what
is  going  on.  And  can  we  get  to  an  improved  understanding  and
therefore,  also  maybe  improve  public  policies  by  kind  of  combining
our forces with psychological data.

And, again, I guess it just shows, you know, the kind of research
I  do,  I  keep  on  coming  back  to  sort  of  facilitating  data  collections
and  facilitating  cooperations  between  social  scientists  of  different
disciplines.  Some  of  the  most  important  ways  I  think  you  could
support the type of research where I think it needs to go.

Mr. LIPINSKI. Thank you. I thank all of you for the work that you
are  doing  in  multi-disciplinary  research.  I  found  when  I  was  a  po-
litical  scientist  that  there  wasn’t  nearly  enough  of  them.  It  seems
like  there  is  more  of  a  push  in  recent  years  to  do  that,  so  I  think
that is very helpful.

Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Dr. Lipinski.
Mr. LIPINSKI. I yield.
Chairman  BAIRD.  And  that,  actually  that  issue  of  interdiscipli-
nary  work  is  part  of  what  was  included  in  the  America  COM-
PETES  Act,  of  course,  and  I  would  note  on  the  issue  of  behavioral
economics  that  cognitive  economic  work  really  of  Canaman  and
Diversky  and  that  group,  in  my  judgment  certainly  could  help  us
understand  the  collapse  that  this  country  is  experiencing  right
now.

If you look at the cognitive biases and decision-making confirma-
tion  bias,  for  example,  is  one  area.  Maybe  we  have  a  hearing,
which  would  be,  hindsight  is  20/20,  but  if  you  look  at  the  role  of
confirmation bias, that simple cognitive error is so profound in get-
ting  people  to  believe  that  this  market  couldn’t  do  what  it  has
done, we might be able to somehow prevent prophylactic measures,
cognitive prophylactics in the financial markets would be an inter-
esting topic for somebody’s dissertation at some point.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

58

We will have another round, so if you have other comments, I see
Dr.  Barrett  has  something,  but  I  want  to  make  sure  we  get  to  Dr.
Bartlett, and then we will come back around.

Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you very much. Dr. Barrett, thank you for
your  concern  about  the  amount  of  money  that  goes  into  basic  re-
search.  We  are  starving  almost  everywhere.  I  regret  that  we  re-
quire  you  to  indicate  in  your  grant  application  for  basic  research
where  it  might  have  a  societal  payoff.  We  ought  to  be  pursuing
knowledge. There will be societal payoff. There is no way of know-
ing  ahead  of  time  where  that  societal  payoff  will  be.  But  the  aver-
age  American  doesn’t  understand  that,  and  we  have  a  truly  rep-
resentative Congress.

Dr. Jemmott, your comments were very interesting. HIV AIDS is
a  very  unique  disease.  It  is  essentially  universally  fatal.  We  can
slow the process down. It is the only disease I know in a very long
time  which  would  totally  disappear  in  one  generation  with  appro-
priate behavioral change. Isn’t that true?
Dr. JEMMOTT. Yes. Ultimately it would.
Mr. BARTLETT. So your research is enormously invaluable. Let us
get  there.  It  is  very  unique.  Kills  everybody  who  gets  it,  but  it
would  disappear  totally  in  a  generation  with  appropriate  behav-
ioral changes. So thank you very much for your contributions.

Several  years  ago  I  was  driving  and  over  the  radio  there  were
three  reports.  Two  people  had  died  in  New  York  City  from  some-
thing that might have been citicosis, and if it was citicosis, it might
have come from dried pigeon manure, so there was a fairly serious
suggestion we might ought to kill all the pigeons in New York City
because two people died.

That same radio report said that there was a report of the deaths
that occurred in cigarette smoking. The last in which I saw a date
was 472,000. By the way, it took cigarettes less than three days to
kill  as  many  people  as  the  terrorists  killed  on  9/11.  And  in  that
same  report  there  was  a  report  of  flying  saucers  over  Oklahoma.
Well,  I  thought,  gee.  If  I  was  coming  here  from  somewhere  else,
and  I  saw  a  society  where  two  people  died  in  New  York  City  that
might have had citicosis, and if it was citicosis, it might have come
from  dried  pigeon  manure,  therefore,  we  are  going  to  kill  all  the
pigeons  in  New  York  City.  And  472,000  people  died  from  cigarette
smoking, and they were still advertising cigarettes. I think I would
want to fly around a bit, too, before I landed.

This  is  just  insane,  isn’t  it?  You  know,  I  can’t  yell  fire,  fire  in  a
crowded theater because somebody might get hurt leaving. And yet
they  can  advertise  cigarettes  to  my  grandkids  and  my  great-
grandkids when it kills 472,000. Is there any logic in that?

I  just  can’t  see  the—see,  I  don’t,  if  you  want  to  smoke,  you  go
ahead and smoke, but I want no cigarette advertising. If I can’t yell
fire in a crowded theater, you can’t have cigarette advertising. Buy
it  if  you  wish,  but  it  is  dispensed  from  under  the  counter  in  a
brown  paper  wrapper  with  skull  and  cross  bones  on  it.  A  rational
society I think would do that.

Dr.  Koenig,  you  mentioned  the  increase  in  lifestyle  from  those
who are religious. I am a Seventh Day Adventist, and we and Mor-
mons  live  seven  years  longer  than  the  average.  I  don’t  know  that
other  people  are  less  religious  than  we.  Don’t  you  think  lifestyle

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

59

has  a  whole  lot  to  do  with  that?  Because  we  have  a  very  different
lifestyle.

Dr.  KOENIG.  Yes.  Absolutely.  Lifestyle,  behaviors,  and  it  starts
from  childhood  on,  the  way  kids  are  taught  and  the  decisions  that
they  make  with  regard  to  their  sexual  practices,  their  drinking,
their  smoking,  everything.  Studies  show  that  religious  youth  are
more likely to sleep better, more likely to take vitamins, more like-
ly  to  get  regular  health  care,  regular  dental  care.  Religion  impacts
in  so  many  ways  in  terms  of  their  health,  their  healthy  lifestyles,
their health behaviors, their decisions.

Mr.  BARTLETT.  Then  why  are  we  so  hesitant  politically  to  talk
about religion when it has so many positive benefits? Why are you
kind  of  relegated  to  the,  well,  not  lunatic  fringe,  but  some  fringe,
and if you talk about religion and you are in politics.

Dr. KOENIG. It’s the same way in health care. You talk about re-

ligion, you are immediately marginalized.

Mr. BARTLETT. Yeah. Why is that?
Dr. KOENIG. I don’t know.
Mr. BARTLETT. Any of the rest of you have any observations why
you  are  marginalized  wherever  your  discipline  is  when  you  talk
about religion?
Dr. Barrett.
Dr.  BARRETT.  Well,  you  know,  a  couple  of  years  ago  a  major  so-
cial,  the  major  research  conference  in  social  psychology,  people
asked  this  question  exactly.  They  asked  the  question  of  you  could
count, why is it that you can count on one hand the number of so-
cial  science,  social  psychologists  who  study  religion  when  it  is,  you
know,  a  foundational  aspect  of  many,  in  fact,  now  we  hear  most
people’s  lives  certainly  in  the  United  States.  And,  you  know,  I
think  that  the  answer  that  people  came  up  with  at  this  meeting
was multi-faceted.

First of all, it is often, you know, science often overlooks the most
obvious things. I mean, overlooks the things that are right in front
of you and that seem most obvious. Right? Nobody, very few people
actually  do  research  on  the  psychological  impact  of  touch,  yet  we
touch  each  other  all  the  time.  We  shake  hands,  we  pat  people  on
the  back,  we  hug  our  children.  You  know,  there  is  not  a  lot  of  re-
search on this topic even though it is a very, very basic thing.

But  also  for  some  reason  it,  you  know,  there  is  a  certain  stigma
to,  there  has  been  a  certain  stigma,  the  same  kind  of,  to  religious,
to  public  discourse  about  religion  in  the  same  way  that  there  is
stigma  for  lots  of  things  that  seem  natural  and  obvious.  I  mean,
paradoxically  like  sex.  And  so  the  reason  why  there  is  stigma  I
don’t  think  anybody  really  understands,  although  people  are  inter-
ested  in  this  topic  and  are  starting  to  study  it.  But  there  is,  you
know,  sociologists  and  social  psychologists  have  a  lot  of  under-
standing about stigma and how it influences behavior.

The irony, of course, is that the federal funding agencies are not
funding  that.  They  don’t  fund  research  on  stigmas  so  much  any-
more, and if they do, it is in very limited pockets. But it is a topic
that has been around in social psychology both from a social stand-
point and from sociology for, really for 100 years.

Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. We might look to Hol-

lywood for a little of the problem.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

60

Chairman  BAIRD.  And  for  the  problem  with  smoking,  Dr.  Bart-
lett.  It  is  amazing  the  implicit  message  about  smoking  that  has
come  through  Hollywood  in  recent  years.  You  can’t  advertise  ciga-
rettes  on  television,  but  you  can  sure  show  every  actor  that  the
kids look up to smoking a cigarette in almost every scene anymore.
Dr.  Kenkel,  I  particularly  appreciated  your  comment,  I  will  rec-
ognize  myself  for  five  minutes.  We  will  do  a  second  round  and
then—about  it  is  not  what  you  know  that  is  so  much  trouble,  it  is
what  you  know  that  ain’t  so.  One  of  the  great  values  of  the  social
science  research  is  the  counter-intuitive  finding.  I  remember  some
years back there was the program called Scared Straight. This was
the  idea  that  we  were  going  to  take  kids  and  put  them  in,  kids,
juvenile  offenders,  we  were  going  to  take  them  to  the  really  hard-
core, I think they did this in Rahway, New Jersey. They were going
to take them and scare them to death, and this was, got a national
TV show about it and there were programs initiated in State Legis-
latures  across  the  country.  And  then,  thank  goodness,  some  social
scientist  actually  did  some  follow-up  research,  and  if  my  recollec-
tion  serves  correctly,  the  kids  who  had  gone  through  the  Scared
Straight  Program  had  a  higher  recidivism  rate  than  the  kids  who
hadn’t.

And  the  counter-intuitive  was  a  lot  of  people  thought,  well,  we
will  take  those  kids  there,  and  we  will  scare  them  to  death.  The
kids  apparently  thought,  gee,  I  want  to  be  a  bad,  tough  guy  like
those  guys  in  prison,  and  the  case  is  true  in  some  of  our  interven-
tions.  There  is  some  fascinating  research  about  on  the  economic,
behavioral economic realm recently about if people have paid a cer-
tain amount, does that provide a disincentive or a justification.

And  so  I  commend  you  for  raising  this  issue,  because  sometimes
it  is  not  confirming  what  we  think  it  would  be  but  disconfirming
the so-called common sense assumption.

Tell  us  a  little  more  about  this  advertising  of  smoking  cessation
products.  Flush  that  out  a  little  bit  for  us.  It  is  apparently  illegal
to advertise these things, but if we did, we could save a lot of lives.
Again,  back  to  Dr.  Bartlett’s  paradox,  I  am  sure  that  was  a  nego-
tiated deal with the cigarette companies probably but——

Dr.  KENKEL.  Well,  it  is  no  longer  illegal.  Actually,  the  irony  of
the  advertising  situation  was  one  of  the  first  things  that  attracted
us  to  the  topic.  We  are  looking  at  magazine  advertisements  for
these products back in the 1990s when most of these products were
by  prescription  only.  And  because  they  were  by  prescription  only,
when,  a  company  could  advertise  say  the  nicotine  patch,  but  then
they  would  have  to  have  a  full  page  of  fine  print  disclosure  of  all
the contraindications about how bad nicotine was for you.

At the same time in the same magazine, the next page, you could
have an advertisement for Marlboro’s, anther nicotine delivery sys-
tem, and they only had to have that tiny little, you know, Surgeon
General’s  box.  And  so  we  looked  at  this  thing,  you  know,  why  is
it  that  we  seem  to  be  regulating  the  ads  for  the  products  that  will
help  us  quit  smoking  and  making  it  more  difficult  to  advertise
them than we are advertising for the actual products we are trying
to get rid of, you know, in the public health approach.

So  we  actually  looked  at  sort  of  two  aspects  of  our  research  on
the smoking cessation advertising. One that I mentioned in the tes-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

61

timony  earlier  was  that  when  people  see  more  of  these  ads  on,  in
magazines  at  first,  and  we  are  extending  the  research  to  look  at
television  ads,  it  really  does  seem  to  be,  help  stimulate  them  to
think about quitting.

And  interestingly  enough  a  lot  of  the  times  when  they  think
about  quitting  after  they  use,  they  see  the  ads,  they  don’t  nec-
essarily  even  use  the  product,  which  in  economic  jargon  is  sort  of
a  positive  externality,  the  idea  that  some  of  the  social  gains  from
the advertisements, the firms are not managing to gather as higher
profits, but they are doing, improving public health.

Now,  the  earlier  part  of  our  research  also  looked  at  the  effect  of
the regulations on the firms’ decisions to advertise themselves, and
we  found  that  when  products  went  from  prescription  to  over  the
counter,  this  changed  the  way  the  advertisements  are  regulated
and  made  it  a  lot  easier  to  advertise,  and  therefore,  the  firms  ad-
vertised a lot more. So when you start putting those two things to-
gether,  you  realize  that  the  way  we  were  regulating  prescription
products for smoking cessation actually probably worked to discour-
age smoking cessation.

Chairman  BAIRD.  But  you  now  can  see,  so  that  is  no  longer  an

issue.

counter——

Dr.  KENKEL.  Yes.  So  now  most  of  the  products  are  over  the

Chairman BAIRD. Okay.
Dr. KENKEL.—and that is why they are all, but you see the same
thing going on now, you know, another possibility, we haven’t done
this research yet, would be on things like the statins for cholesterol
reduction. A lot of the statin drugs are going to still be by prescrip-
tion  only,  and  therefore,  they  are  relatively  difficult  to  advertise.
And  it  is  not  clear  that  perhaps  the  public  health  goals  might  be
better  served  if  we  made  it  easier  to  advertise  things  like  statins
as  easy  as  it  is  to  advertise  the  Big  Macs  that  give  us  the  choles-
terol in the first place.

Chairman  BAIRD.  Dr.  Koenig,  I  appreciate  your  testimony  very
much,  and  I  think  there  has  been  attention  in  the  social  sciences,
pro  and  con.  I  mean,  it  is  also  true  that  some  of  the  criticism  of
studies, for example, in the realm of Dr. Barrett’s research and lit-
eracy, emotional literacy, can also be opposed on the religious side.
In  other  words,  there  are  some  religious  institutions  that  pass  out
to  their  parishioners  lists  of  key  terms  that  say  if  your  child  is
going to school and they use the word, emotional literacy, well, that
is covert, secular humanism, and I mean, these things, a little less
so today, but some real counter attacks and issues of Dr. Jemmott’s
type  of  research.  Using  a  condom  is  implied  to  instill,  to  promote
sexual  behavior,  so,  therefore,  it  is  abstinence  only.  The  debate  is
not  about  whether,  the  real  debate,  the  substantive  debate  is  not
about  whether  abstinence  can  prevent  sexually-transmitted  dis-
ease.  By  definition  it  can.  The  question  is  does  abstinence  only
have superior outcomes to abstinence with education about respon-
sible decision-making, appropriate use of prophylactics, et cetera.

Can you comment on the dual nature of that tension and how we
can be sort of more respectful of the positive contributions on both
sides.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

62

Dr.  KOENIG.  Yes.  There  are  plenty  of  negative  effects  that  reli-
gion  can  potentially  have,  and  those  are  really  understudied  as
well  as  the  positive  effects.  There  has  been  such  a  resistance,
though, within the field of science to study anything about religion
at  all  because  of  this  conflict  between  religion  and  science.  And  to
try  to  better  understand  part  of  it  in  the  mental  health  field,  as
you  may  know,  you  know,  our  profession  has,  if  anything,  been
negative  towards  religion.  It  has  excluded  it.  Freud  said  it  was  a
neurotic obsession, and it was unhealthy, and you did, you got psy-
cho-analyzed  so  that  you  would  get  rid  of  it,  and  you  would  be
healthier.

Chairman BAIRD. Well, Williams James didn’t.
Dr.  KOENIG.  Williams  James.  No.  He  was  in  favor  of  or  he  de-
scribed  the  phenomena  in  positive  ways.  And  that  created  this
whole  negative  view  towards  religion,  and  even  within  medicine
today  the  only  time  it  comes  up  is  when  there  is  a  conflict,  when
there  is  an  issue  of  abortion  or  a  Jehovah  Witness  refuses  blood
products,  and  then  it  comes  up  in  the  discussions  in  the  teaching
centers.  But  otherwise  these  positive  effects  that  we  have  been
talking about are ignored largely because there is fear to talk about
it, to get involved in it.

And so we need education. Education is critical for health profes-
sionals, for researchers to help them study this area that is so com-
mon and has an impact one way or the other on public health.

Chairman  BAIRD.  I  really  appreciate  your  presence  and  com-
pliment Dr. Ehlers for identifying this aspect of the hearing today.

And would recognize Dr. Ehlers for five minutes.
Mr.  EHLERS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  just  continuing  on
that  topic,  it  has  always  been  a  real  puzzle  to  me  since  I  came  to
Washington,  if  you  read  the  documents  on  which  this  nation  is
founded, it is very striking, and not just the documents founded on
but  the  writings  of  Jefferson,  Adams,  and  so  forth.  Very  explicit
references to the religious faith constantly.

And  today  it  is  the  opposite  attitude,  and  I  don’t  know  whether
to  blame  Freud  or  someone  else.  But  it  is,  you  know,  the  founders
were  so  eager  to  defend  religion  they  had  the  First  Amendment
guaranteeing  freedom  of  religion.  Today  is  seems  to  be  trying  to
have  freedom  from  religion.  And  I  don’t  understand  the  phe-
nomenon myself.

I  have  to  comment  on  Dr.  Bartlett’s  comments,  my  good  friend,
who, when he talks about religious stigma and then Hollywood, re-
minds me of a friend of mine who is a movie, in the movie industry
in  Hollywood  and  frequently  is  asked  to  come  to  cocktail  parties
generally on a Saturday night, and one of his favorite things to do
is  to  go  around  the  room  and  talk  to  the  actors  and  directors  and
all  those  and  ask  them  a  simple  question.  What  percentage  of  the
people  in  America  do  you  think  will  be  in  church  tomorrow  morn-
ing? And then a number of years of doing this the highest percent-
age that was ever given him was 10 percent. The average was two
percent. As you said it is over 50 percent.

There is an incredible disconnect between the Hollywood and re-
ality. But it is not just Hollywood. It is a lot of people who feel the
same way.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

63

In  relation  to  your  comments  about  the  relationship  of  religion
and  health,  we  have  a  mental  hospital  in  my  district,  which  was
founded by the denomination I happen to belong to. That is neither
here  nor  there,  but  they  started  it  years  ago  and  was  designed  to
take  into  account  this  relationship  between  religion  and  mental
health. They are now, I believe, the second largest mental hospital
in the United States. And they don’t, they are not restricted to reli-
gious  people  coming  there,  but  they  have  a  lot  of  people  coming
there just because they provide such excellent care. And that is one
the factors, and I thought you might be interested in that.

Dr. Barrett, oh, I have to comment, too, about the pigeons. I sus-
pect the real reason everyone wanted to kill the pigeons had noth-
ing to do with the disease carried. I live in an apartment building.
It is just, my balcony is constantly littered.

In any event, back to work. Dr. Barrett, this morning I heard on
NPR  a  story  about,  which  relates  to  what  you  are  saying,  about
treating ADD, and that they found very frequently doing it without
medication  worked  better  as  long  as  you,  they  say  use  the  sorts  of
things  you  talked  about.  And  so  it  is  interesting  to  see  that  idea
reinforced  right  here  in  your  discussion.  Just  dealing  with,  and  I
wouldn’t call it emotional literacy so much as just helping students
cope with the real world, which is so different from their imagined
world. So I thank you for reinforcing that.

I  had  one  other  question,  which  slips  my  mind  at  the  moment,

and so I will simply pass at this point. Thank you.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Lipinski.
Mr. LIPINSKI. I am sitting here, and I have somewhere else I was

supposed to be at 11:00, but I couldn’t drag myself away here.

So  I  am  going  to  come  back  and  ask  everyone  else.  I  asked  Dr.
Kenkel about his recommendations for what we should be doing in
terms of funding and where we should be at, you know, funding for
what  research  would  be  helpful.  But  I  wanted  to  start  out,  you
know, it can’t be, we can’t have some social scientists without hav-
ing any questions about measurement and about variables.

I  want  to  ask  Dr.  Koenig  about,  I  know  you  are  looking  at  a  lot
of different studies, but I keep coming back to you, how exactly do
they measure whether, is this a dicogless variable, someone is reli-
gious  or  spiritual  or  they  are  not?  Or  is  there  a,  you  know,  is  this
some  sort  of  scale  of  how  religious  or  spiritual  someone  is?  That
sort  of  thing  really  stuck  out.  I  was  wondering  how  is  this,  how  is
it usually considered?

Dr.  KOENIG.  There  are  many  ways  of  measuring  religious  and
spiritual  involvement.  There  is  a  book  called,  Measures  of  Reli-
giosity,  that  has  literally  hundreds  of  measures  with  psychometric
properties,  all  in  this  one  place.  It  is  oftentimes  measured  by
church  attendance,  which  seems  to  be  a  proxy  for  level  of  involve-
ment in religion community. It can be measured in terms of a very
simple question of how important religion is to you: very important,
somewhat important, or not important.

It  can  be  measured  with  multi-item  scales.  There  are  many  dif-
ferent  scales.  There  is  an  intrinsic  religiosity  scale  that  has  ten
items that tries to capture to what extent the person’s faith the ob-
ject of their ultimate concern? Does it inform their decisions in life?
To what extent does it direct their life and their life’s decisions?

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

64

So  there  are  measures  of  quantifying,  and  it  ranges  from  10  to
50, and you can then look at relationships with all sorts of mental
and physical health outcomes.

Mr. LIPINSKI. So, obviously that is going to have a big impact on,
well,  the  measure  is  going  to  be  based  on  probably  the  theory  of
what  the  mechanism  may  be  and  then  that  is  going  to  have  a  big
impact.  It  is  hard  to  bring  all  of  those  together  and  sort  of  make
a  summary  and  try  to  talk  about  mechanisms  when  you  have  all
these  different  measurements  that  are  out  there.  And  I  just  want
to  throw  that  question  out  there.  I  am  not  trying  to,  you  know,
knock  down.  I  just  wanted  to  get  some  sense  from  you  about  that.
So let me turn back to the other question, if anyone else has any

comments. Dr. Barrett.

Dr.  BARRETT.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  have  a  lot  of  comments
about  this,  so  I  will  just  try  to  keep  it  brief.  I  mean,  I  think  that
money, you know, investing money in individual labs or in research
centers  that  tries  to  enhance  social  and  behavioral  research  is
great.  You  know,  I  work  with  economists.  I  collaborate  with
neuroscientists.  I  collaborate  with  neurologists,  so  creating  spaces
for people to have interdisciplinary discussions is great and impor-
tant.

But I think that there are other ways in which the Federal Gov-
ernment  can  invest  that  are  really  important  and  are  lacking.  For
example,  just  having  a  well-trained,  well-educated  workforce,  sci-
entific  workforce,  we  no  longer  really  have  that  anymore  in  Amer-
ica. Most of the people that I know and this is also true for my own
lab,  have  difficulty  getting  the  post-doctoral  fellows  that  we  need
to  work  on  research  projects,  whether  it  is  within  a  discipline  or
across disciplines, from the United States.

Right.  I  just  recently  hired  four  post-doctoral  fellows,  one  of
whom  is  from  the  U.S.,  and  one  is  from  Japan,  and  one  is  from
China,  and  one  is  from  France.  Now,  I  am  all  for  diversity,  and  I
think  it  is  wonderful,  and  I  am  not,  you  know,  saying  that  we
shouldn’t  have  these  kinds  of  collaborations  across  boundaries,  na-
tional  boundaries,  but  we  really,  there  are  just  not  enough  people
who  are  trained.  There  are  not  enough  people  who  are  trained
within  a  discipline,  let  alone  to  be  able  to  cross  disciplines  easily.
And  we  don’t  pay  people  sufficiently  so  that  the  best  minds  come
to science instead of going into finance, although the current situa-
tion might change things.

But,  you  know,  in  addition  to  which  I  think  some  of  the,  there
are  real  technological  issues  that  have  to  be  addressed  that  will
allow  basic  social  and  behavioral  sciences  to  interface  with  other
disciplines, let us say for example neuroscience. So right now if you
are  interested  in  understanding  how  the  brain  creates  behavior,
you  can  measure  behavior  outside  a  scanner  and  then  you  put
somebody  into  a,  you  know,  a  scanner  that  will  image  their  brain
where they have to lie completely and utterly still. Right. You can,
and  you  can  get  really  good  measure  of  where  neurons  are  acti-
vating  in  the  brain,  but  you  can’t  measure  the  time  course  of  the
activation.  And  it  turns  out  that,  you  know,  it,  the  brain,  neurons
don’t turn on and off like light switches. There is this constant, you
know,  over  milliseconds  the  pattern  of  neuronal  activity  changes,
and  these,  you  know,  millisecond  to  millisecond  changes  are  really

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

65

important for understanding how the brain is producing particular
behaviors.

So  these  are  challenges  that,  you  know,  our  country  faces  if  we
want  to  move  forward  in  a  significant  way,  and  I  would  also  point
out  that,  you  know,  I  live  in  Boston,  where  there  are  a  total  of  12
research  magnets  that  can  do  neuro-imaging,  and  there  are,  you
know,  I  don’t  know,  probably  a  thousand  people  who  do  research
on  this  topic  where  they  are  trying  to  understand  how  the  brain
produces  behavior.  And  there  is  very  little  access,  you  know.  Even
at  an  institution  where,  you  know,  there,  I  have  a  lot  of  federal
funds and people’s desire to be helpful, I have trouble actually get-
ting access to the machinery that I need.

So  it  is  not  just  about  funding  labs.  It  is  about  creating  a  work-
force  and  creating  the  tools,  and  I  think  we  have  a  lot  of  work  to
do on both of those fronts.

Mr. LIPINSKI. Anyone else have any, want to add anything?
Dr.  JEMMOTT.  I  would  like  to  add  something  with  regard  to  the
area of HIV. I think there are three different things that are need-
ed.  One  is  more  research  on  dissemination.  We  have  been  con-
ducting  HIV  prevention  research  for  quite  a  while  in  the  United
States,  and  we  have  a  large  number  of  efficacious  interventions,
but yet we are still seeing very high rates of HIV.

And  part  of  the  problem  is  that  these  efficacious  interventions
are  not  being  used  in  the  community.  And  so  we  need  to  under-
stand  why.  We  have  to  understand  why  interventions  are  adopted
and why they are not adopted. We need more research on that.

We  need  more  research  on  how  a  community  can  take  an  inter-
vention and adapt it so that it is more suitable for their population,
and  that  will  include  an  understanding  of  what  are  the  critical  in-
gredients  of  an  intervention  that  cannot  be  changed  and  which
things can be changed.

And  then  the  third  thing  is  to  look  at  the  issue  of  the  effective-
ness  of  the  intervention  when  it  is  outside  of  sort  of  the  social
science  laboratory  where  you  have  highly-trained  facilitators,  and
it  is  very  tightly  controlled.  In  a  real-world  environment  is  it  still
going  to  be  effective  and  what  are  the  factors  that  determine
whether  it  is  going  to  be  effective  in  those  settings  or  not.  So  that
is a whole area, dissemination.

The  other  thing  I  would  say  is  even  though  we  have  a  lot  of
interventions,  we  don’t  have  interventions  for  one  critically-impor-
tant  population,  and  this  is  the  population  that  is  the  population
that  is  the  highest-risk  population  in  the  United  States.  It  is  Afri-
can-American men who have sex with men. They have rates of HIV
that rival those that we see in sub-Saharan Africa. And yet to this
day  we  still  don’t  have  an  intervention  for  them  that  is  based  on
a randomized, clinical-controlled trial. So we need more research on
that.

And then the third thing I would say is a controversial area that
has  come  up,  and  that  is  the  issue  of  abstinence  only.  We  are
spending  tremendous  amounts  of  money  for  abstinence  only  pro-
grams,  but  the  data  are  just  not  there.  We  have  a  lot  more  data
on efficacious, sort of comprehensive education programs. Where on
abstinence only there is hardly any. And I believe that it is possible
to develop abstinence-only interventions that can be efficacious, but

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

66

nence-only?

the  problem  is  there  is  not  much  research  going  on  right  now  on
that issue. So there really needs to be a lot more research on absti-
nence-only  interventions,  especially  given  that  they  are  so  widely
used and so widely encouraged.

Mr.  LIPINSKI.  Is  there  a  reason  there  isn’t  that  research,  absti-

Dr.  JEMMOTT.  I  think  that  most  researchers  haven’t  really  been
interested in it. They are of the mindset that, you know, young peo-
ple  are  going  to  have  sex.  It  is  impossible  to  get  them  to  stop.  I
think that is probably part of the reason. Some people promote ab-
stinence from a religious perspective, and many researchers are not
very  religious,  you  know,  so  that  is  not  going  to  motivate  them  to
promote abstinence.

So it is not seen as an efficacious strategy, but it actually hasn’t

been tested very rigorously.

the Chairman will allow?

Mr.  LIPINSKI.  Thank  you.  Dr.  Koenig,  anything  to  add  there  if

Dr.  KOENIG.  Yes.  I  appreciate  exactly  what  you  are  saying,  par-
ticularly  about  the  fact  that  scientists  are  not  very  religious,  and
so when you are looking at the NIH or the National Science Foun-
dation,  you  are  looking  at  review  sections  that  are  made  up  of  sci-
entists  who  are  in  many  respects  biased  against  any  traditional
form  of  religious  practice  or  activity.  If  you  have  a  kind  of  a  new
age  spirituality  or  a  fringe  area  of  alternative  or  complimentary
medicine, they will fund those in a heartbeat. But if you even men-
tion  the  word  of  God  or  anything  related  to  God,  it,  immediately
it  turns  sour.  So  I  think  in  some  respects  making  some  interven-
tions  in  order  to  overcome  some  of  the  bias  on  the  review  sections
at the NIH and at NSF would be very helpful.

Also,  having  awards  or  having  programs  where  you  train  young
investigators  or  senior  investigators  to  conduct  research  in  this
area,  provide  them  with  the  expertise  to  conduct  the  research.  I
think  that  would  have  big  payoff  in  terms  of  them  being  able  to
write adequate grants that are competitive for funding.

Mr. LIPINSKI. Thank you.
Chairman BAIRD. I will recognize Dr. Bartlett. I would just note,
though, in the context of this discussion, the vast amount of federal
money  that  has  been  going  towards  abstinence-only  education
based on scant research. We tend, and when Dr. Ehlers was saying
earlier, a little bit too much, in my judgment, of this argument that
there  is  an  anti-religious  sentiment  certainly  in  the  Presidential
debate  of  late,  and  always  the  religious  factor  plays  heavily.  And
I would say the abstinence-only advocacy and the vast funding that
is going towards it in this country and internationally is driven not
based on empirical basis but based on religious belief.

And  so  on  the  one  hand  to  say,  well,  we  discriminated  against
religion in our scientific practice, and yet we mandate taxpayers to
fund  an  intervention  strategy  that  has  at  present  relatively  scarce
demonstrated  efficacy  but  is  driven  by  a  largely  philosophical/reli-
gious. And then so we mandate that funding but then we say there
is an anti-religious bias. That is a bit inconsistent. I would just, for
the  record  suggest,  and  while  we  ought  to  study  the  efficacy,  if
those studies of efficacy give us differential results, we might want
to  modify  our  policy  in  some  way,  and  that  is  a  difficult  thing.  If

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

67

the basis for the policy advocacy was not an empirical position but
an ideological one, that is a challenge for us.

Dr. Bartlett.
Mr. BARTLETT. Thank you very much. Dr. Kenkel, you mentioned
that  half  the  deaths  in  our  country  come  from  tobacco,  sedentary
lifestyle, and obesity. One would suspect a cause-effect relationship
between the last two of these. I think some very bad trends started
in  our  country  when  the  economy  and  keeping  up  with  the  Jones
drove the mother out of the home, into the workplace and replaced
her with the television set.

The  first  thing  that  happened  was  that  there  is  a  very  positive
relationship  between  the  number  of  television  sets  in  the  country
and  the  degree  in  SAT  scores  over  24  years.  They  still  rattle
around  in  the  basement,  and  they  are  not  coming.  They  are  not
coming  up.  Of  course,  as  the  kids  sat  in  front  of  the  television  set
and nibbled on fast foods, obesity became a problem.

I  understand  that  the  next  generation  of  Americans  for  the  first
time  ever  may  live  less  long  than  this  generation,  primarily  be-
cause  of  obesity.  I  tell  audiences,  this  is  a  really  great  country  we
live  in.  The  biggest  health  problem  of  our  poorest  people,  those  on
welfare,  is  obesity.  Now,  isn’t  that  a  great  country?  That  is  really
sad, isn’t it, that we have that relationship.

When you ask Americans do you think your kids are going to live
as well as you lived, and a vast majority of them say, no. And when
you  ask  people,  do  you  think  your  country  is  on  the  right  track  or
wrong track, more people than ever in our history today think that
their country is on a wrong track.

What  can  we  in  Congress  do  about  these  things?  Which  is  why
we  are  here  today.  Let  us  just  start  with  Dr.  Barrett.  If  you  have
a  comment  on  the  last  exchange,  I  would  be  happy  to  have  that,
too.

Dr.  BARRETT.  I  have  comments  on  almost  every  comment  that
has been made. I am trying to sit here and not make them. I would
suggest,  I  mean,  the  comment  that  you  just  made,  you  know,  it
seems  to  me  that  the  fact  that  obesity  is  a  major  health  challenge
in  the  United  States  and  that  the  children,  our  children  are  not
going  to  live  as  well  as  we  do  may  have  something  to  do  with  the
fact  that  mothers  are  no  longer  at  home  or  the  fact  that  fathers
don’t stay home.

But it also has to do with the fact that if you walk into a super-
market,  you,  you  know,  there  is  a  very  narrow  strip  of  fresh  fruit
at  one  end,  and  at  the  other,  and  the  rest  of  the  supermarket  is
filled with things that are bad for you.

And my understanding from, you know, scientists who study, so-
cial  and  behavioral  scientists  who  study  obesity  is  that  this  prob-
lem  has  a  lot  to  do  with  the  fact  that,  the  way  that  food  is  mar-
keted,  what  food  is  available,  and  the  fact  that  carbohydrates  ap-
parently,  you  know,  which  are  very,  you  know,  very  bad  for  you,
you know, actually trigger the same kind of process as an addiction
to other kinds of things that are bad for you.

So  it  seems  to  me  that  this  example  is  an  example  of  a  problem
that  isn’t  going  to  have  a  quick  fix,  that  there  are  multiple  causes
and  multiple  factors  that  need  to  be  addressed  and  that  there  is
not  going  to  be  any  single  kind  of  quick  fix,  which  I  think  brings

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

68

to  the  forefront  the  point  that  a  lot  of  us  have  been  making  today
and  that  I  think  is  a  sympathetic,  people  are  sympathetic  to,  and
that  is  that,  you  know,  sciences  have  to  work  together,  no  science
can  solve  the  problem.  Right.  There  is  not  going  to  be  a  pill  that,
you  know,  solves,  that  cures  obesity.  You  are  not  going  to  find  a
gene  that  cures  obesity.  It  is  not  going  to  just  be  providing  people
with  cheap,  you  know,  produce  that  will,  you  know,  cure  obesity.
I  mean,  none  of  those  things  in  and  of  themselves  are  going  to
solve that particular problem.

I  would  say  that  I  think  as  a  general  rule  one  of  the  reasons  or
at least what I see is that this is a country that is anti-intellectual
compared  to  other  countries  but  doesn’t  understand  science.  It
doesn’t, really deeply just does not understand the value of science
for  producing  better  outcomes  in  life.  And  some  of  that  has  to  do
with  education  and,  you  know,  at  all  levels,  just,  you  know,  how
well  do  we  train  our  students  about  science,  how  well  do  they  un-
derstand what science can really do for you?

Some  of  it  has  to  do  with,  you  know,  actually  what  I  have  been
hearing  today  a  little  bit,  which  is,  you  know,  I  have  to  disagree,
Dr. Koenig. I sat on review panels, grant review panels for the past
10  years.  I  sit  on  the  editorial  boards  of  almost  every  major  psy-
chology  journal  in  my  field,  and  I  have  never  seen  bias  against
questions  of  religion.  What  I  do  see  is  what  I  also  see  here  today,
which  is  that  all  of  us  are  the  product  of  the  Enlightenment.  You
know,  we  are  all  the  product  of  the  belief  that  faith  is  something
different  than  reason,  that  reason  has,  it  is  not  Freud’s  fault.  I
mean,  a  lot  of  things  are  Freud’s  fault,  but  that,  this  isn’t  Freud’s
fault. I mean, you know, it goes all the way back to Descartes and
even  further,  that,  you  know,  we  believe  that  reason  is  something
different than faith, that cognitive things, you know, that we could
solve  the  current  economic  crisis  by  looking  at  cognitive  mecha-
nisms,  when,  in  fact,  we  know  that  within  the  brain  cognition  and
emotion  are  intimately  entwined  and  that  some  of  the  things  that
Canaman  and  Diversky  discovered  are  actually  emotional  effects,
that,  you  know,  we  just,  we  don’t,  that  we  use  these  kind  of  com-
mon  sense  beliefs  in  the  kinds  of  questions  we  ask  and  the  kinds
of  things  that  we  fund,  and  it  has  consequences  in,  for,  you  know,
in the end, for the outcomes of our children.

Mr.  BARTLETT.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much  for  a  good
hearing,  and  thank  you,  panel.  What  we  really  need,  of  course,  is
a  cultural  change,  a  culture  gets  what  it  appreciates.  You  might
ask  yourself  how  often  does  the  White  House  invite  an  academic
achiever  there  to  slobber  all  over  them  the  way  they  do  sports  fig-
ures and entertainers.

Thank you very much for a good hearing, sir.
Chairman BAIRD. Thank you, Dr. Bartlett, for your insight.
We  are  almost  finished,  but  if  there  is  any  final  comments  any-
one  wants  to  make,  I  would  like  to  open  that  up  very  briefly.  We
don’t have—Dr. Koenig.

Dr. KOENIG. I have actually a comment with regard to Mr. Bart-

lett’s question about obesity future lifespans.

You  know,  it  is  interesting  that  the  demographic  that  you  are
talking about with the highest rates of obesity is also the same de-
mographic that has the highest rates of religious attendance. These

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

69

people  are  at  all  ages  in  churches,  half  of  them,  more  than  half
every  Sunday.  So  what  a  marvelous  place  potentially  to  take  ad-
vantage  of  some  of  this  science  that,  with  regard  to  health  edu-
cation  within  churches  concerning  diet,  concerning  exercise,  con-
cerning lifestyle changes.

And you cut your populations right there. How can you motivate
churches  to  develop  these  faith,  health  ministries  where  they  ad-
dress  these  issues  in  the  congregation  that  could  extend  longevity,
that  could  reduce  the  need  for  health  services.  Religion  and  medi-
cine and health care are parallel ways of enhancing health in many
respects, but they are just not communicating.

Chairman BAIRD. Dr. Kenkel.
Dr.  KENKEL.  Actually  I  would  like  to  also  say  something  very
quickly,  and  I  think  it  actually  compliments  several  of  the  other
comments here about the role of information as providing consumer
incentives.  We,  and  how  that  could  play  out  with  obesity  and  per-
haps,  you  know,  with  the  religion  education  or  with  various  other
dissemination of information.

And I was struck a few years ago when the Atkins Diet came out
how  quickly  all  of  a  sudden  there  were  all  sorts  of  low  carb  prod-
ucts  just  all  over  the  place.  And  this  is  an  example  of,  you  know,
the economist sees this as an example of how the market responds
with  what  consumers  want.  What  happens,  though,  is  we  have  to
be  sure  that  the  consumers  get  the  information  that  helps  them
want healthy things.

And  one  of  the  comments  made  earlier  by  Mr.  Bartlett  was  that
the high prevalence of obesity among low socioeconomic status, you
know,  among  the  poor,  that  is  also  very  true  for  smoking,  and  we
are coming up with a situation where, you know, increasingly some
of  these  big  health  problems  like  obesity  and  smoking  and  others
are  really  confined  to  people  with  low  education,  low  income,  and
at the same time for people at the higher incomes who have access
to  all  these  great  products  and  all  the  great  information,  we  can
become increasingly healthy.

And  so  this,  a  lot  of  interest  in  disparities  in  health  linked  to
these  kinds  of  behaviors  and  trying  to  figure  out  interventions,
again, that could help eliminate those disparities and motivate peo-
ple  that  are,  the  groups  that  are  in  the  most  need  of  getting  this
information  to  use  these  new  products  I  think  is  a  very  exciting
area for public policy and research.

Chairman BAIRD. It has interesting foreign policy implications in
the  developing  world  we  have  gone  in  many  cases,  there  is  still
starvation,  but  in  many  developing  countries  we  have  gone  from
the  leading  death  cause  is  not  starvation  but  the  non-commu-
nicable  diseases  like  diabetes,  obesity,  cardiovascular,  and  things.

Dr. Jemmott, did you have a final comment?
Dr. JEMMOTT. I would just say that I agree that we should focus
on  obesity  and  sort  of  food  consumption,  nutrition,  et  cetera,  but  I
think  we  should  also  remember  that  physical  activity  is  very  im-
portant  as  well.  And  I  think  a  lot  of  Americans  know  a  lot  about,
you know, food and what they should eat and shouldn’t, and should
not  eat,  but  when  it  comes  to  physical  activity,  they  don’t  know
how  they  can  fit  it  into  their  daily  routine,  yet  it  is  so  important.

So it seems like we need to have more focus on that as well.

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

70

Chairman  BAIRD.  Again,  I  thank  the  panelists  and  the  folks  in
attendance  today.  Thank  my  colleagues.  With  that  the  hearing
stands adjourned. I am grateful for your presence. Thank you.

[Whereupon, at 11:45 a.m., the Subcommittee was adjourned.]

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

Appendix:

ADDITIONAL MATERIAL FOR THE RECORD

(71)

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

72

STATEMENT OF DAVID B. ABRAMS

EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR

THE STEVEN A. SCHROEDER INSTITUTE FOR
TOBACCO RESEARCH AND POLICY STUDIES

AMERICAN LEGACY FOUNDATION®

There  is  strong  evidence  that  half  of  all  deaths  in  the  U.S.  can  be  attributed  to
behavioral  factors  such  as  smoking,  poor  diet,  overeating,  and  physical  inactivity.
In  addition,  behavioral  and  social  factors  contribute  to  the  staggering  costs  of  pre-
ventable morbidity and mortality.

Even with the dramatic contributions that behavioral and social sciences research
has made to date, much more needs to be done to understand the role of behavioral
and social factors in disease and, in turn, to use that knowledge to improve the Na-
tion’s health.

Behavioral and social sciences research is critical to improving public health over-
all,  but  is  especially  important  in  addressing  youth  smoking  prevention  and  adult
tobacco  cessation.  Tobacco  use  is  the  single  most  avoidable  cause  of  disease,  dis-
ability,  and  death  in  the  United  States.  Eighty  percent  of  all  smokers  have  their
first  cigarette  before  age  18  and  90  percent  start  smoking  before  age  20.  Within
days or weeks of smoking your first cigarette, symptoms of nicotine dependence may
appear. Although nearly half of all smokers attempt to quit each year, less than five
percent  are  successful,  with  the  majority  going  back  to  smoking  within  just  seven
days.

As we examine how to reverse the tobacco epidemic in this country, we must pay
special attention to the role of behavior change. Young people are especially vulner-
able  to  the  advertising  tactics  of  the  tobacco  industry  and  their  power  to  affect  be-
havior is undeniable.

Last  month,  a  new  report  from  the  National  Institutes  of  Health,  Monograph  19:
The  Role  of  the  Media  in  Promoting  and  Reducing  Tobacco  Use,  concluded  that
much  tobacco  advertising  targets  the  psychological  needs  of  adolescents,  such  as
popularity,  peer  acceptance  and  positive  self-image.  Advertising  creates  the  percep-
tion that smoking will satisfy these needs.

The  report  also  concludes  that  mass  media  campaigns  can  reduce  smoking,  espe-
cially  when  combined  with  other  tobacco  control  strategies,  lending  further  credi-
bility  to  existing  media  campaigns  that  have  been  proven  to  curb  youth  smoking,
such as the American Legacy Foundation’s award-winning truth®  campaign. In its
first two years, truth®  was credited with 22 percent of the overall decline in youth
smoking, but the annual budget for truth® is less than the $36 million our competi-
tors in the tobacco industry spend in just 24 hours to market their deadly products
to consumers in the U.S.

Behavioral  and  Social  Sciences  have  also  provided  effective  smoking  cessation
treatments  for  tobacco  dependence  as  well  as  for  other  addictions  and  mental  ill-
nesses like depression and anxiety. The national smoking cessation campaign called
EX®  is  geared  to  taking  what  we  know  and  reaching  the  45  million  current  smok-
ers—the  majority  of  whom  want  to  quit,  but  have  not  accessed  the  available  effec-
tive  resources  in  previous  quit  attempts.  Despite  the  concerns  of  the  obesity  epi-
demic and the escalating costs of health care, we should not forget that tobacco use
is  still  the  single  biggest  preventable  cause  of  death,  suffering  and  excess  cost  to
our health care system.

Investments  in  behavioral  and  social  sciences  have  paid  off.  We  have  contributed
to child health and human development, to improving quality of life as we age, and
we have cut HIV–AIDS incidence in half in less than 20 years, and many other ex-
amples,  using  principles  and  practices  of  Behavioral  and  Social  Science.  We  know
a  great  deal  about  how  to  reverse  the  type  2  Diabetes  epidemic.  However,  putting
what  we  know  into  practice  and  policy  has  fallen  far  short  of  what  is  needed  and
could  be  achieved  to  improve  our  nation’s  health.  If  we  put  all  of  what  we  know
in  behavioral  and  social  sciences  into  practice  and  policy  at  every  level  of  health
care  and  public  health  delivery,  we  could  dramatically  reduce  chronic  disease  bur-
den,  disability,  death  and  huge  preventable  expenses  to  our  nation.  We  can  do  this
with what we know today.

Despite  considerable  success  over  the  past  decade  in  tobacco  control,  tobacco  use
still  accounts  for  nearly  one-third  of  cancer  deaths  in  the  U.S.  and  worldwide,  and
tobacco-attributable  mortality  is  predicted  to  increase  in  the  coming  decades  if  cur-
rent smoking patterns continue. Tobacco use is also a major contributor to heart dis-
ease,  pulmonary  disease  and  it  complicates  and  makes  worse  almost  any  other  dis-
ease.  If  this  trend  is  to  be  reversed,  an  in-depth  understanding  of  the  behavioral
and social factors that underlie tobacco use as well as effective prevention and treat-

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

73

ment  efforts  must  inform  the  debate  and  guide  the  way  to  effective  policy  changes.
Behavior  change  is  at  the  center  of  the  translation  of  new  discoveries  in  the  bio-
medical,  socio-behavioral,  and  population  sciences  into  practices  and  policies  to  im-
prove our nation’s health.
The Steven A. Schroeder National Institute for Tobacco Research and Policy Stud-
ies  at  the  American  Legacy  Foundation®  advances  the  science  behind  social  mar-
keting,  smoking  cessation  and  tobacco  control  policy  to  facilitate  the  translation  of
empirical  findings  to  practical  public  health  interventions.  The  American  Legacy
Foundation  is  dedicated  to  building  a  world  where  young  people  reject  tobacco  and
anyone  can  quit.  Located  in  Washington,  D.C.,  the  Foundation  develops  programs
that  address  the  health  effects  of  tobacco  use,  especially  among  vulnerable  popu-
lations  disproportionately  affected  by  the  toll  of  tobacco,  through  grants,  technical
assistance  and  training,  partnerships,  youth  activism,  and  counter-marketing  and
grassroots marketing campaigns. The Foundation’s programs include truth®, a na-
tional  youth  smoking  prevention  campaign  that  has  been  cited  as  contributing  to
significant declines in youth smoking; EX®, an innovative public health program de-
signed  to  speak  to  smokers  in  their  own  language  and  change  the  way  they  ap-
proach  quitting;  research  initiatives  exploring  the  causes,  consequences  and  ap-
proaches  to  reducing  tobacco  use;  and  a  nationally-renowned  program  of  outreach
to  priority  populations.  The  American  Legacy  Foundation  was  created  as  a  result
of the November 1998 Master Settlement Agreement (MSA) reached between attor-
neys  general  from  46  states,  five  U.S.  territories  and  the  tobacco  industry.  Visit
www.americanlegacy.org.

Æ

VerDate 11-MAY-2000 12:51 Jan 03, 2009 Jkt 044345 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6601 C:\WORKD\R&SE08\091808\44345 SCIENCE1 PsN: SCIENCE1

